This wasn't actually a card game. It was more of a book of 88 tear out sheets with one game each. They is no way that this can be played as a card game. The box doesn't even indicate that it's a card game. I thought this would be a fun card game for my husband & daughter to play together. You can purchase magazines with more games for less price. I wouldn't recommend this product unless you would like an overpriced book of sudoku games. I'm returning it & buying an electronic version for husbands PDA. The price is about the same.</review_text>
I bought this for my 2 yr old daughter.  I was so surprised at the quality for Little tykes.  It has no storage and the refridgerator door would not stay closed.  I think it should cost half of what it does.  I purchased the Step Two kitchen when my daughter was three, and it is way better by far</review_text>
I bought this for my 5  year old daughter and we tried to take very good care of it.  Within a few days of careful use, one of the latches bent, a hinge broke off and a piece of the edge came unglued.  It is a great idea, but needs better construction.  On a positive note, my daughter loved it and would have spent hours drawing and creating with the tools inside if I let her.  However, I had to take the box away so further damage does not occur before I can fix it.  The drawers work fine.  The problem is with the two doors on top that flip out.  Note about drawers; Little plastic door knobs pop out.  Need to be glued in.</review_text>
My daughter has an earlier version that the one shown so it is possible they have addressed some of these issues:1) most games have a 1 minute time out which is really frustrating for my kids2) "Oh that's not so good" - If I hear Barbie say that one more time I may just throw this thing out the nearest window.  My daughter will get a score in a game she feels really good about and barbie says, "Oh that's not so good, but you'll be better with a bit more practice"  This has broken my daughter down into tears more than once.3) There are no parental controls.  I wanted to turn off or lengthen the timer.  I expected those sorts of features from Oregon Scientific.Right now the most fun thing my kids do with it is play the Flower Fun game (like hangman) and type in "ICUP"If you are looking at a newer version of this I would strongly recommend playing with a demo for a few minutes to check it out</review_text>
My daughter received this as a gift & we all found it extremely difficult to use.  I was not able to play most of the activities on the screens without first getting the handbook out & doing step by step which was still not very easy to figure out.  It was not at all easy for a child to enjoy.  There were very few activities my 6 year old daughter was able to understand & play. It is too advanced & difficult to use for the ages listed.  The screen on the monitor was low graphics & poor lighting quality as well.  This is a very expensive mistake that provided no benefit or fun to my daughter</review_text>
I am the mother of two elementary aged children who love art projects.  This was a Christmas gift and I was never so disappointed in the quality of this item.  It arrived with crayons broken and the ones that weren't, you couldn't even use on paper.  The markers are dry and caps don't stay on.  This is a terrible product and the price is ridiculous!!!  Definitely would be better off purchasing these items elsewhere!!</review_text>
The case is a CHEAPLY made box of wood that did not even survive shipping.  The materials contained inside are poor quality.  The rating does not deserve one star.I returned it due to the damage sustained in shipping, but it would have been returned regardless because it is GARBAGE!</review_text>
Yum...play food! This is a great set. I will buy it as soon as I find it. This is a great set! Lots of cans (good for storage), ice cream, boxed treats, cookies, (yummy), and of course, much more. And who could resist the spaghetti with meatballs? And is that chocolate chips on the ice cream? Oh my gosh, it's better than I thought.You might think that to have a good time, your child needs 40 dollar Melissa and Doug wooden play food with real cutting noises and a Fisher Price 100 dollar kitchen for imaginative play. Bullpies, I say. I have tons of dollar-store food. I have ultra-realistic foam food from a kitchen set I got. I prefer the dollar store food. Dollar store food is better because it has more in one package, looks real, is cheap, pretty durable, and looks nice. I have a really silly play food set that came with a stovetop (small, but the knobs turn!), a pink and purple propane tank, a can of "barracuda" (seriously), and a can of "barracuda hash" which included barracuda, ham and eggs, chicken, turkey, potpie, and more eggs. But the logo has spam and a hotdog, and the front of it has beans, turkey, fish, sausage, and lots of weird meat. But it says "Eatable, 100% dainty, Present!, Daintiness, Dainty". Just wanted to let you know.So, bottom line is, dollar store play food is much better than you think it is. It comes with lots of things that the expensive companies would never have dreamed of</review_text>
It seems like a nice complete set of playfood, except that the boxes are really flimsy cardboard, and I've thrown most of them out already.  It doesn't take much to crush them.  There are much nicer sets out there, and there are separate pieces sold on ebay, that are probably used but will stand the test of your kids much better.  Not worth the money</review_text>
I was really excited about this toy because it was a stacking and sorting toy in one. And I love Laugh and Learn toys. I got it for my daughter for christmas when she was 16 months old. She never liked it. I kept it out and encouraged her to play with it, but she just really didn't get into it. Also, there is a sticker that goes on the bottom of the top pot so you can see the shapes through the holes on the lid, and the sticker shapes don't match the holes! Unfortunately, this toy was a big let down.</review_text>
I was so excited when I ordered my Star Wars Holographic Emperor figure. I'd been waiting for this exclusive figure be available for weeks!! When I got home today, the box with the Amazon logo was on my doorstep. Upon opening the box, I was completely disappointed to find that the Emperor figure I'd been waiting for was damaged since it was jammed into the box so that the backing card was crushed. The people packing this stuff are half-wits!! Anybody with a brain would know better than to  cram something into a box like that!! They should be ashamed of their service & to all you collectors out there....BEWARE!!</review_text>
This looks like such a great toy, and the packaging is really impressive, but don't be fooled like we were. I assumed that by paying close to 25 dollars it would be somewhat durable-just reasonable durability-I don't expect much from plastic toys...but this is really really bad. You might also think that paying that much would give you things like closable doors...you know, 99 cent matchbox cars' doors stay closed, but the space shuttle's doors don't-which limit it's "fun" factor. The "movable arm" is just a free floating plastic stick that simply is stuck into a hole..It doesn't even stay in. The "launch pad" and the fuel tank/boosters are down right horrible. They don't connect to the shuttle, which was disapointed all of us, especially my son. And it is so cheaply made, I really can't believe that it wasn't bought from the dollar store. My son was so excited for this set. But after playing with it for just a few minutes he hasn't gotten it out again. I would definately NOT recommend this</review_text>
My 2 year old son loves to "cook" and to serve Mommy and Daddy meals from his kitchen.  My only complaint is that it falls over easily and it seems we are often picking it up off the floor.  It isn't very sturdy, but I'm not unhappy with this purchase</review_text>
This game is for people to play if they're drunk or mindless...or in some cases both....it's completely pointless and uninteresting...if ur just going to play bunco to see if u can get 21 snake eyes you either love to waste time or are just stupid...sorry but i mean think about it?...why PAY MONEY for this when i can JUST USE DICE from OTHER MORE INTERESTING board games I already own? DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY!~*Even if you manage to make the game interesting by being creative and thinking a little...you still shouldn't buy it...b/c like i said before JUST USE DICE FROM OTHER BOARD GAMES YOU ALREADY OWN!</review_text>
My twin sons got this for christmas when they were 3.  They loved it!!!  The dog is so cuddly and cute.  They loved playing pretend with the accessories.  My only complaint is that within a day the latch was falling off, the syringe was coming apart, and the brush had lost a couple of bristles.  The boys had not played rough with it, it just wasn't the quality that I had hoped for.  It is a real favorite of theirs, I am just afraid that it won't last as long as their imaginations.  I think that with a few improvements it will be a fantastic toy.  A real winner for young children in the hospital.</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter for her 11th birthday.  After playing the game once, she asked me if I could take it back.  She said that the game was boring because it was so limited as far as what you could do in the game.  My daughter has always played a lot of "simulated life" video games (i.e., the Sims, Animal Crossing) and online games (i.e, club penguin).  I suspect this is why she found this game limiting.  Other games that she has played portray a more intricate "life" and therefore draw the player in to a greater degree.  My advice would be to consider what your daughter is used to before buying this.  If your daughter has no experience in these types of games, this game will probably be fine.  However if your daughter has previously played simulated life games, she will probably find this one lacking.</review_text>
I bought this for my nine year old daughter.  The game in theory is great, but ours does not work right, and the company is not real great to deal with.  I am still trying to get a replacement.  If the game worked properly, I would rate it 5 stars, easily.  Even my thirteen year old daughter loves it</review_text>
We were excited to give this to our 5 year old for his birthday.  After opening he loved the design and having his own cool looking notebook computer and was very excitied.  However the screen is very disappointing.  I can't even rate the games because overall I simply just can't see what is on it.  The product is relatively useless in a dark environment and dissapointing.  I should have gone to a toys r us and actually compared the product to other simular products.  I would suggest anyone do the same prior to buying it</review_text>
I bought this game for my new family for Christmas.  This is not at all the Game of Life that I remember playing for countless hours as a child.  First of all, my old game had all of the mountains, houses, and spinner permenantly attached to the game board.  With the new version, all of these things have to be attached with each setup, which takes about 10-15 minutes and they are easily knocked off the board.  Also, the spinner is hard to spin and frequently comes off of its pivot.  The cars are less sturdy and the people pegs do not stay in the car so you are constantly having to put the people back in the car.  Finally, the rules of the game have gotten more complicated and yet the meaning of the game has become more trivial.  I think I will put this in the top of a closet or in a yard sale and go find my old version of the game to play in the future</review_text>
We were very disappointed in this toy.  It does not spin fast enough to make the paint spray evenly over the cardboard.  My older children had a spin art toy that was great.  It made the most spectacular designs. This is not worth the effort or money</review_text>
What a disappointment.  The spinner just can't gain enough speed to do anything lilke what it is supposed to do.  Overall, it's  a cheap item with limited supplies for the $</review_text>
This is more of a costume item for an adult or older child than a toy for a young child.  There are only two working buttons, one to open the visor and one that repeats a single message through a crackly speaker.  There is some padding on the top, but not enough.  The manufacturer acknowleges this by including a note suggesting that more padding be added.  Overall not a good value at all for the price.</review_text>
I've already spent way too much time trying to screw the basket in and hammer the wheel caps on.  What a pain in the neck. This was the most expensive cart and I can't believe it's taking this long to put together - not worth it</review_text>
I was really excited about this toy because it was a stacking and sorting toy in one. And I love Laugh and Learn toys. I got it for my daughter for christmas when she was 16 months old. She never liked it. I kept it out and encouraged her to play with it, but she just really didn't get into it. Also, there is a sticker that goes on the bottom of the top pot so you can see the shapes through the holes on the lid, and the sticker shapes don't match the holes! Unfortunately, this toy was a big let down.</review_text>
My 2 year old son loves to "cook" and to serve Mommy and Daddy meals from his kitchen.  My only complaint is that it falls over easily and it seems we are often picking it up off the floor.  It isn't very sturdy, but I'm not unhappy with this purchase</review_text>
My daughter received this as a gift & we all found it extremely difficult to use.  I was not able to play most of the activities on the screens without first getting the handbook out & doing step by step which was still not very easy to figure out.  It was not at all easy for a child to enjoy.  There were very few activities my 6 year old daughter was able to understand & play. It is too advanced & difficult to use for the ages listed.  The screen on the monitor was low graphics & poor lighting quality as well.  This is a very expensive mistake that provided no benefit or fun to my daughter</review_text>
My twin sons got this for christmas when they were 3.  They loved it!!!  The dog is so cuddly and cute.  They loved playing pretend with the accessories.  My only complaint is that within a day the latch was falling off, the syringe was coming apart, and the brush had lost a couple of bristles.  The boys had not played rough with it, it just wasn't the quality that I had hoped for.  It is a real favorite of theirs, I am just afraid that it won't last as long as their imaginations.  I think that with a few improvements it will be a fantastic toy.  A real winner for young children in the hospital.</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter for her 11th birthday.  After playing the game once, she asked me if I could take it back.  She said that the game was boring because it was so limited as far as what you could do in the game.  My daughter has always played a lot of "simulated life" video games (i.e., the Sims, Animal Crossing) and online games (i.e, club penguin).  I suspect this is why she found this game limiting.  Other games that she has played portray a more intricate "life" and therefore draw the player in to a greater degree.  My advice would be to consider what your daughter is used to before buying this.  If your daughter has no experience in these types of games, this game will probably be fine.  However if your daughter has previously played simulated life games, she will probably find this one lacking.</review_text>
I bought this for my nine year old daughter.  The game in theory is great, but ours does not work right, and the company is not real great to deal with.  I am still trying to get a replacement.  If the game worked properly, I would rate it 5 stars, easily.  Even my thirteen year old daughter loves it</review_text>
We were excited to give this to our 5 year old for his birthday.  After opening he loved the design and having his own cool looking notebook computer and was very excitied.  However the screen is very disappointing.  I can't even rate the games because overall I simply just can't see what is on it.  The product is relatively useless in a dark environment and dissapointing.  I should have gone to a toys r us and actually compared the product to other simular products.  I would suggest anyone do the same prior to buying it</review_text>
Great concept, but bad design. Both of my children have had one for a year. Due to the discomfort, they never use it! It needs to recline back further and the plastic is slippery making it hard to sit without slipping around</review_text>
I bought this Basketball hoop for my son who was two and LOVED to shoot hoops.  Great height for a small kid, but difficult to adjust, latch always got stuck. Also, after a few months, the latch broke right off.  Now I have a hoop that is too low for the basketball to be any fun for my son.  Now it is just a $30 peice of trash</review_text>
Yum...play food! This is a great set. I will buy it as soon as I find it. This is a great set! Lots of cans (good for storage), ice cream, boxed treats, cookies, (yummy), and of course, much more. And who could resist the spaghetti with meatballs? And is that chocolate chips on the ice cream? Oh my gosh, it's better than I thought.You might think that to have a good time, your child needs 40 dollar Melissa and Doug wooden play food with real cutting noises and a Fisher Price 100 dollar kitchen for imaginative play. Bullpies, I say. I have tons of dollar-store food. I have ultra-realistic foam food from a kitchen set I got. I prefer the dollar store food. Dollar store food is better because it has more in one package, looks real, is cheap, pretty durable, and looks nice. I have a really silly play food set that came with a stovetop (small, but the knobs turn!), a pink and purple propane tank, a can of "barracuda" (seriously), and a can of "barracuda hash" which included barracuda, ham and eggs, chicken, turkey, potpie, and more eggs. But the logo has spam and a hotdog, and the front of it has beans, turkey, fish, sausage, and lots of weird meat. But it says "Eatable, 100% dainty, Present!, Daintiness, Dainty". Just wanted to let you know.So, bottom line is, dollar store play food is much better than you think it is. It comes with lots of things that the expensive companies would never have dreamed of</review_text>
It seems like a nice complete set of playfood, except that the boxes are really flimsy cardboard, and I've thrown most of them out already.  It doesn't take much to crush them.  There are much nicer sets out there, and there are separate pieces sold on ebay, that are probably used but will stand the test of your kids much better.  Not worth the money</review_text>
My 2 1/2 yr old son actually loves this product but he loves to take it apart as well.  We tighten the little colored pegs and a few weeks later he's taking them off again.  So far he's brought me pretty much everything that can come off including bolts with small washers.  Thank goodness he's past the stage of sticking everything in his mouth.  Also like everyone else we've had the same problem with the chalk board scratching just from writing on it with chalk.  I've always liked the Melissa and Doug products we've purchased but I wouldn't reccomend this easel at all</review_text>
I purchased this coffee maker for my 3 yr. old son who loves to role play with the real coffee maker we have.  He was very excited about having his "own" coffee maker, however after only a few days it quit working.  The lights and sound still work but the water won't run anymore, he was very disappointed as this was his favorite part of the toy.  He still enjoys playing with the coffee maker so I will probably not return it because I think it would just break again and he has already accepted the fact that the water doesn't work!</review_text>
My mom says that coffee is bad for you and it makes your teeth yellow. Why would you want to teach your kid to drink coffee at the age of 3</review_text>
I ordered 6 supreme moo mixers. They did arrive before Christmas. I received 6 standard moo mixers that should have been priced lower. I notified the company of the error and didn't receive a response. Very disappointed. Shame on them. I'm a victum of bait and switch....</review_text>
When i first got it i was sooo excited! But when i opened it, it had no instructions. even the 10 things to do with it didnt explain how to work everything. sure it was fun at first but then i realized, "how am i supposed to do anyhting?" the semi worst part was the stuff stunk. i got really nauseous when i got a wift of it. now i can usually handle smells but this was the worst! I got dizzy and almost through up! I wish i could have soaked everything in like bleach or sumthin just to get rid of the stench! I had to clean it too! i kept pointing my nose in the other direction and walking away for fresh air! I would not personally reccomend this. i ahve not been able to REALLY use it!! I dont no if directions was supposed to come w/ it or what but i can tell you that i was NOT pleased!</review_text>
Our boy doll arrived without a nose!  Fisher Price will NOT give us a new doll to replace the broken doll. Don't waste your money!!!!!</review_text>
I was rather disappointed with both Doll TV and the item.  The coin looks like it was made of cheap plastic.  I have toddler toys made of the same material.  The packaging is also very cheap and childish for a limited edition collectible.I was certainly expecting a lot more for a limited edition replica which costs $25.00.When I contaced Doll TV to discuss the item, I was told that this was "an exact prop replica of the coin necklace worn in the movie" and that they would refund my shipping costs if I removed my comments.  I didn't even pay for shipping!</review_text>
There is no magic in this wand. What appeared to be a thin wooden Malfoy's Wand, turned out to be a poor replica made of plastic.  My son was very disappointed.  He used his own hard earned money to purchase this item</review_text>
This is a very cheaply made reproduction of Malfoy's wand.  Whether you buy it or not probably depends on who it's for.  It would be great for a very small kid who will lose or break it, as it's cheap and made of plastic.  However for anyone else who craes about detail and feel, you might as well be waving around a wooden dowel</review_text>
I got this puzzle for my three children (age 5, 4, and 2) and within a day my 2 year old had chewed off enough of the little black rubber pieces that the toy no longer worked.  It requires two of them for the vehicles to make sounds, so removing one means it doesn't work.  The pieces are small enough that I wasn't very worried about choking, but why buy a toy which makes you worry?  We were really disappointed.</review_text>
I am now the laughing stock of my friends, why because I payed money for the lamest excuse of a 8 bit console tv plug and play ever.  My atari plug and play has better graphics and feel than this.  There are bars that have the projected GTEE screen that makes the game all most real I feel my little tv had to much resolution for this toy making it feel not so real in fact in two words "it sucks".</review_text>
The batmobile itself is nice and stylish for a boy who adores batman. But this same boy gets extremely frustrated trying to shoot the coin shaped projectile that it comes with. You have to insert it "just-so" to get it to shoot when you press the button and my son doesn't always do it, then I have to get a butter knife and pry it out so I can put it in for him. For 10 dollars it's worth it, so long as your child doesn't absolutely want a shooting batmobile.PS. My sister bought the same one for her son this Christmas and is having the same problem, so I do not think it is unique to mine</review_text>
I don't know if we got some old box left over, or what.Magnets are so weak, that kids can't make anything vertical.They just collapse, and slide.If I knew of course I wouldn't have purchased.I got rid of the box, so I couldn't even return it.OVER PRICED BIG TIME!!</review_text>
This product reminds me of thick slightly mushy sand that you would play with at the beach except it comes in colors.  Playdough is much easier to work with if you want to build items/objects/shapes.  My daughter will play with playdough for hours but with this product, she lost interest after 10 minutes</review_text>
My son kept seeing the commercials for this doll and he wanted it so badly.  Talked about it for a month so we got it for him.  He was super excited when he got and and the thing didn't work.  It just randomly gives clues that confused my son the point of tears. He was so confused it would tell him that he was close to it, then say he was no where near it.  Then when he was standing next to it, it said he was no where near it. He was so disappointed.  He thought the toy would be able to play hide n seek with him.  We followed the directs and helped him play with it.  He's 4. ( He wasn't running around like crazy like another person mentioned was why it doesn't work for some kids.) I think this is a terrible toy and Hayley's now in the trash.  She's too cheap and junky looking to even save for my daughter as a regular doll to play with</review_text>
Not only did this phone not work, but the screen was really quite tiring on my eyes. The only ringtone that it had was a sound like beads being shaken up. The flashing light was distracting, and its features were extraordinarily limited! The camera option didn't work at all, and where the heck was the texting??? My parents bought this phone for me for my birthday, and it really made me mad!! I can see that this might be a good starter phone, but you can only get 0 calls froim it, and really limited reception in the mountains. Switch to a Razr as soon as possible</review_text>
My daughter just about flipped when she received this toy as a birthday gift!  So immediately after the party, my husband went aboutputting it together.  My five year old played with this for all of about 30 seconds before a piece came off.  We've had it for about two weeks now, and EVERY time you touch this thing, some peice comes off.  No one plays with it.  It's just too much of a hassle to keep together.   My advice - but something else</review_text>
My daughter really wanted the Cloud Kingdom for Christmas.  As soon as I saw the quality of it, I should have returned it but I knew it would break her heart.  It takes up a lot of room and does not fold for storage like most Barbie houses.  My daughter is very frustrated with it because the pieces do not stay together, so she hardly plays with it.  This toy is definately not worth the money.  I wish had read the reviews on this toy so could have bought her something that she could actually enjoy</review_text>
Bought this for daughter for Christmas, and when I opened the box and saw the cardboard backing, debated on returning it. But they love the Pegasus Barbies, so figured okay, let's try it out! Is really beautiful when all put together, and my daughter LOVES it! But, that stupid cardboard backing. Nope, no way does it stay on at all. Am going to tape it to the wall behind the playset, and it will be fine. Right now is just standing up behind the set. Really, couldn't they have made a plastic piece with a big sticker with clouds/pegasus horses on it that attached to the back?When assembled, the whole thing will fall apart if you literally move it a couple inches.  My 3-year old daughter understands this, not to move it, and so far she has been fine with it. I showed her myself moving it and it falling apart, and said see, don't move it, okay!?But when it comes apart, is very easy to pop the sections back together - which in my house, the kids play with toys for a while, and then I like to put things away in the closet for a bit - which this I can easily break down some of it to store, and then in seconds have it snapped back together again to play with.Yes, durability-wise is a piece of junk - but a beautiful piece of junk, and is worth it if your child loves the Pegasus Barbies</review_text>
This was very cheaply made.  I was disappointed in it's quality.  Also, it comes apart constantly.  All my daughter has to do is barely touch it and it comes all apart.  I am going to try to glue the pieces in place so she can at least play with it.  We have many Barbie toys and this is by far the worst I have ever purchased.  Not to mention that is was expensive!  I expected much, much better quality from a Barbie product</review_text>
I can't believe that they actually put the word 3-D on the box of this thing. How dare they advertise this as a fun and usefull learning experience. I wish I had read the reviews before I bought it. There is absolutely NO 3D value to this at all. They should have just made it plain 2D and then it would have been cool</review_text>
The slides are awful and repetitive.My son had to keep asking me what they were pictures of...and I couldn't even answer him.I think the only thing he liked was when I turned the unit on without any slides and the light projected onto the ceiling.He thought that looked more like a moon that the acual slide did.Huge disappointment!!!And the base of the unit is worthless</review_text>
First I would like to say that when I purchased this item it was advertised as the "Hobby" addition.  When I received it I didn't think it was the hobby set so I called amazon, the operator said she did not know about this product and provided me with the phone number to who sold it to me.  I called that number 3 times and left a message each time to please call me and I have yet to receive a phone call back.. When I gave this item to my husband for Christmas he confirmed my thought that it was not the "Hobby" addition.  I was not only upset that I did not get what I was looking for but that no one had returned my call</review_text>
Don't be deceived by the box: Dread Pirate LOOKS like a really cool game with exceptionally made components, but it is DREADfully boring to play. The game is slow, tedious, and completely luck based, and simply no fun to play. You have been warned</review_text>
Most of the other reviews for this toy are correct. when it works my kids love it. and it is pretty cool when it works. but it doesn't work very well very often. you need to find just the right car and everything needs to line up exactly. and even then the car crashes a lot. we have found one car (out of about 200) that works somewhat well. but even with this car the success rate is about 1 in 15. so, read the reviews and make your own judgements. personally, i'm glad this was a gift and i did not spend any money on it. my kids will still play with and enjoy it, but not as much as they would if it worked better</review_text>
No wonder they are selling a 30 dollar toy for 5 bucks, it does not work and the quality is sub par.  I have three boys so we get alot of hotwheels toys and this one is the worst I have seen.  Do not take if it was free.  Garbarge and disappointment await.  I gave one star because you have to, but I would give negitive stars if I could</review_text>
I purchased Crazy Croc even after reading all the bad reviews, but my son really wanted it so I bought it for him for Christmas anyway.  It was the worst gift i've ever bought....please don't even waste your money....trust me, check the reviews first, now that's worth it...</review_text>
Leave this one "on the shelf"!! A "Hotwheels" product which doesn't come with "wheels"!????!!!  Who would have thought at $25.00 it doesn't come with a car and then they have the nerve to make it not work with other Hotwheels cars!! This is a very annoying junk toy which was such a disappointment to my son Christmas morning.  I would not have been so disatisfied had I shopped on Amazon and got it for the price being offered now--$5.00!!</review_text>
Ho Ho Ho!!My 6 year old has been asking for this toy for about 6 months now and today he finally got it. He's had it for about 5 hours now and is already tired of it. We've tried no less that 20 different cars and have yet been able to get it to work. The only thing it seems to do consistently is play that obnoxious sound over and over again (if you know how to turn the sound off, let me know. I'm ready to remove the batteries or clip the speaker wire).Do not buy this toy. You'll be very disappointed in it.</review_text>
Was a lot smaller than I expected. My daughter had to find a small doll to use that would fit. Because she couldn't use her best baby doll that she loves to play with she lost interest real quick</review_text>
The toy is a lure to a social networking website for little kids.  They play games against "friends", who are strangers on the web.  They "chat", but only with preapproved messages.  There is always a reason to come back to the website tomorrow and play some more.I don't think teaching little kids to keep coming back to a website is particularly healthy.  I REALLY don't think teaching them to interact with strangers on the internet is a good lesson, no matter how sanitized the interactions might be on the Webkinz site.</review_text>
My one year old and I love these blocks.  They are light, soft and provide endless opportunity for imagination.  However, they are extremely expensive and of inferior quality construction.  When we opened the box, we found  that several of the blocks were not cut along a straight edge making them  difficult to stack.  Also, several of the identical shape blocks were not  exactly the same size leading to stacking problems.  One of the blocks was  peeling in one corner.  These blocks are such a great idea I find it hard  to believe no other companies are making them</review_text>
This is a piece of garbage. The balls deflate after a couple hours. The rim is so frail it won't hold up to much. My friend came over and yelled slam dunk threateningly at my hoop at which point I got in between them and the hoop and said this hoop was not for slam dunking. They correctly pointed out that it says "Slam Dunk Challenge" right on the back board. Don't do it - it will break. When I turned it on it kept score wrong and gave points for misses. So that function is worthless. The only reason I gave it two stars is that it looks kind of cool but will have to find a nerf ball.</review_text>
We just bought this for our 3 year old.I do not at all understand why it is labled for 5 and over!!Cute game idea-But this was not well put together.First I about died when I saw the super cheap, barely cardboard gameboard!!!!!!! It is a VERY small board, set up like a 4 piece puzzle, that I predict will barely stay together after a few plays.the jewelery, subpar.  the crown and rings are OK, the rest very cheap and plain.  But is serves it purpose just fine :).I give this low marks for educational and durablity.BUT the jewlery box and spinner are a nice & durable!! If they put the same effort into the WHOLE game it may be worth buying.My daughter DID enjoy dressing up and playing a game together so that salvaged a star for the game.</review_text>
i got my any farm last year happily i opened it....and took EVERY thing out in one load.i filled out the form and got my ants i decided to slowly put them in...outside!well 15 of my anties escaped and 2 bit me!!!after a good fight with them i got them in and brought them in.my finger was burning.but, the next day i woke up and ALL my ants had died that night.i was soo mad i threw everything away!*sings and skips off</review_text>
This puzzle (also known as Rubik's Revenge) is good fun - and because it has another layer of movement, it is much more likely to fall apart than the 3x3x3 cube. However, the puzzle of reassembly is also quite fun - and requires no force! A clue to reassembly - make sure that the last two pieces are the same colour edge pieces - and they will (very gently) snap into place.  A second clue: only the centre pieces (four flats pieces on each side) fit into the grooves of the ball - be gentle, and your cube will be as good as new. Start with the four centre pieces of one colour at the bottom - and build up the cube layer by layer. Remember! No force</review_text>
It's a pretty good toy but most people get sick of them as they get frustrated and can't do every side the same colour on each side. If you're ready for frustration then this cube is for you. If you are buyin it then have fun</review_text>
I "played" with this at a specialty toy store and was pretty disappointed with it. I thought I wanted this for my son after seeing it online but I'm so glad we got to try it at a store first. My toddler showed almost no interest in it. It looked hard to use and not at all fun. However, it looked like it was well made of good wood and with good stains/paint and finishes.We've had more fun with a plastic food container that I cut a square shape on the lid and my son fills it up with his wooden ABC blocks. BTW, you can  do the same using matchbox cars, Peek-A-Blocks, etc. Just use a different plastic food container (yogurt, sour cream, powdered drinks, etc.) for each shape.</review_text>
I am not too happy with this item.  It has a handle, yet is heavy enough to hurt if a toddler drops it on their foot.  It is difficult to reach inside to get the shapes out.  And the vertical placement of the holes is difficult to use.  Other than that, it is attractive looking and constructed well</review_text>
My son loved this tent.  He fit perfectly in it and it fits inside his crib so he can sleep in his tent.  My only beef with it is that somehow he's bent the frame of it so now it doesn't sit right on the floor.  Actually it doesn't sit on the floor at all because of where it's bent.  The tent would be better made if there were a floor to it and some support (similar to what keeps the top portion rigid) at the base of it to keep the "legs" (there aren't any but that's the best way to describe them) apart.  The tent would also be better constructed if it didn't have one continuous wire for the frame on each side.  If the wire gets bent there's no getting it back into its original shape, unless you take out the stitching (around the WHOLE tent frame) and repair it then restitch it, but who has that kind of time?  Overall it's a fun toy for a little one but not a well thought out build.  I'm glad we got it as a gift and it wasn't something we spent our money on</review_text>
The fine print on the box tells you this is a "multi-terrain" vehicle, instead of an "all terrain" vehicle, this is because while they advertise it to go through sand, and grass, and mud, what they actually mean is that it will go through dry sand, such as you would find in a desert, dry grass, such as you would find on the african savannah, and dry mud, such as you would find in their fertile imagination.  Mine has shorted out and stopped working just going through dewey grass.</review_text>
My son LOVES to "drive" cars. I saw this and thought he would love it. It is totally unrealistic, doesnt make much noise (which for some parents that would be a +, but in this case its not) and it is not entertaining at all. Paid entirely tooooo much money for something that he will not play with at all. I have tried letting some of my friends children play with it, and they dont seem to enjoy it either.</review_text>
Purchased this item for traveling. Our son doesn't travel well. So we purchased this item for him and it doesn't strap on to the car seat like the picture shows. The straps are material and velcro on the ends. How do you attach these straps? So, now we just let him play with it being free. It doesn't attach</review_text>
I am so glad we tested this product ahead of time. As a rule we test all battery opperated gifts before we wrap them, these walkie-talkies worked for ab out 10 'feet'... yes I said feet. We gave them to my 2 year old grandson to play with instead of his big brother who got a set of Midlands. Don't waste your money on these..</review_text>
I wish I'd read the reviews before buying this product!  I would have saved us money and aggravation.  I bought these for my son's Christmas present this year.  He was really excited about playing with them with his sister.  The problem is, we haven't been able to find one single spot -- inside or out -- where we can get reception on both units!  Even when you can pick up one person on the handset, the sound is so staticky and crackly, that you can barely make out what the person is saying.  What's the point?  My kids got so frustrated in the first couple of days, that they dumped them in the toybox and haven't played with them since.  What an incredible waste of money and such a let down for the kids on Christmas. It's pretty rotten that National Geographic can conscience putting this piece of junk on the market.  Don't make my mistake.  Heed these reviews! This is a must-avoid product</review_text>
We were very unhappy with this toy. The speakers were distored and the music sounded awfu</review_text>
My daughter got this for Christmas this year and almost immediately pulled off the top half of the Greg character on the keyboard.  In their defense, none of the other characters have come off so we will try to return this in case it was an isolated incident.  Other than that, she seems to like it.  She also received the accordian and LOVES it so I would recommend that over the keyboard</review_text>
This tractor is advertised as a great back yard toy but is geared to high for younger children.  My son, who is almost 4 is a very stong bicycle pedaler but he can not make this tractor move across the lawn.  It would be great if you have a lot a pavement to ride it on, but if you planning on them ridding it through the back yard, forget it.  This is an on pavement toy only</review_text>
Got a dud.  Lights flash (constantly) but not a peep out of it.  Has an email address, wrote for suggestions twice, also no response.  But the mail was delivered so I can only assume they're playing dead (or playing with one that works)!  Big let down</review_text>
This was a cute product, but only lasted a day.  Perhaps my preschool boys' punches were just too much for this bag.  A patch was included, but it seems that air is leaking from the seams.  Oh well.</review_text>
This Sudoku YD-638 puzzle is very hard to use. And I think of my self as a computer geek.To make matters worse the instructions are very poor. They may make sense to someone who has used this for years, but not to a new user.Save you money to buy a different game.</review_text>
I recently purchased the deluxe version of yahtzee after enjoying the regular game for many years.  I was impressed with the gold dice and the dice cup.  Everyone else in the house not playing really loves the padded cup.  I was disappointed in the dice tray.  It is very flimsy and not properly designed.  It should have a rotator and be made of more durable material.  Also, the score pads that came with the game do not have a place on the back to tally player totals.  I felt ripped off when I discovered this obvious mistake</review_text>
This is fun and a good idea, but the quality of the stand and the plastic is very poor.  It fell apart the first time we had it up, and while you can put it back together, unless you want to be doing it every ten seconds, it isn't worth it.  The keyboard itself is fine. The microphone overpowers the keyboard music and has no volume on it, but the keyboard does.  The microphone stand is really cheap plastic and broke right away.  I would suggest buying a cheap keyboard and microphone and just using it on a table instead, or if you buy this product, don't expect to use the keyboard stand for long, but it can work without it</review_text>
Like others said the microphone stand broke very easily and the whole toy is not durable at all.  The legs and the stool do not stay together whatsoever.  My son has to sit with it on his lap to play it.  I would not recommend this toy to anyone</review_text>
I bought this for my 2-yr-old at a rummage sale. He loves it! But it's very flimsy, the microphone gives constant feedback, adn the volume repeatedly resets to a dangerously loud level. It was worth the $6 I paid, but I wouldn't recommend buying it new</review_text>
My son got this for his 4th birthday.  Moon Sand is a terrible toy--ugly and messy.  He seemed to enjoy playing with it (but no more than Play Doe), but the clean up is horrible.  The sand stuck to the treads of his shoes and was tracked throughout the house.</review_text>
My daughter received this for her 4th birthday and I must say we were terribly disappointed!  This "sand" did nothing but make a huge mess of our play room.  There was dust everywhere and nothing the kids tried to make stayed together.  UGH!  As it is "sand," when it gets on the floor, there is no way to easily pick up the pieces except with a broom or vacuum.  We put it on newspaper to contain the mess, but boy was that a mistake.  Wet newspaper and dry sand............We're going to take it back and get some good, old-fashioned Play-Doh instead</review_text>
This product kept my 5-and-3-year-olds' attention for ten minutes, tops.  It does not look like the pictures in the ads.  It usually got stuck in the molds instead of sliding out effortlessly as it would appear in the ad.  It makes a mess, gets all over the place and truly does not seem to be much fun. It got put away in the cabinet and my childen never asked for it again.  My money is better spent on modeling clay or other arts & crafts types of activities</review_text>
I did not buy this from Amazon but sought it out here so I could vent about this outrageous product (that's 'outrageous' in its traditional meaning, that it outrages me).This is two packets of colored dust, approximately the consistency of unmixed plaster.  Empty the plastic bags and the colored dust flies everywhere, mold it in your hand and it retains its shape for a few seconds before blurring and falling apart.  My wife and I repeatedly checked the packaging to see if we should add water or do something else to make this usable but apparently not.The claim on the package is that it "Molds like Dough," obviously intended to remind us of Play-doh, but Play-doh is a clay-like material that retains its shape and can, in fact, be molded.  This material -- again attempting to compare itself to Play-doh -- states that it won't dry out.  Of course not!  It's dust!  It can't dry out, there's nothing drier than dust.In case you're wondering I have no connection to Play-doh or its makers (I don't even know who does make it), I'm simply the father of a 3-year old who uses Play-doh often and hoped this product might be a workable addition to our playtime.  Wrong</review_text>
While my son enjoyed the illustrations anf fun content of the books in this set, I felt it was disappointing as a learning tool for beginning readers because it moves much too quickly.  The first book is just letters and letter sounds.  Very introductory.  The second book introduces three letter words right off with no transition at all like 2 letter blends.  That was ok to me since it was phonetic 3 letter words, but by page 2 we were already "leaping" to 4 and 5 letter words and by page 3 they were already introducing a sight word - "does" and a double consonant word - "cannot".  I thought the pace was frustrating for my son.  I was hoping/expecting a book devoted to just blends and/or 3 letter words.  Instead this program is organized by vowels with the letter a being introduced first.  I don't see that as a problem, but I was expecting more phonetic 3 letter words to start and introducing harder 4 and 5 letter words by maybe book 3 and sight words coming later, like maybe book 4.  Unfortunately, you can't see exactly what your getting until you open the box.Nonetheless, the audio is entertaining for children with music and humor thrown in and the reward stickers, poster, and ribbon are a fun way to recognize your child's achievement.  The practice game is basically just like the Word Whammer Fridge Phonics product but with cards instead of magnets</review_text>
just my opinion; but i have a hard time finding books to go with my 3yr old daughter's first leap pad.  she loves maurice sendak's where the wild things are and she loves many of the other books that go with the leap pad that is for 6mo-24mo age range.  i think they should have done a bit more research on which stories were associated with which leap pad system.  as for the pooh bear game; i agree; way too easy here; this would have been perfect for the leap pad made for younger children, and made a more challenging one for this level.  great idea; just not well put together</review_text>
Of all the First LeapPad books to buy, make this the last one on your list.  My daughter has NO interest in this one whatsoever! &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;( I have two friends who have said the same thing.</review_text>
I was really upset when I received this item. I had ordered 2 becasue I thought it was a terrific deal, but nowhere did it mention that you needed the leappad player in order to use it. I hate returning things =</review_text>
I had high hopes for this game, but played it with a friend last night and was appalled at the number of confusing questions and just plain incorrect answers.  For example, one question asks, "Which of these animals is not found exclusively in South America:  (a) chinchilla, (b) sloth, (c) guinea pig, (d) spring buck".  Ruling out zoos, my friend reasoned that since zillions of kids in the US have pet guinea pigs, the answer must be C.  Alas, no; the correct answer is "(d) spring buck" with no explanation.  Did they mean animals in their natural habitat?  We aren't sure.  The question is not clearly written.  Another question asks, "The word `berserk' is derived from:  (a) a Norse god; (b) the German for `crazy life', (c) a tropical plant".  I read this to my friend and said, "None of these is the right answer."  The word `berserk' comes from the Germanic branch of the language tree and means `bear-shirt'.  The game says the correct answer is "a Norse god.  In Norse mythology, the god `Berserker' always fought in a state of frenzy."  There is no such Norse god.  Who wrote these questions?  One of the aspects of trivia games that I enjoy is the prospect of learning something in the process of playing; this game concerns me because I do not know which answers are incorrect.  From a learning standpoint, the badly written questions and poorly researched answers make this a frustrating and intellectually dangerous game.</review_text>
I got this for my eight year old. Unfornately I read the reviews on Amazon just before he opened it, not before I bought it.  This is a great idea very poorly implemented.I am completely dissappointed, and if I had not bought it at a final clearance sale... would be bringing it back.  My son's previous method of holding a piece of paper over what he wants to copy and then taping them to a well lit window is much better and cheaper</review_text>
After waiting for 1 month to get this toy I cannot tell you HOW disappointed my 7 year old daughter was when she got it. Absolutely this thing is a WASTE of money!It is poorly designed and there is no way you can trace from it. The image is impossible to see with any amount of detail.DO NOT BUY THIS TOY! I would give it zero stars if I could</review_text>
The game of course is great fun, but the 3-D is not worth the extra cost.  The kids get distracted by the slides and ladders and don't play the game.  They fight over which direction the marble should move (and of course marbles get lost easily).  How to count the spaces is not obvious.  I would just get the good old classic game if I had it to buy over again.</review_text>
The figure was sent back for a replacement because the legs did not fit into the body, it was defective.  The same problem with the replacement and it was returned as well.</review_text>
When putting together the mobile section of this item, I was very disappointed in its flimsiness. It looks like just a few knocks will cause the screws to break from the plastic.When I turned it on I was disappointed a second time, this time by the irritating buzzing sound that the mobile makes as it rotates. It's so loud you can't hear the music, which is a shame because I'm sure my son would enjoy looking at the moving lights.The third disappointment - the buttons are VERY hit-and-miss. Sometimes the music buttons don't work (the lullaby one worked eventually once I mashed it in really hard). That I could live with, but it's fiddling with the other controls that is really irritating. Control for music off, lights on/off and rotation on/off all seem to be tied up in two buttons. If you have the music and lights going, then turn on the rotation, the music and lights will go off as the rotation comes on. Then you have to press buttons in whatever order seems logical until you get them all going the way you want them. Please bear in mind I am NOT particularly daft - I managed to figure out my TIVO remote in a day or so - but the controls for this baby's musical mobile make no sense to me. I thought at first it was supposed to be deliberately challenging in order to stimulate 'baby's natural curiosity', but after two nights it really got on my nerves, and if I can't figure it out, I don't see how my one year old is supposed to. I can only think that there is something very screwed up with the circuitry in there.I'm not dismissing this item all together. The music is lovely - not too simplified and not too electronic-sounding. The Minute Waltz is particularly nice (I've noticed my son scans for it). The lights are lovely too, and do look pretty when they're moving if you can stand the buzzing. My son has come to depend on the music to amuse himself with as he falls asleep. BUT, if you buy it, I'd recommend testing the buttons and the motorized rotator before screwing the very flimsy mobile pieces together in case you need to return it.</review_text>
This appealed to me since I would be able to use it longer than the standard mobile, but it ended up not working when we wanted it to anyways.  I liked to idea, but just doesn't work.  This mobile constantly stops working (before the 8 minutes are up)...it stops going round.  The music continues & the lights are still on, but the base stops rotating, it seems as though it always gets "stuck" and we have to push it to get "unstuck".  We've changed the battery and that doesn't seem to help as the base keeps getting stuck, I contacted Mattel to get a voucher since it's been more than 90 days since I bought this, can't return it in the store.  (It's kind of big and ugly too, didn't expect that from the picture.</review_text>
The rechargeable battery lasted for approx. 5 minutes once fully charged.  After five minutes it did not have enough power to allow the air hog to fly. I would not recommend this as a buy.</review_text>
My husband and I just bought the Family Feud 2nd Edition DVD TV Games.I have to say we both LOVED this game when it was first on (and on GSN as repeats) and I like the computer version.We played this once by ourself and a couple of times with friends and we all have found that this game was boring & as someone said they can't believe they put this out.If you are going to get this game then buy the computer version.You have5 roundsRound #1Round #2Double Money RoundTriple Money RoundFast Money RoundYou have Team A and Team B.If you get one wrong answer and you click wrong then it says go for steal.HOWEVER, you only get one X.Per Guide...IF an answer is revealed that Team A did not have written down, they press Wrong Answer button and pass the remote to Team B.Team B now has the opportunity to steal the round.So most of the game was passing the remote back and forth.IF the steal answer matches any one of the remaining answers they steal the round (even if you-Team A had that written down) and takes the money for any answer the other team has answered correctly (even if they got 4 out of 5 and both Teams say have the same answer)The game itself was simple and basic.There was no real fun to it.We tried to play it with others and they said afterwards that they found it boring and not all that fun.One person said they would have more fun watching the game itself on TV over playing this version of the game.You get two markers (red and blue) to write on the two wipe-clean score cards. The negative on this is that the markers do not write all that good on these cards even though they were meant to.Another thing is that the same game will come up more than once.We had the same question and answer come up even though we only played twice.This is the 3rd or 4th DVD game we have been given or bought.This is the only one where we disliked it so much after playing it a couple of times that we are giving it away as we will not be playing it again</review_text>
This is the first time I'm writing a review of anything on Amazon.com, but I need to warn people about this game.  It would be great except for 2 problems:1.  It skip excessively.2.  There is no way to easily skip past games that you've played.  So once you've taken out that DVD, put it back in and you'll recognize the questions -- you've answered them already!Not recommended.If I could give it negative stars, I would.  However, Amazon makes you give it at least 1</review_text>
I got this product for my daughter.  The password feature was difficult to program and the voice recognition was so precise it was almost impossible to reproduce the right voice inflection and pattern for the journal to recognize.  My daughter often could not make the journal open. After a frunstrating week or two, she stopped playing with it altogether</review_text>
The Pixar Cars characters from Mattel can be purchased from Target, Walmart or Toys R Us for around $3.50. Don't be taken in by these rip-off merchants. These are not in short supply and can be found with patience</review_text>
I couldn't wait to get this for my 18 month daughter.  Much to my disappointment, I get it and it doesn't work.  I returned it and received a replacement.  That one also didn't work.  I am in the process of returning it and won't ever buy from Amazon.com again</review_text>
If you're a fan of the evil child-killer Mr. Fred Krueger, then add this item to your collection as well. You can always trust NECA to provide with great horror movie replicas. The figure is based on his latest entry; Freddy VS Jason</review_text>
Doesn't fit well on my son's wrist. It is difficult to close, and when worn the thumb trigger only works 10% of the time. I think he's played with this once since getting it for Christmas.</review_text>
My son was excited to get this for christmas.  After we opened it and put it together it just never worked the way it was designed.  The arrows launcher never held the arrows.  As soon as you tried to load them they would fly out.  The shuriken launcer was cumbersome and difficult to use.  He pretty much gave up on it after a few days and now it's gathering dust in our closet.</review_text>
We are very disappointed in this product we purchased last summer.  We constantly have many kids and adults of all ages over to our house because of our swimming pool and I don't think we have found one person who has done more than try it once then walk away.  Also it is difficult to find the right size to hang it becasue of different sized people using it.  Not recommended</review_text>
I bought this gift for my daughter for Christmas.  It does not work at all. It sounds like a cheap transistor radio when you attempt to adjust the knobs.  I'd like my money back</review_text>
This is the first time I have been truly disappointed in something I have gotten through Amazon, much smaller than it looks in picture, if it was five dollars it would be too much, too late now to do anything for Christmas,just not worth it at all............</review_text>
the paint brushes are so stiff that they do not even catch the paint when you dip them and then they do not bend to meet the paper they poke the paper- I threw them out after one use</review_text>
This toy barely gets used in our house. It has a very low to the floor design, my 18 month old daughter has to hunch just to play with it. The sounds and characters are cute, but clunky and not very realistic. I am very dissatisfied with this purchase, not worth the investment. If you are looking for a fisher price doll house for your youngster, I would suggest checking out: Fisher Price - My First Dollhouse. It has a higher design with more realistic characters, not so clunky. I wish we would have purchased this one instead</review_text>
I just recieved a Fisher Price magazine in the mail and thought this product would be a nice Christmas gift.  I was thinking that Amazon would have a good price, but they are almost double what Fisher price is asking.  If you go to Fisher Price's website this item is only $33.00 + $7.95 shipping and handling.</review_text>
I just ordered the world of little people sweet sounds from amazon. I haven't received it yet. I paid $200.00 for it. Now I can see it's selling for $139.00. I've also seen it for $32.00. What's going on. Is there a difference in sets? I'm not sure, but I think I acted too quickly. Can anyone tell me if there is a difference in the doll houses? Did I make a big mistake</review_text>
Fisher Price is selling the same item for only $33.  $139.99 has to be a mistake</review_text>
I got the baby alive Hispanic doll for my daughter for Christmas. I opted for the Hispanic doll becuase I thought my daughter would learn a bit of the two languages as we speak French primarily in our home.I must have received a broken doll because our doll is nothing like the description. She does not speak English at all...you can press her bracelet a million times and no English. And when she does speak, her English is slurred and unintelligible. We have contacted Amazon several times and have had them decline a return. After 2 months, we are still wiating for her to eat and fall asleep. VERY DISAPPOINTING! Would not recommend at all!!! The reason that this rating received one star is because my daughter loves her death even though she does nothing</review_text>
There are lots of little pieces, and the rules are a bit complex. I played it with my nephews ages 7 and 5 and they both had a hard time staying interested for the length of the game. However they have both asked to play it since, so they must like something about it :</review_text>
I purchased bean bag toss for my four year old grandson, it was his birthday, it was absolutely no challenge - no fun and required absolutely no dexterity.   very very disappointed, if it was possible to return it I woul</review_text>
I bought this table for my almost 8 month old who is starting to pull up on things.  I thought this would be safe for her to learn to stand with because it has hand grippers along the sides of the table (just for that purpose) and is recommended for ages 6 months+.  All of the fun shapes, colors, and sounds immediately caught her attention.  She cawled over to it and when she tried to pull herself up it fell over ontop of her.  She bumped her head and cried, but fortunately, wasn't hurt.  I put a rug under it thinking maybe that would help make it more stable, but as soon as she tried to pull up again (within 5 minutes of taking it out of the box) it fell over on her again.  The top of the table is very heavy, but the legs are not very sturdy, making it topheavy and easy to topple.  Needless to say, I took it back to the store.I would not recommend this toy unless you only wanted to take the legs off and use it on the floor, or if you have a toddler who is very steady at standing on his own.  Personally, I think the recommended age should be changed for older children or this toy should be recalled and the legs redesigned.</review_text>
My 10-mo-old son showed no particular interest in this "table". I did not like it much either. Why would a 10-mo-old show any interest in table items that sing? I have left it without legs. Two minutes after I installed the legs my son nearly fell with the "table" on his face. Had to uninstall them. Not good for active infants. Also not very entertaining. Buy the one from Leapfrog but still be careful when you have installed the legs because they say that that one is higher than this (might have more balance though but I do not know for sure)</review_text>
Our 7 yr old daughter was given this last Christmas.  It is awkward to use and the motor didn't seem to have the power needed to turn the wheel when the clay was on it.  She ended up using the clay and molding it by free hand.  It now sits in the corner of her activity table and isn't used at all.</review_text>
As in my title I have mixed feelings about this toy. My children both have the original color version of the VideNow. I thought I would upgrade them to the newer version. They have a cheap feel to them and don't seem to work very well. In fact one is going back to the store next week for a trade in. There is a lock botton that freezes the bottons so you can't accidently turn off while watching. But it seems like the buttons freeze up on their own quite often. I can see why the batteries go dead quickly because if a child can't turn off the unit it just gets left on! I am very dissapointed in this. The kids really enjoyed their Color versions and I feel I shouldn't have gone to the extra expense to upgrade them. However, even with it's faults my kids still enjoy them. My kids don't watch a lot of TV and prefer the shorter pvds to the long Dvds. I prefer that too. That way I can say they can watch one show and know they won't be watching for an hour or more. If you are a parent thinking about purchassing one- keep you receipt in case you need to exchange and carefully think about how your kids will be using it. If your child is easily dissapointed by items that may not work properly this may not be the item for you</review_text>
Who cares what the commercail says. It is not an Widescreen. Man, a 3 inch screen? Great, my PSP screen is bigger than your's Tiger Electron-poop. The discs are only 30 minutes long? The discs for the PSP is an half gigabite. DO NOT BUY THIS WASTE</review_text>
Please. These things SUCK. Oh, wow! Its got a 3 inch screen!! Big deal! My portable DVD player is 10.2 inches; almost tripple the size of this! The quality is pixely and crap, and you have to buy the stupid "Video Now" Pvds. $14 for, what? 6 episodes? Oh, thats so cool, as in not really. Trust me people. Stick to portably DVD player. Yes, they are very expensive, but they will last twice as long. If you want a really good DVD player, buy the 10.2 inch Insigna Portable DVD. Yeah, its $260, but it is worth every penny. So, all in, if you are gulliable, and like blowing your money on a device that is better left in the store, buy this! But, if you are like me, stick to DVD players.</review_text>
Who would sell an r/c toy car that runs backwards continuously?  It was a big disappointment for my granddaughter.  Tyco's Lighting McQueen was greeted with glee when it was unwrapped, and found its way to the trash with the day's wrapping paper.  POS</review_text>
This game is heavily developed based on the actual movie.  If you haven't seen the movie, and/or your kid was too young to understand the plot, then they might not get the game.Most of the adventures are based on the story plot.  A lot of the adventures are a bit dumb, like McQueen bumping alphabet tires into a truck, McQueen tipping over the tractors based on counting smoke rings, McQueen herding the tractors back into the pen, McQueen driving down a long road and picking up shapes, McQueen driving down a road looking for Mack based on memory, McQueen dodging the firetruck water blast, etc.  The only adventure I liked was the forklift picking up tire numbers (odd vs. even) and installing them on the race car.Don't buy this game unless your kid is obsessed with Cars</review_text>
I bought the race cars to go on the speed and go racetrack.  After shaking the cars, they do not even go around the racetrack once!! My boys still love the cars becasue of the way they look and the noise that they make. And boy do they make alot of noise! They love to push the cars around the racetrack.  It frustrates me becasue I bought several of these shake and go racecars that do not go around the track and use alot of batteries</review_text>
I had a feeling that this toy would be trouble when I saw the delivery guy walking up to our front steps with a weird grin on his face.  Evidently, the box had been vrooming, vibrating and shrieking throughout his rounds, and he was only too glad to end his term as its temporary steward.  My two-year-old has largely lost interest in this toy; he doesn't mind the shaking and noise, but more often than not it just vrooms and then doesn't go anywhere.  My advice: buy Matchbox, or Hot Wheels...or something more reliable with volume control. This will probably be in our next load of donations...thrift shoppers beware.</review_text>
HI.everyone gues what i went to toys r us and amazon.com and i saw these hamsters. i thaught they were just too tenderly sweet for me. so i asked my mum over like abillion times. Can i get this mom no she said.2 minutes later can i get this mom no she said AGAIN.then i really started begging her that she just suddenly agreeed. now just remember don't always beg your parents cause the secret is if you ask your parents once and they say no then be really good for about a week and then they might surprise you with you'r special tenderly sweet toy. so now remember i am and always will be raiting  5 stars. so just please try to test this. boys might even like it. if you listen to me and get it you can/could still return it okay BI FRIENDS!!!!!!!!!!you really did me a fauvor</review_text>
...doesn't make it a great toy. A lesson learned the hard way. This toy is unbelievably loud. So loud, my husband and I can't stand to be in the same room with our son when he's dancing (stomping) on it. So ridiculously loud, my son can't play with this toy inside at all anymore. Every time he moves, the songs start over. Grates on your nerves after the 5th or 6th stomp. What a disappointing toy. We've had it out of the box three or four times to play with. It is now hidden in the deepest darkest part of the hall closet until we make our next round of donations to Good Will. Save your money for one of the other good dance mat toys on the market. This one's a stinker</review_text>
This toy is the most stupidest thing i have ever had. The only reason why i gave it a one is because you couldn't give it a zero. First of all this thing beeps every five seconds. I swear even when im sleeping this thing beeps. It wsn't always like that when i got it i would bring it to school then everyone started getting one even kindergarners had one then the princble banned them because one third grader lost hers. During class kids would ask me do you want to connect? Im just saying this is a toy for little ones. This toy can also get repetative i mean its a baby then it gets a tooth ache toddler teen adult old person. So parents if your thining about buying this toy for your children dont because in about a month and a half they would probably stop using it. So dont buy it</review_text>
I couldn't agree more about this product. It's appalling how badly made it is. The concept is very cute - a toolbox that unfolds into bridges and roads for the small die-cast vehicles. My 2.5 year-old has a hard enough time dealing with frustration without this toy adding to it! The bridge on the right doesn't properly attach or stay up and the road pieces do not attach properly. It's also a battle to get the tool box to connect together. My son always wants to play with it, but I can't cope with his cries of frustration when it all falls apart. I think this toy will have to mysteriously "disappear" one night while he is sleeping. They should withdraw this rubbish from the market and refund us all our money!</review_text>
This product is awful, it won't stay together and is very frustrating to both myself and my three year old. What a disappointment.</review_text>
This is the best deck ever! But if you are looking for armed dragon LV7 go to soul of the deulist booster packs because this doesn't have it. But I love Red Eyes Darkness Dragon</review_text>
I absolutely love this deck.  I bought this along with "Zombie Madness" and the "Warrior's Triumph" structure decks.  They all rock,  but this is my favorite.  And for the guy who gave the Winged Dragon Of Ra tip, on the bottom of the card it says "THIS CARD CANNOT BE USED IN A DUEL". So even if you happen to get one [which costs a LOT] you can't officially use it. Overall,  this deck is very cool.  I love Red Eyes Darkness dragon!P.S. For best results,  buy the Yu-Gi-Oh! deluxe pack for 20$.  It comes with "Dragon's Roar" and "Zombie Madness" plus two rare cards ["Rope Of Life" and "Armed Dragon LV7"]. Here's what they do:Rope Of LifePGD-105-Ultra RareTrap Card:This card can only be activated by discarding your entire hand when 1 of your own monsters is sent to the Graveyard as a result of battle. Special Summon the monster just sent to the Graveyard in face-up Attack or Defense Position, and increase its ATK by 800 points."Armed Dragon LV7"This card cannot be Normal Summoned or Set. This card cannot be Special Summoned except by the effect of "Armed Dragon LV5". Send 1 monster card from your hand to the Graveyard to destroy all face-up monsters on your opponent's side of the field with an ATK equal to or less than the ATK of the sent monster.Add this the deck for an amazing combo!  Start off by setting a Masked Dragon card in defense mode.  When your opponent destroys it,  use its effect to summon "Armed Dragon LV3".  During your Standby Phase,  Send it to the graveyard to Special Summon "Armed Dragon LV5".  Then use it to attack your opponent's monster which is most likely destroyed.  Then when you end your turn use its effect to special summon "Armed Dragon LV7" from your hand OR deck!  You now have a 2800 atk points on the field!  Sweet!  And its effect is soooooooooo cool. I put the "Rope Of Life" card in my "Warrior's Triumph" structure deck.  It helps out a lot! I hope you will make the right choice in buting this deck or the more preferable deluxe pack.  Yu-Gi-Oh! Your Move</review_text>
I purchased this item yesterday, also set it up as shown. There is a little plastic gray piece that sticks up and doesnt let the cars go through. We have yet also to get ONE car through. A huge disappointment to my son who was excited about it. But I called Mattel and they gave me a gift card for the amount i purchased it for. Great customer service. I think this product should be recalled because the cars do shoot back at you at an alarming speed. Hit my son in the head.</review_text>
We bought this item for our son's birthday. We assembled it exactly as shown in the directions.  The cars do not launch properly into the loop - we have yet to have one car make it through the entire track. Also, when you place cars to "launch" and "crash" they shoot clear across the room. One knocked our daughter in the chest!Not worth what we spent on the item and we are finding ourselves increasingly dissappointed with Hot Wheels items.</review_text>
I have been searching for the perfect handheld sudoku game and this is not it.  I found it very difficult to see the numbers without a backlight even with my reading glasses.  Also I would perfer a stylus pen instead of having to scroll around the screen to enter a number.  I do like the idea of being able to use a dry erase pen to mark off numbers, but I couldn't even see those.  Still searching</review_text>
We gave this toy to our 4 year old son.  That was 1 1/2 years ago.  It worked at first, but the balls did not pop up high enough for him to hit.  After about 1 month, the balls did not pop up at all.  Little Tikes replaced it with a completely new toy.  Again, it worked for a few months, but now it does not work.  The beeps sound (a nice feature), but nothing happens.  My son has given up on the automatic feature and will sometimes use it as a t-ball stand.  Most of the balls are lost.  Thank goodness I only paid $10 for this on sale - but not even worth that much</review_text>
Purchased five of these sets thinking they would be fun stocking stuffers.  Wanting to check out what I purchased, I opened one of the five.   The geodes are tiny (not as pictured).  It was like breaking open dirt-clods... that have a small empty space inside... but not crystals.  Maybe it was a "dud" box, but will probably be returning the other four.</review_text>
Bought at Toys r Us for 8 year old. Had fun puttingit together, and like I said it Looks cool.However, you barely touch it while playing with it,and it falls apart. Even frustrating for a kid.I would expect better quality for $40.Probably will return</review_text>
Here in America, Lindsay Lohan is what many call a conspiracy. Lindsay Lohan is NOT  a "beloved collector's item". She's a bulimic spoiled brat.She's also, weird. MyScene has made the biggest marketing mistake of their life. Lindsay Lohan went from cute child star to bulimic brat in a milisecond. She thinks she can sing, and she can't. She thinks she can do a romantic comedy, and she can't. (Just My Luck, was not "lucky")I bet not even a million bought this doll from a cheap knock-off of the Barbie line.You'd only buy your child this doll if you want them to idolize a young woman who has thrown her life away</review_text>
Okay, the concept of this game cube is great, and believe me: you will spend many hours trying to solve this puzzle.Now on to the reality...I first tried this brain buster in the eighties when it came out. Upon its first release, the stickers stayed on, the plastic squares didn't break off, and it just seemed like a higher quality piece. I beleive the plastic might have been heavier.But now, twenty years later, the stickers peal off, the squares pop out. JUNK, JUNK, JUNK!If this was made in the USA it would now cost more than it does being manufactured over seas, however ...it wouldn't be junk.You get what you pay for.Stephen John BecciaAuthor of The Treelanders</review_text>
I had purchased two of these Smack and Yack cars for my grandson.  While wrapping them the night before I planned to give the gift, I discovered that they did not make noise as advertised.  If I had looked at them earlier, I would have returned them for a refund.  It's no fun to have grandchildren that are disappointed</review_text>
I asked my sister to buy this bike for my daughter for xmas last year - she decided to buy another one for my nephew also since he is the same age as my daughter (2 yrs old at the time). She bought the two bikes at the same time, same model, same color, same store. My daughter, who is far more coordinated then my nephew, tips over very easy, my nephew seems to do fine. My daughter is taller and that may be where the difference lies. Perhaps the height of the child using the trike is what is causing the trike to tip easily. Not sure - but I know I regret that she ever got the bike -it was a total waste of money</review_text>
I bought two of these trikes for my 19 month old twin sons.  Within the first 10 minutes of use, they both tipped over numerous times.  They tipped over when they were trying to use the pedals and also when they were just using their feet on the floor. Definitely not a sturdy trike.  My husband and I were very disappointed and returned them immediately.In reading other reviews, I see that our experience with these trikes is not unique</review_text>
This bike may be cute, but it tips over too easily.  My daughter was on it for 10 minutes and she tipped over several times, then would not go on it. I returned it to the store, after reading on this site that it is obviously a common problem with this bike.</review_text>
I have a BIG Dora fan in my house & this was one of her first Dora dolls (last year). She played with it for the first day or two...its loud, very mechanical, not very appealing. The toy saw a rebirth in use when it was discovered that it she could make Dora dance & terrorize the puppy. The doll only does one dance, regardless of what skirt she has on now. From reading other reviews, if I pushed & held it while she was wearing it she might ballet, but not worth the hassle! Since then, my Dora lover has received various other Dora dolls, so we have a collection that sings, dances, speaks various languages, and the ONLY one she plays with regularly is the Dress Up Adventure Dora - she's more posable, does something other than sing, and you can change her outfits. Perfect for my almost 5 year old</review_text>
Loud annoying and entertaining for only a day.  I got this doll because my 3 and 5 year olds, both "had to have it".  They watched it dance for about 30 minutes and that was the extent of the play with this doll.  It isn't a doll that they can use imagination with, snuggle with, or any other type of constructive play.  A Dora video would have been a better choice.  At least their attention would have been captured for the 30 minutes and then they would have watched it again later.  In order to get the skirt to stay on (to change the song she danced to) I had to push VERY hard.  My kids couldn't do it on their own</review_text>
The NATURE'S FIRE VOLCANO also used to be sold at the Discovery Channel Stores. My kid loved it while it worked. Lasted about a month. All of the reviews stated the same on their site. Lasts from 1 to 3 months. Wish I had checked it before we bought it. Save your money</review_text>
I wouldn't waste my time buying anything from this company. We purchased the Train table for a Christmas gift and while assembling it on Christmas eve there were quality issues. Several drilled holes were not drilled in the proper position and the table surface had several deep scratches. I called and e-mailed the company several times to try and obtain replacement parts and never got a response. Most companies want you to contact them when you need replacement parts rather than returning it to the store, but not KidKraft</review_text>
My daughter loves the sticker maker but she used the cartridge in one day and still has plenty of stickers left to make and I can not find the refills anywhere.  They need to make the refills for these types of toys easier to get.  I am to hesitant to buy the bead maker now because of that and I know my daughter would like it but It's a waste if it's a one time use and upsets my daughter</review_text>
My daughter bought this with birthday money and it jammed on the first day she played with it. We can't get the sticker roll out and she is very disappointed. Don't bother with this toy. Buy a better one made for scrapbooking. The look on my daughter's face when this broke was heart-breaking</review_text>
I bought this toy for my five year old daughter.  Her three year old sister and her loved to play with it for about thirty seconds.  My five year old finally asked if it could go away because she was tired of putting it back together.  Her ponies now live in the strawberry shortcake house with her....</review_text>
The stable falls apart and pieces are tiny. Big waste of money - Very frustrating. I'm considering supergluing it together - this shouldn't have been a problem</review_text>
The cursor is so minute it is difficult to see it.Makes the game unplayable in most suitable environments.Design issue could be fixed easily</review_text>
This Suduko handheld game was not user friendly. I returned it for a full refund</review_text>
This product is terrible. The very essence of Su Doku is logic & reasoning. This product leaves everything to guesswork. I returned it, ate the postage, & was happy to be rid of it! I then downloaded shareware from the Palm Store to my Palm Pilot for $10. Couldn't be happier</review_text>
My kids were getting very frustrated with the connections of masts and hulls.  They are very poorly designed and "pressure" fit to a point where they easily pop off. Both boats - the Royal Dutchman and Black Pearl - have poor fitting. Compared to lego, the ability for parts to connect and stay connected is extremely poor.I plan to write a letter to Mega Blocks about this quality issue</review_text>
I could get the aircraft to pickup and eventually hover but there is no such thing as getting that thing to go in the direction you want it to. I put the aluminum weights on the nose to get it to move forward that way all I had to do was turn it in the direction I wanted it to go. It is very difficult and is no way as easy as it looks on TV. And I've practiced a lot</review_text>
I purchased the Havoc Heli for my dad. He saw an ad for it on TV and wanted one, so I was excited that Amazon.com had it for a lower cost and free shipping. However, that was as far as the "good" went. My dad was disappointed to find out that not only could the Havoc Heli not pick up and fly with the accessories that came with it, but it had a difficult time flying without any "extra weight". This helicopter has no risk of creating any havoc. But, it does make a cute little paperweight.</review_text>
The McQueen car went first. Motor sounds worked but no voice and rear wheel activation. This, after about two weeks of play.Then the King car stopped working. Same thing, no voice or rear wheel activation. The cars that came with the Shake 'N Go race track are holding up but go through the batterys. The cars have a tough plastic shell and alot of thought has gone into the details. One gets the impression of a quality toy when handeling it and they look good just sitting still. But, that is not what we get them for.</review_text>
I feel like an idiot, maybe I didn't have all the parts or something but I tried and my husband tried and my neice tried and my friend tried and my stepson tried and NONE of us could figure out how to get this thing together.Since there were no instructions, that helped alot.There was a picture but the hoops that went over secured to nothing and fell on the kid, making it utterly useless.  Though there were little things that appeared to attach to something, they taunted us and we tried and tried to attach this here and that there and maybe that will work...it was ridiculous.We haven't had the issue with any other baby thing...not car seats, not the red wagon, not the baby gates, not the crib or the cradle...but this thing after several attempts we just took the hangdowns off and she played with those until the batteries died.  We sold it at a garage sale for a buck and felt like glad for it to be out of our lives and out of our closet</review_text>
This item is cheap and I don't mean the price.  It will not stay together.  The plastic frames do not attach well to the mat because it is held with velcro that keeps coming undone.  The arched bars are not bent enough causing one side to pop up off the floor.  I tried bending them myself, but they always return to their original shape.  Pay the extra money and get a better mat</review_text>
We just put the stupid thing together and put the batteries in and nothing worked.  The light would go on and off, but there were no sounds at all.  We made sure we had everything plugged in correctly, but it still wouldn't work.  After all the time of putting it together what a disappointment.  I will be calling Fisher Price tomorrow and seeing if they have any suggests and/or taking it back to Toyrus.</review_text>
We bought this for our granddaughter's 2nd birthday 03/16/07 and had the item delivered to our house a month ahead of time. We took the items to their house to assemble it.We founds missing parts and 2 side pieces were the same, when they should have been"a" and "D".  WE got 2 "D"  pieces.  Part "Q" was also missing</review_text>
At first the case seemed like a good idea, but after the third use the zipper stopped working. Because the case does not stay open on its own, there is a tendency to push the case open and force the zipper backward and apart. After fixing it a couple of times, it is now permanently broken. Bad design. Perhaps Velcro would have been better here.</review_text>
This is a very cute and realistic set.  The measurements are all accurate.  The whisk is very DANGEROUS though.  It is metal.  One of the "things" came out of the handle and stuck out like a weapon.  One of the kids could have been severely injured had I not found it and thrown it away.  If you buy this item, make sure get rid of the whisk!</review_text>
We were unfortunately dissappointed with our purchase. We loved that it showed rubber stoppers for saftey and for our hard wood floors ~ they didn't come with it. Further, Melissa and Doug puzzles don't fit.</review_text>
I purchased this for my daughters 2nd birthday. Withing the first 5 minutes the back of the chair part for the high chair had broken off and would not stay on. The first time she went to take it in the bath Pooh's arm came off and will not go back on. I am just really disappointed that it wasn't anything as great as I thought it would be. I saw the it in the store and was excited that my daughter would love it, but sadly it was very depressing for both of us</review_text>
I bought this kit solely for the prism to show my kids how the light split into a rainbow.  The prism is such poor quality plastic, that the light doesn't even go through it correctly.  I could have made a better prism in my oven with plastic pellets and a form.  The sides look like a cake top that fell, causing the light to not go through it correctly.  The rest of the kit sucks too.  I put batteries in the flashlight and the plastic of the flashlight cracked and crumbled in my hand!  The cardboard cutouts are ok... if you want to pay lots of bucks for cardboard cutouts and the included soda straw.</review_text>
This stuff is greasy and hard to wipe off tables and fingers.  It's good for older kids who can keep their fingers on the paper but not good for little ones who smush their fingers into the wax and get it all under their finger nails on the table, chairs and walls.</review_text>
Although Crayola is a wonderful brand, I was not impressed with their Color Wonder fingerpaints.  The time between when my children put it on the paper and the time it actually appears is too long for them, and they get frustrated.  It is very hard to keep their attention long enough to make an entire picture.  Also, it is not "mess free."  The paints are very greasy and you end up cleaning it off of everything they touch (other than paper) anyways.  I did not like how mushy the paint was...I am still finding globs of it everywhere</review_text>
Looks great, but NOT worth the money.   My son begged for this toy - and it was a big dud.  Almost impossible to fly - I think once out of 50 tries were we successful.   Made out of flimsy material, it chipped and scraped right away.Do NOT buy this toy!!!!!</review_text>
I was very unhappy with this product because the paint is chipping off the wood side-boards which is very dangerous for kids.  I was wondering if there was it possible for me to get new side boards for my grandson's wagon which I purchased for his 2nd birthday.  He is unable to play with the wagon because of the paint chipping off</review_text>
This product arrived with none of the hardware needed to assemble. The table itself looked as if was used or returned for being substandard. All in all, not a good experience. I will not purchase anything from this seller agai</review_text>
After reading the reviews on this table we thought we would gamble. We were very disappointed.  The packaging arrived torn and open in several places. Only a few screws came with the table, not that this made much difference as there were table parts missing too. The parts that did arrive were chipped practically in every corner and the paint rubbed off. Amazon were efficient in having the item picked up for return and refund</review_text>
I read all the negative reviews on this table and decided to go ahead and order hoping I would get lucky and not have all the problems the other customers had. DON'T DO IT! The table arrived poorly packaged and beat up just as the others here have described. One corner of the table top was bashed in, another piece of wood was split, the green paint from the table top rubbed off onto the white table leg, and edge of the other table leg was dented in revealing the plywood underneath the paint. This is a very CHEAP table - cheaply constructed of plywood. It is functional, but just not very attractive since it arrives already damaged. Just beware before you buy that you will more than likely be getting a banged up train table</review_text>
As far as I know there is only one tempo and one type of dance sequence on this mat.  No matter how much we play around with the different buttons it does not do anything different.  This was a big request from my 6 year old daughter for Christmas and now she hardly plays with it.  It entertains our 15 month old twins more!  Resist any begging by your kids for this item and buy something else, a CD boombox maybe</review_text>
Purchased this as a gift for my grandchildren....This is Boring and absolutely NO FUN no matter what your age.  I guess for almost $40 you shouldn't expect flashing lights or something a little more exciting. Doesn't even deserve the one star I gave it.</review_text>
We bought this for my son for Christmas, on the conditon that he never put fish in it, since the reviews said it killed fish.  That worked fine until he won a fish at the school carnival.  Of course it had to go in with the sharks.  So with freshly treated water and a prayer, we put the fish in.  The next day it was very listless and lying along the bottom.  After checking the reviews, I saw one where the person removed the fish and they recovered.  So we've taken the beta out and are waiting to see if it will survive.  I still would rate this aquarium 1 star for cool looks and lights, but it's very noisy and I believe it kills fish</review_text>
Followed all directions, added fish, within hours the fish were "sleeping" on the bottom of the tank. Luckily they had not entered the never ending sleep so I took them out putting them in a bowl of water and after an hour they started getting better.  Changed the water in the tank this time using distilled water, added fish, 3 hours later they were lying motionless on the bottom.  took them out and put them in another bowl of water and they got better. Something is seriously wrong with this tank.  Bought regular plastic tank at the pet store added fish and guess what... they are doing great!  Do not put fish in the shark tank.  They will die</review_text>
My 4 year son is learning about the fragility of life the hard way with this tank.Two Goldfish, two flushes. If I take the struggling fish out of the tank and put it in a fish bowl it seems to come around, but they won't last 24 hours in this tank. I've followed the directions to a T, Adjusted the pH, tried lights on lights off, pump on pump off, even used bottled water, but the fish just do a slow fade when in the tank</review_text>
I bought this toy for my shark-crazed 5 year-old... she was so stoked and we prepped the tank, added the recommended water chemicals and dropped in two small goldfish. Less than 24 hours later, they were dead. Repeat... 40 hours later... same story. We tried a single Betta, Frank, but less than 4 days later... he's dead. We don't know what it is. The water was tested, it's fine. We think it is the overall design of the tank, could the tight-fitting lid be responsible? Possibly ammonia by-product buildup from the fish? Who knows. But we have given up and are dumping this promising toy into the trash bin</review_text>
I agree with the comments about the taste and size.  Personally I think someone should look into the false advertising.  On the preztel kit, which is also a "4 pack", you only get two pretzels.  One of the packs is salt and another is glaze.  Then you get two packs of some pretzel dough.  These pretzels are not much larger than the ones you get in a bag out of the vending machine.Total rip-off.  Hasbro should be ashamed of its marketing staff</review_text>
Horrible advertising on these packages.  It shows a huge delicious bowl of pasta when says 4 pack, but it only makes two "bowls" of pasta.  The servings are so tiny, that if you make both packets together, you maybe get a half a bowl of pasta.  Not to mention that it takes about 11-15 minutes to cook!  Pasta's so sticky you have to use no-stick spray.  The taste is so bad my son, who eats anything wouldn't touch it, and the sauce packet was hard as a rock, so it didn't mix up and left big chunks in the ketchup you have to add.  We tried the mac and cheese too, it takes 15 minutes to cook and again says 4 pack, but that's only 2 pastas and 2 cheeses.  Very expensive, hardly any food, and pretty nasty to eat.  They need to be alot more realistic on their packaging instead of trying to use false pictures and saying "4pack"  Eight thumbs down from this family</review_text>
The go-cart is much smaller that it appeared to be. My 2 year old barely fits. These is no reverse and it is a sit in toy. So the child has to get completely out to turn around, or you have to follow them around. The steering column is not straight so the steering wheel has to be sideways to drive straight. All together it is not a very impressive to. My daughter enjoys it very much but I should not have got rid of her Lil' Quad.</review_text>
We got this set for my 4 year old son for Christmas. His eyes lit up when he saw it. He dropped everything and insisted that we open it right away....we didn't, of course...we waited a whole day...thank goodness...it literally took an hour to put together. There are so many pieces that look alike but are barely different. It was very frustrating...then it wouldn't stay together once it was finished. It has been nothing but a frustration for him and me ever since. He gets so upset when he tries to play with it. We saved the box. It's going back, if they will take it...</review_text>
Santa got this castle for my five year old son for christmas. I agree with many of the other reviewers, though it is visually appealing it is very flimsy and was painstaking to put together. Despite all that my son seems to be enjoying. This toy is fun for the child but not for the parents.</review_text>
Our almost-4 year old son loves dragons and has one of the Imaginext dinosaur sets, so we thought we'd really surprise him on Christmas this year with the Imaginext dragon set.While I'm very happy with how happy my son is with it (he's been playing with it for hours) I have a feeling we're going to be in much the same boat as some other reviewers.Pros:- Interesting color scheme- Good detail on most pieces- Re-configurable- The dragon figure is really neat- The trap door, rotating floor and other moving parts are a lot of fun for my son to operate- Got it on sale at the local Toys R' Us for 11 dollars less than listed on the web site.Cons- The directions are picture-only, and much too small to see fine detail.- The pieces are not packaged together logically, so that the elements of the set are all in one bag. You have to open every bag and lay the pieces out in order to be able to find everything and even then there's some question as to whether you've got the right part turned the right way, per the above comment about the directions.- The whole thing comes tumbling down like a house of cards if you bump against it lightly/during casual play. I've had to put it back together no less than 5 times since I initially put it together this morning. Some of the connector pieces don't fit tightly enough into the sockets on other pieces, so they tend to just slide out instead of locking together firmly.I think that next year, we'll just stick to Legos</review_text>
My son loved the toy and couldn't wait to get it opened, but the problem came when we tried to close it back up.  The treasuer box would not close back up easily.  I had to work at it very hard, my son who is 7 could not close it by himself.  He got pretty frustrated</review_text>
This thing just doesn't work, don't bother.  It won't stay upright no matter what you do, so there's no way for the kids to play any form of tether ball with it.  Looks like it would be fun if it worked.  The most entertaining thing about it was that the dog kept barking at it for some reason.</review_text>
I was very excited about buying this phone for my daughter after seeing it on the internet.  That was, until I saw it in the store.  There were about 5 in stock and not one of them was in full working condition.  Most of them had not enough power to play any sounds, while others had parts broken off of it.  Don't waste your money on this product.  You will surely be disappointed</review_text>
Not to impressed with this company. 3rd item I have bought and the table top had to be reglued and screwed. Also the table top had major horizontal cracks. I don't believe they check their quality of their products</review_text>
My twins loved the similar toy I bought at Dollar Tree. The one at Dollar Tree has a duck or pig in center instead of a red mass.I cannot believe they charge this much for the same thing</review_text>
Last summer we bought two of these cruisers and both of them broke after only one month of normal use.  The water squirt function quit working after only a week.  My kids LOVED them, but for the price these cruisers are, they need to be built to last</review_text>
Yes i've just bought the videonow color fx and want more pvd's but they are kinda costly so i want to know is ther a need to buy this item?Can you burn regular dvd's to a pvd ?And is this going to be a wast of money?Is there any were to buy blank pvd'</review_text>
I ordered this item and was so excited. It loaded fine. It let me upload files just fine. It wasn't until I actually tried to create my PVD that I received errors that shut down the program (many many many times...with numerous types of video files) I double checked the system requirements for the software and my computer checked out fine. The worst thing is that there is no support for the media player. I tried contacting Hasbro with no response. I am so dissapointed.</review_text>
My son's best friend got one of those for christmas and we went to the lake to test it against my son's regular RC boat. The hovercraft was very slow and not quite that maneuverable. It hovered OK on water, but couldn't handle sand or concrete. The "skirt" slipped out of its track a couple times (despite our being careful fitting it as best as we could), filling with water - the foam inside it didn't prevent the boat from being swamped by the smallest wave (even in good shape it couldn't handle waves like the other boat.) The thin skirt finally ripped and the boat is pretty much unusable now. Big disapointment. It was somewhat fun while it worked, the concept was intriguing for the gearhead boys, but once the novelty wore off the regular boat was a lot more exciting and all the kids prefered taking turns running that one.</review_text>
Whatver your favorite fruit may be, this game will certinaly not be in your cadre of favorite games. It is basically boring, and ill-conceived. I have played it  a few times with my kids, and found it to be of no particular interest on any level-it is neither fun, exciting or challenging, for them or me. I strongly recommend you try a Cranium game , or how about CHESS??? The only positve thing i can think of with regard to this widly overrated game, is that it's better than TV, which isn't saying much</review_text>
I bought this item for my 6 year old niece.  Not only was i disapointed with how it physically looked (colors were not bright like other Cars toys), I was absolutely disgusted with the name calling in one of the sayings.  I realized when it called the tractor a negative name, stupid I believe it was, that it was going back.  I wouldn't want my child having a toy that calls others names, so I wont give it to anyone either.  Not to mention, the grammar used, is not correct.  I realize that is the character, but why would I want to teach children grammer that is wrong?  All in all, disapointment, that Disney puts out toys like this</review_text>
My daughter had a drink and wet doll that she could give a bath but it filled up with water and even though you couldn't empty all the water out, it still leaked everywhere. I got rid of it hoping she wouldn't notice. Well, she did, so a new "doll I can give a bath to" was on her Christmas list. I wanted to find a solid rubber doll that would not fill up with water. Like the dolls I had as a child. I thought this would be it since the top half visible in the box appeared to have no holes. Wrong. It has a soft torso filled with polystyrene beads that get waterlogged. The water all (I hope) drains out of the bottom of the feet after a couple of minutes of squeezing. Then you have to let the torso drip dry. Last night after bathtime, my daughter wanted to tuck her doll into to the doll cradle, but couldn't because she was still wet.The other features are fine. The shower works great. You don't have to fill up the fish. Just attach it to the tube and squeeze. It suctions water from the bottom of the floaty. The doll doesn't sit upright in the floaty, but she doesn't flop completely over, either.I don't care for the bow sewn on to the head. Who takes a bath with a bow on? But if you take it off, she'll have holes in her head</review_text>
My daughter wanted a doll that goes in the water last christmas.  I chose this one, and she was so pleased.  THe doll is beautiful.  She did not quite sit the right way in her raft.  Someone needs to hold the raft while the doll is in it, or it will tip. My daugther did not like that we could not just dry the doll off with a towel, so she could take it around the house with her, but that it had to hang and dry.   Still she loved this doll and it was her favorite, until two months later when the material around the leg wripped.  Instead of trying to sew it, I figured it was cheaply made and the rest would rip also, we said goodbye.  This year I am getting her another doll that goes in the bath, but I am getting the Paul Drink and wet doll by corolle.  It is a lot more expensive, but I think it will be worth it.</review_text>
It's a big nasty mess.  As big of a mess and disappointment as Floa</review_text>
The remote worked only for 2 days. My daughter loves the look of it so I am not able to dispose it off. Its a total waste of money. I wish I had read the reviews before buying it since lot of people seem to have the same problem with the remote.</review_text>
I agree with a previous review, this ball pit will NOT STAY INFLATED!  My kids had barely played with it and it started tearing and getting small, unrepairable holes in it.  This is also a very small ball pit.  It is too small for two kids to easily play in it and not bang heads.  We had purchased a Little Peoples ball pit train years ago for my older daughter and it held up for years.  This was a very disappointing purchase</review_text>
It didn't even last 24 hours before it split at the seams in several different spots.  Don't waste your money</review_text>
My daughter had this when she was a teenager. Now my grandchildren come and play the game she had. To preserve the original game I ordered new ones to replace my daughters game when she had it. The grandchildren, all 6 of them, love playing this game at our house</review_text>
My daughter loves this toy.  She has the treehouse and the school house, she plays with them often.  My only complaint is that they fall apart.  She does not mind, I just snap it back together and she keeps playing.</review_text>
My son is 5yrs old and this was one of the 1st things on his christmas list. He loves Power Rangers of all kinds but when we finally opened this and I tried to put it together...I thought I was doing it wrong b/c nothing fit or stayed together!! My son still played with the dragon part that was already put together but the storage bin is useless and the rope that the Power Ranger can "slide" down is barely high enough that he stays off of the ground and he pretty much falls down rather than sliding down. The so called "instructions" were horrible and another reviewer was correct in indicating how small the pictures were. I would have never wasted my money on this if I would have read the reviews 1st (I usually do). My son played with it for about 5-10 minutes and then asked why santa would bring him something like that. In my opinion it was a huge waste of about $50 and gave santa a bad name with my son for bringing him such a piece of junk</review_text>
This toy is a terrible disappointment. It falls apart immediately, is very poorly designed, and ridiculously difficult for a child (or adult)to put together.</review_text>
Whoever decided this was good for four year-olds must not be a parent of said age group. My four year-old received this as a birthday present. His adult aunt could barely figure it out. It's one of those toys that collapses the moment you play with it, taking all the fun out of the imaginative play that should be occuring. We have all the little parts and bigger pieces in a pile and he just walks around with the bigger piece wondering what to do with it, even though we have the corresponding Mystic Force Power Rangers themselves. I think this toy should be perhaps 1/4 of the price listed. Simply disappointing</review_text>
It really is not what I was looking for, but the children have found other uses for it</review_text>
I paid over $7 for this thing, bought it thinking it was going to be bigger than the ones that come with the set, and then I get it and it is tiny! you can get a much better deal on the extra large ones at lego.co</review_text>
Bought these beads for my 18 month old. He enjoys taking them in and out of the container. They are made out of thick plastic but are too heavy to stay snapped together.  When we snapped 4 or more together they would not stay snapped together because the weight of the beads pulled them apart as soon as they're moved</review_text>
Horrible...I was very excited to play this as I am a huge fan of the arcade game.  Of course, I wasn't expecting the quality to be the greatest but I was hoping for something playable.  Track ball is stingy, graphics are atrocious and there is only one course to play.  I have played better functioning, playable golf games 20 years ago on an PC.  The idea was great but this just wasn't made well.  Don't waste your money on this</review_text>
this was a christmas present and it continues to fall apart. the archways do not stay on them. too expensive for what you really get. i ended up putting most of it away except for the center cake piece and the cats. I would not buy it</review_text>
The game was not nearly as sturdy as I had hoped.  A piece broke off as I was putting it together.  Too sensitive to touch.  Wouldn't purchase again for an 8 year old</review_text>
how annoyed am i ? today my son is 5 an aunt bought the tmnt monster jam truck ; so we ,supposedly, bought the battery to go with it. WRONG THIS DOES NOT GO WITH IT. SON HAS A TOY WITH NO BATTERY , WE HAVE A BATTERY WITH NO TOY. WELL DONE TOYS'R'CRAP. WILL NEVER BUY HERE AGAI</review_text>
I am very disappointed in the construction of this toy.  The picture on the website and the picture on the box made it look like it was made of a more durable material.  It was made mostly of styrofoam and cost way too much for what it's made of.  I have no doubt that this toy will not survive until next Christmas. I would have sent it back if it had not been from "Santa".</review_text>
Unless you are prepared to be constantly putting the ropes and the masts back on the ship, this toy is a complete waste of money. My son had been wanting the Black Pearl for quite some time and this was a huge disappointment to him.  Buyer beware</review_text>
I just finished the World's Largest Crossword Puzzle last night.  It's been one heck of a project--approximately equivalent to 200 slightly oversized daily crossword puzzles.  I'm going to love hanging the puzzle on my wall--it really is something to behold when it's all done.  But it's also a big undertaking that requires a great deal of patience and perserverance.The puzzle itself is moderately difficult, but made more so by the fact that somewhere during the revision (it's been re-done once) or perhaps during the original construction some errors were made.  Because of this, many of the clues don't match the answers. Add to that the fact that the author uses many hundreds, possibly even thousands, of abbreviations that are specific to a certain field (e.g. "Abbreviation used in electrical engineering") that no lay person ever has a chance of knowing, and you've got what can be an exercise in frustration.  You can work for hours on one small section and only later find out that the clue doesn't fit the answer. I'm generally pretty dogged in completing crosswords until letter perfect, but that's not possible here.  So I had to sacrifice a bit of my honor and force myself to give up after a couple of passes through the ups and downs.  Still, it's about 98+ percent solvable, which is pretty good when you consider how intricate the puzzle is and how hard it must have been to create.Overall, I enjoyed the process and am pleased with the result.  If you've got the time and energy, I highly recommend this.</review_text>
My 7 1/2 year old daughter tried these on at a friend's house yesterday.  SHe had them on for about 2 minutes before she fell and got hurt.  After a trip to the ER and the Orthopedic Surgeon, she has a fracture in her growth plate.  Need I say more</review_text>
This Elmo table will suddenly go off in the middle of the night.  I had to ship the first one back to FP on my own dime to get a new one, that one was broken as well!  The cookie monster did not work on the first one and now the ABC part does not work.  this time they are paying for my return shipping but come on!  what a pain!  shoddy electrical work.  i have the same issues with the aquarium bouncer baby seat.  make sure you get this garbage on sale!</review_text>
This dog looked so cute and fun in the commercials and it was the one of only two things my 4 year old really asked Santa for. Come Christmas morning, today, I open it and put the batteries in and all it did was whine and we were petting the head and chest hard. After about 3 minutes I did get it to bark then another 3 minutes later I got the tail to wag but the leg wouldn't shake for another 3 minutes. 20 minutes of trying to get it to do any thing at all it finally licked but the tongue was not wet and I did put water in it so it should have been wet. Then my daughter got mad because she couldn't get it to lick again. The dog doesn't even stand up like it appears to be doing on the box.. it just lays there. If you are buying this, be prepared to be paying for a highly priced stuffed animal because that is all it amounts to. I can't believe a manufacturer would put some thing like this out there so that kids can be disappointed on Christmas morning... this product should have just plainly been recalled</review_text>
Just like a big chunk of us right now, I'm quite the sudoku addict. I just can't put those little puzzles down! So, I have to tell you first, if you haven't worked sudoku puzzles yet, you are really missing out! Get your hands on some!Naturally, I was excited to try out a sudoku game and race against my friends to solve the puzzles. But what a disappointment! One small board, several people straining to see it, everyone racing to fill in the puzzle...it just doesn't work.The way they designed this game was to have a board, which is the puzzle to be solved, and number tiles that you distribute evenly amongst the players. Everyone rushes to fill in the puzzle, and the person who uses all their number tiles first is the winner, assuming the puzzle is solved correctly.First of all, if you have more than 2 people playing, the players aren't all going to be able to see the board well. Some people are going to have the board upside-down trying to solve it. That's rough! Talk about getting confused between 6s and 9s! Plus, everyone's hands are in the way while they're laying their tiles, which makes it really hard to see and concentrate on the puzzle.Next, inevitably in the games I've played someone lays a tile wrong. Then the whole game is thrown off. The instructions say that if someone rids themselves of their tiles but placed them incorrectly, then the next person to finish would win provided all their tiles are correct. Most likely, if one person has made an error, that will have caused a chain reaction and the next person's tiles will also be placed wrong, and not necessarily by fault of either of the players. It could have been anyone who started the chain reaction.The format just doesn't work for this game. My advice is to pass on this particular game. Perhaps a game where people were racing side-by-side on the same puzzle, but with their own puzzle, would work better</review_text>
We bought this for our snowboarding 11-year-old son. Being used to Playstation and Gamecube, he wasn't impressed with the graphics and control of the characters is very clunky. It's a cool concept-- but it needs more time in development</review_text>
My 3 year old got this for a Christmas gift, and I thought it to be a great idea, since he loves Elmo and bathtime.  WRONG...  the darn crayons stained my bathtub!!  I had to scrub my tub for what seemed like forever to get the stains "almost" out.  I threw the crayons away after that.  My son likes the Elmo still, but I wouldn't recommend the crayons, especially in an older-style porcelain bathtub, like ours</review_text>
I bought this toy last year for me son.  He really did not care for the toy at all, but he LOVES Elmo.  The crayons were way too messy and melted really fast</review_text>
I'm more or less fine that they changed a murder with an object in a room to who ate the cake at what time with what beverage.  Buying this for kids and all that.  Its not as intuitive or intrinsicly interesting, at least to me, but hopefully it is to kids.  However, they also changed the mechanics of the game from adult Clue, and not in a good way.  The "room" variable for example, drops out.  Its not relevant.  Its who ait the cake at what time with what drink.  It just feels silly to set up the room pieces and move from room to room if the room is irrelevant.The idea is probably to change the mechanics to make the game simpler.  Well, the problem with that is it was pretty simple in the first place.  And the change sort of makes it more complex in a way.  You need to remember the rooms where you already checked tokens.  Now the sheet does list the rooms, you could use that to check off the rooms where you checked tokens.  But since the rooms are not otherwise relevant, its not intuitive to track the rooms where you checked tokens.The game is also incredibly cheaply constructed.  For example, the "die" does not have numbers on it, you have to put number stickers on it.  And the board isn't flimsy -- flimsy would be an improvement.Anyway, not recommended</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend as a present. We both love the TV show and thought the game would be as exciting (without the live crowd, of course). But the game moves slow, no models - only picking case numbers. You can compete against one another, but its not really exciting.Maybe you should try the board game version - it can't be any worse.</review_text>
This game is one hot mess.  I bought it for my Mom for Christmas.  We decided to play the 2 player game thinking it would be fun.  Well, the word my Mother used to describe it is "EXCRUCIATING".  This was the slowest and most boring thing I've ever played.  There is at least a 10 second pause between EACH function (choosing a case, opening the case, Howie giving you directions, taking turns, looking at your opened case. . .you name it).  Each time you switch back to the other player, THE SCREEN LITERALLY GOES BLACK!  You only see the suitcase girls in the beginning and the end.  When a case is opened, you only see two arms, breasts and the case!  When it is your turn to pick a case, there is COMPLETE SILENCE as you scroll - and I use the term loosely - up and down to pick a number.  For a "video game" which you assume to move quickly, you'd better set aside at lease an hour to play it.  You will be exhausted when you're through.  We suggest they go back to the drawing board and stop with all the pauses, play some theme music when you are choosing your case, show the girl who opens your case, have the audience clap - ANYTHING!!!!!!!!  If you buy this game, you only have yourself to blame. P.S.  I won $750,000 and didn't even care, I was just glad it was over</review_text>
Game didn't work, but Amazon was very accomodating with a refund including shipping</review_text>
My daughter's birthday was to take place the next day.  At 10pm I went to Wal-Mart, and after seeing on the package "over 100 songs, stories, and games", I thought this would be AWESOME!   I bought this toy excited that the doll would actually sing happy birthday the next morning to my 2 year old!I installed the software on my desktop (XP machine), but the real headache came when I hooked this thing to the computer (and I am a computer guy, so it shouldn't be that hard).  I plugged in the doll with the USB provided cable, and Windows XP loaded the update to the drivers for the USB port.  I clicked "Download to Dora", and the system came up with the "Incorrect Doll" that another reviewer mentioned.  I tried Fisher Price's help files, but it was no help (in fact, it said call their customer svc department).Following another reviewer's instructions to try this on a new computer, I loaded this software on my laptop.  Hooked the doll in.  Had Windows XP update the USB driver.  Then with great anticipation I clicked "Download to Dora"....and.....and.....I received "INCORRECT DOLL"!Finally, at 1AM...I gave up.  I took the doll back to Wal-Mart.  She got a nice tri-cycle instead</review_text>
Remember Spirograph by Kenner you played with as a kid? This thing Hasbro sells under the same name is NOT that toy. It is obviously of cheap quality, parred down to a handful of "gears", and designed so poorly that it doesnt really work! Stick with the original, which means purchase it used on eBay, but do NOT buy Hasbro's Spirograph.</review_text>
...this is nothing like the Spirograph I grew up playing with.  As everyone else mentioned, the gears are much too thin and slip constantly.  My 6 year old son was completely frustrated after wrestling with the design flaws.  Don't waste your money!</review_text>
I purchased this for my nephew and my daughter as a present.  I was significantly disappointed.  With this item having the Smithsonian name on it, I expected better construction.  While trying to assemble the item, the plastic cracked on the one.  The tubes and caps were so loose that I was afraid the bugs would get out into my house.  I put silicone around the extremely loose ones.  However, I did not seal everything so the critters could breathe.  For the price, there are other similar items out there with better construction</review_text>
My daughter has the ethnic version of this doll.  She absolutely loves it.  However, as a parent I notice that the color on the lips are peeling and the doll cheeks has no color to them like the illustration.  I am also very upset that I can not get a replacement for this item.  How do you tell your daughter that Santa Claus can't fix or replace this item?</review_text>
What A waste of monee. I do not think this is a nice gift for anyone. Boo.THE EN</review_text>
I bought this dollhouse for my daughter's 3rd birthday.  Within the first week I had to glue at least 3 pieces of furniture back together.  Over the past year I've repaired numerous pieces and the house cannot be moved without the back and roof coming off.  (It is now taped together). For $150 and with all of it's "awards" I expected much better quality.  I think ALEX needs to stop selling this house and redesign it</review_text>
Very cheaply made.MY children broke it after only four months.The back wall broke off along with the top roof.The furniture also broke.The people's hair came off.This house was a big mistake.I wish I had purchased a different one.This house is very cute,but not sturdy enough for preschoolers</review_text>
This says it is a wooden dollhouse but is not worth the money - is cheesy looking and cheaply made</review_text>
I should have bought my girls ipods.Yes, these mini-muddles are cute in that they fit into little girl purses and pockets, but that's where the novelty ends.First, it is NOT abundantly obvious to children how to work the controls to get where they want to be.  These are kids for crimy sakes!  They needs to have controls that are clear and easy.  My youngest has no idea how to get to a particular song because the buttons never do what she THINKS they should do (That's a big hint to Hasbro...don't design a product from an adults point of view.  Design it for a child from their point of view.  A button having multiple functions is very confusing for kids).  So I end up having to constantly mash those itty-bitty buttons until I can figure out where the song is for her.Second, the process of getting music from point A to point B (point B being the mini-black-hole) is NOT a quick and easy process.  Copy here, burn there, transfer to this spot, drag/drop to who knows where.  Oy vey.  And THEN you discover the music isn't in the correct format so you have to start all over again.As for the 128 worth of space...128 is a piddly amount of space but it is clearly advertised on the packaging that this is the amount you're going to get.  No surprises there.  Now if I could only get the darn music into the player without giving up and chuckin' it to the dog to play with.An ipod might be expensive, but Apple certainly doesn't cause this consumer the grief and frustration that Hasbro has</review_text>
My 10 year old received the Massively Mini Media Player for Christmas and she and I both are very disappointed in it. There is simply not enough memory and this product does not seem to be compatible with our Napster files (at least not readily. perhaps I could burn them to cd then rip them back to my computer and THEN transfer them to the mini media player but I have not tried that yet.)  Folks, 128MB is a joke even for a young child. There are much better players out there in the same price range. I own the Sansa e250 which is a solid little mp3 player and I am seriously considering buying the same model for her as well</review_text>
I purchased this for my 8 year old for Christmas and thought I would be able to store more than just a few songs, but the memory capacity is actually only 109M and will actually only hold about 8-10 songs, no where near the 2 hours promised.  I would not recommend this purhcase to any child</review_text>
This looked to be a very cool item but what we thought was a miniature picture of the item turned out to be the item itself.  How they expect you to enjoy a movie on a screen the size of a thumbnail is beyond me.  Fun idea to be able to carry this in your pocket but not worth it</review_text>
I bought this toy for my son for Christmas.  I thought he would enjoy the toy because he already likes to place balls and other items into baskets and he likes rattles.  Unfortunately the toy ended up being a disappointment because it is SO LOUD!  It scares him everytime I turn it on and there is no way to control the volume.  I know lots of kid toys are loud, but I have never heard one as loud as this one.</review_text>
My four year old picked this toy out with a gift certificate given to him by his grandmother.  He already had pirate sets made by Playmobil, but this looked like an interesting addition to the sets.  Well, set up took nearly an hour for his very mechanically able father, and almost as soon as he began to play with it, pieces fell apart.  NOTE:  he is NOT a careless child, nor is he rough with toys.  But this toy doesn't stand up to even the most basic four year old play.After he had had it up without playing with it for six months, we finally just boxed it.  We found all the parts and sold it for five dollars at a garage sale.  I just hope those people don't come back to reclaim their money.  Save yourself the pain and frustration and buy Playmobil's Pirate Lagoon -- this is just a cheap knockoff</review_text>
This toy was a huge disappointment for me. My boys took one look at it and threw it. I thought it was much bigger than what it is. I was also upset that I spent as much as I did and it wasn't even a decent size. My boys are moving to a car themed room and it just wasn't what I envisioned. It also only says one thing which can be quite boring for small children</review_text>
I don't know why this is, but when I put on the Dale Sr. shell for this car it started to understeer on left turns and would always crash into walls</review_text>
This car pictured could be a BASE or First Version defintely not worth 299.00 These are going for 100.00 and less on the web.If you havent noticed the differences in the packaging it wouldnt suprise me. Lots of people dont notice. Heres the differences below...On these 5 cars there is TWO versions of each driver(5 different drivers) that were made. First versions or BASE version and Second versions or "Added Features" Version.The FIRST versions have NO "added features" stickers and you CANNOT race ANY TWO (or more) cars of the 5 different drivers' cars at the same time! Dale Sr. and Dale Jr.,  Jeff Gordon, Jimmie Johnson and Tony Stewart cars of the FIRST versions (no added features) CANNOT race together! Transmitter frequencys cannot be changed. Speed and steering are straight function. (no varilable anything) They either turn right FULL turn or left FULL turn or it goes straight. Speed is either it goes FULL ON or it doesnt. Same for reverse gear.Again, each of the 5 different drivers' cars made are two different versions of the same car one has more features than the other.UPDATED or "ADDED FEATURES" versions have "ADDED FEATURES" stickers.Those "Added Features" are...Digital proportional steering (variable steering), which means you can turn the transmitter wheel slightly and the car turns a little. Turn the transmitter wheel alot and the car turns alot.Variable speed control  this means you pull back on the trigger a little the car moves a little, pull back on the trigger all the way and the car takes off! This also works for reverse gears as wellNow if this isnt cool enough...Each "Added Features" car has  DIFFERENT Frequencies for different drivers' car.  The transmitters for the cars are different as well. "ADDED FEATURES" version transmitter has two "trim" adjustments on the back of the remote as well as the Frequency Chip on the side of the remote than can be changed, and can also be changed on the chassis of the car. So if you own 2 of the Tony Stewart cars, you would have to have a Frequency pack to race them at the same time. Now, two or more different drivers' cars can race together (or Five people can race 5 different cars). NO TWO ALIKE CARS can race together UNLESS you have the "frequency of another car and transmitter"  to change it, or a "Frequency Pack" from Team Up Inc.ALL 5 Frequency Chips DO NOT come with the car in the box, off the shelf. This "Frequency pack" is sold seperately!You can also purchase tires, suspension parts and body hold down clips, fully painted and ready to use new spare OR other drivers' teams bodies, extra rechargeable battery packs seperately!I have done lots of research on these cars and should you have any questions please ask...nascarnbroncosfans@msn.co</review_text>
I am an active 48 year old and I own a Vurtego Pro Pogo stick. I ride motocross and I mountain bike regulary and I like the exercise and fun factor it offers. I chose the Vurtego Pro after doing some online research and I am totally pleased with the performance. The guys who designed and developed the Vurtego Pro and Fit sticks were looking for a way to offer a more affordable model for beginers and people looking for a fun but still high quality stick. The Power model came up short of their extpectations and they pulled thier endorsement due to quality and safety concerns.  For the money the Power Pogo is a fairly decent pogo stick but its not going to stand up to the abuse and demands of an expert or extreme pogo stick rider. It takes allot of effort and experience to go 6' or higher on any pogo stick. I am pretty good at mine, after about a month of use I am getting up in the 3' range and bouncing 500 plus consecutive times in a session before taking a break and going for another session or two, a great workout! I have pogo stick experience and can pull off most of the basic tricks, I consider myself a beginner to intermediate at the most. I doubt that I will ever reach the six foot level at my age, but that was never my goal. I know that the people at Vurtego are still working to develope a model that will be safe and affordable for those looking for a capeable, high quality and durable stick. If your looking to go 6' and pull off serious stunts I would buy the orignal Vurtego Pro or the Fit model for a great workout. If you are looking for a little less I would wait for the next version that the  Vurtego people will offer and endorse. I personally would avoid this one.</review_text>
IT sucked because I couldnt figure out the screen it is really big so you cant relly hide it any where and you cant drop it because it will break really easily Trust ME I KNO</review_text>
I bought two of these as Christas gifts.  One for my son and one for my nephew.  My kids have played with it a few times now and my wife and I are looking for an oppourunity to pitch the whole mess in the trash.  Not only does this stuff look like sand, but it gets into EVERYTHING just like real sand.  The play mat they include in this kit doesnt come close to containing the mess.  On top of all that the stuff deosnt clump together all that well.  All and all I would reccomend this product only for childeren over 8yrs and then only for outside play unless you really enjoy cleaning up.</review_text>
We were really excited about this item, but have been very disappointed.  We followed the directions EXACTLY, even putting the planted terrarium in the refrigerator for 8 weeks (which was frustrating AND a pain in the neck) -- and still we have nothing growing -- after weeks and weeks of waiting!  Rotten thing to do to a kid!The plastic dome is of decent quality, and we got living carnivorous plants from an online seller -- worked out much better.  This is a TOTAL waste of time and money, unfortunately</review_text>
Growing CPs from seed is not easy!  And growing CPs in a terrarium is even harder (they need full sun, wet soil, and a special soil mix).  They grow native from Texas through the Carolinas and do not need the tropical environment of a terrarium where fungus will attack and kill.  This terrarium set up is doomed to failure.  CPs are actually very easy to grow outdoors with a little proper instruction.  Obtain your plants or seeds (takes years to get a decent plant via seeds) from a reputable online nursery (I have bought several excellent plants from Sarracenia Northwest) and then search the web for proper growing instructions.  Skip this item and the goofy terrarium domes at Walmart.</review_text>
I would give this kit zero stars if I could. The instructions say that it takes 6-8 weeks for the seeds to sprout. I kept them in moist peat and warm temperatures for over three months after the recommended period of refrigeration.  Not a single seed sprouted. I finally had to throw out the whole kit when mold took over. Complete waste of time and money.But if you're feeling lucky, you should know that most of the seeds in this kit aren't much bigger than pinheads, and they all come packaged together in the same tiny plastic bag. So if you want to have each type of plant growing in a different section of the plastic tray provided in the kit - like that shown on the box cover - you need to separate out each seed under a strong magnifying glass.  And even then you won't be successful, as most of these seeds look just like ground pepper.  I accidentally spilled a few on the floor, and after sweeping them all up I literally couldn't tell them from the other debris in the dustpan.By the way, it takes a minimum of 6-8 years living in ideal growing conditions for any of the plants in this kit to reach the sizes shown on the box cover. These are NOT plants that can simply be put on a windowsill. They need an environment that is not easily provided in the average home - LOTS of very bright light (about 15 hours a day), LOTS of humidity, an acidic growth medium (such as sphagnum moss), and about 80 degrees. And even then, these are VERY slow-growing plants.To keep the humidity level high, you'll need some kind of terrarium, preferably covered to keep the humidity level high. But if you use incandescent bulbs to provide the necessary level of light, the amount of heat they produce can easily raise the temperature to lethal levels. For this reason I recommend a combination of fluorescent bulbs and a moist/dry heating pad at the bottom. Be sure that whatever heating pad you use isn't the type that shuts off automatically after one hour of use.Some warnings...These plants flourish only in a very limited range of environments and nourishment.  The care you would normally give a houseplant will - in all likelihood - kill these plants:NEVER feed them animal protein (like hamburger). The fats in meat aren't digestible and can kill them.NEVER use tap water to water them. The mineral build-up can kill them so use distilled water only.NEVER feed them insects that have been killed by insecticides, like RAID. Carnivorous plants should be fed soft-bodies insects like small slugs, ants, termites, etc., rather than hard-shelled insects such as beetles. Well-stocked pet stores will carry dried mealworms, but even these will need to be cut into very small pieces. Just as a baby needs tiny mouthfuls of food, so too do Venus flytraps.NEVER fertilize them. These are very slow-growing plants and any attempt to force them to grow will kill them.</review_text>
Unless you buy the multi arcade machines with all the major games including Mr. Do and do it right- the classic collections on PlayStation II are the best.  Unfortunately for plug and play some of the versions are jerked to very difficult levels and not as fun to play.  The monsters in the Pac-Man games are almost always on kill including following you  in the tunnel a lot of the time.  The problems listed with the joystick seem to be accurate.  Galaga was better and Mappy was a lot of fun to play- the most underated classic in arcade history.  But again it's better to get the collections for Playstation II</review_text>
The doll is a great gift for little girls who love dolls.My 6 year old loved the doll.I do not like the way allysens hair sheds when you comb it.When allysen asked when is your birthday? My daughter had to keep repeating herself,when allysen asked what is your name the same thing happened.so my daughter got stuck with Happy New Year as her birthday and sweetie as her name,when you ask Allysen to read her book she asked for a smoothie,She is also very loud,my daughter slept with allysen and carried her around everywhere she went.When allysens batteries died she went back in the box</review_text>
I have my own business so I decided to give back to community by assisting with Christmas for the unfortunate.  I purchased 7 Amazing Allysen dolls and a plethora of other stuff for the less fortunate.  None of the Allysen dolls work.  I purchased a Amazing Allysen for my little in cousin in Florida also. We tried to make that doll work but it would not.  I went to the local Walmart to purchase another one and it did not work either.  I am totally disappointed with Amazing Allysen.  The kids that I purchased the doll for in Raleigh North Carolina could not find the appropriate things so that I could return the dolls.  I will return the one I purchased for my cousin today because my 30 days are almost up.  This was a horrible experience.  Those kids were expecting to have a super awesome doll, but she did not work.  I felt so bad because it was like I had something to do with it because I purchased so many and none of them worked.  I did have the opportunity to return the doll to Walmart in Florida and purchased an Amanda doll for my little cousin after Christmas.  She really loves Amanda</review_text>
Another reviewer said that this was a soft doll with no hard parts.  I ordered it thinking it would be perfect for my niece.  What I got was a hard plastic doll with small pieces labeled "Not for Children Under Three."  Needless to say, I was very disappointed.  This would be great for a 4 or 5 year old, but don't expect a soft, cuddly doll for your little one</review_text>
This does not work for the coler PIXTER.  There is no port to plug it in</review_text>
I bought it for my son to use with the Original Pixter also. And,I found what it was compatible with, after I realized that it didn't work with the original Pixter. The box I have says down in the bottom right corner (if the back of the box is facing you) of the back of the box in tiny print "compatible with Pixter Plus and Pixter 2.0".  You would think they would put that on the front</review_text>
The game has a nice concept, IF IT WORKED. I've been trying since christmas(over 3 months) to connect this game to the internet to update it for my kids and finally was able to update the firmware today. Something that you will have to do to be able to get to the virtual worlds,BUT THE WEB SITE IS ALWAYS DOWN!!!!! EXPERANCING TECHNICAL PROBLEMS!!!  and the nice window that pop's up on the home page from the Chief, asking for suggestions goes to a bad link!!!I only gave it 1 star because the review process doesn't have a 0 stars.DON'T WASTE ANY MONEY ON THIS THING!!!!</review_text>
I purchased this for my eight year old niece. We were both disappointed when it broke after only two weeks.  Be prepared to have limited options for fun without downloading it on your computer. The program takes up a lot of memory on your computer's hard drive</review_text>
I thought this would be fun, but ended up in garbage after 2 days.  Fighters dont stay in place and dont really move well.  Very hard to hit at other playe</review_text>
Dude this looks cool but plays crappy -pretty cheap plastic, mechanics are lame. You cant really tell when Superman is hit because his head barely leans back. You have to constantly adjust the arm positions of the figures so their reach can strike the head or chest targets -and it seems rigged that Supermans arms are just a little longer to stack the odds for truth, justice and the American way. Again, Cool figures weak cheap playability</review_text>
After receiving, putting together and using this toy with myself and children, I overestimated what it would be.  I remember the old school Rock 'em Sock 'em Robots, and this product isn't even close.  The old characters stood 6-8" tall and both necks sprung up with metal parts when a blow to the head was delivered.  This version has only plastic parts, the characters are 4" tall at best, and the 'win' is from a blow to the chest, not the head.  Metallo's head springs up, but Superman's head only nods backward.  It is difficult to discern the 'winner' from the set up.  It was only an $11 lesson for me to learn, but if you truly want a real Rock 'em set, try eBay, or yard sales.  This replica is not comparable to the original</review_text>
My 10 year old son got this for his birthday.  The screws are so deep inside the ball, we finally got so frustrated we just ripped off the foam covering the battery holder to be able to see where to place the screwdriver to get the screws out.  (The ball won't bounce anyway!)  Even then, the screws would not come out!  The lightup goal is great, but the ball is ridiculous.  Use your old nerf balls and then it's okay</review_text>
I purchased this item as a Christmas gift.  On the day after Christmas, I helped my son assemble this product.  It worked flawlessly for the first day.  The next day, I turned it on to show the boys' grandmother.  Apparently, the steel ball "wheels" under the "riders" don't roll very well after initial use.  The riders would be hoisted to the top, but would fail to slide onto one of the chutes.  If they did make it onto a chute, they would sometimes fail to glide all the way to the bottom, or would fall off the chute.  The failure rate went from 0% when first used to about 90% after the first day.  I've purchased other K'nex items before and never had a problem</review_text>
My wife and I were not impressed with the Caterpillar Tunnel. The material was flimsy and light weight. The tunnel is small and our children (even our 1-year-old) couldn't crawl through it without making the toy twist and roll over. Since it was not what we expected, we decided to return it and get our money back</review_text>
I ordered this for my son's up coming 1st birthday party.  I figured he and his little friends can sit in there to play.I received the package this morning and I was in for a surprise.  First of all, 50% of the balls (it came with 100 balls) were half inflated.  The shell of the balls are so soft, and somehow the air inside was not full enough; thus half of the ball looked crushed.  Then, I thought, " fine, I just go buy another 100 balls to mix them in. no biggie".Then, I inflated the pit for my son to play in. No more than an hour later, the main part of the pit deflated by almost half and the plug was still securely attached.  So, there must a hole somewhere.  This toy is totally unsalvageable.  I had to make a call to amazon and they have authorized the return of this product for a refund.This is a very low quality product.  I didn't expect kiddie toy like this will last long, but one hour is too short for me. I don't think I will buy anything from this Ball Toyz company in the future either.  I think their balls are too flimsy.</review_text>
Teething two molars and a cold with a croup-like cough for over a week made my little toddler ultra-grumpy and zapped his energy.  Poor fella couldn't even play with blocks or a puzzle without falling to pieces with frustration.  I was going to buy 100 balls to put in his baby pool from the summer, but this whole thing on sale was less expensive than a pack of balls.  He shuffles around, rolls the balls down the ramps, and dunks them through the rings for hours.  No mental challenge, no frustration, and it doesn't zap all his energy.  It's made with the same weak plastic a 99 cent beach ball is made out of and overnight the whole thing is visably less inflated--wish it was a little more substantial.  The sides are not sturdy to sit on or to be used to pull-up on.  At 31 inches, he can barely get in and out safely.  The balls are inconsistent--one will be thick and hard and the next is so thin you can squish the sides in a full inch.  We're not trusting it to last a long time under everyday wear and tear.  Our plan is to store it out of the way until the next rainy day, he's sick or worse, if Mommy gets sick!  No need for an air pump.  With two of us huffing and puffing we got it inflated in under 10 minutes.  Take note that some of these ball pits have free shipping--the shipping on this cost more than the sale price</review_text>
I bought it for my 1 and half son. He likes it. But seveal days after he had it, it broken. I dont know why, just no music. He doesnt like it any more</review_text>
I recently purchased this item for my daughter who has been wanting to paint.  I thought this would be great because the paint is in the brush and it won't be messy.  Although all this is true, both of us found it very frustrating that it was difficult to get out of the tube.  If this is made for children, shouldn't it be easier to use and should an adult really have trouble with it</review_text>
While the concept is good, there is no way to securly fasten the blue tubes to the main body, so they keep flying off and need reattaching as each child crawls through at their normal breakneck speeds. I would avoid it to be honest.</review_text>
The only thing "Deluxe" about this addition is the glossy foil cover of the box, which is designed to make you think you are getting something special by paying more money.Nothing could be further from the truth. This edition screams "CHEAP" from the second the lid comes off.Let's go thru the hype above and set the record straight on all the "Deluxe" features:The board is a quad-fold affair, redesigned presumably to allow a smaller, less expensive box. It has much less rigidity than the single-fold board of the "classic" version. When it is left out for an extended period of time, especially overnite, the ends of the board curl up and refuses to lay flat.The houses and hotels are completely featureless, just small blocks of wood. They looked to be dipped in some type of vegetable dye rather than painted. This is probably an attempt to eek out a few extra cents of corporate profit.The "bankers tray" and "property wheel" are flimsy plastic jokes. Neither would last under play by children much more than a few games.This edition is a sad legacy to a great game, and the cheapness of the set detracts from the joy of play. For the additional cost, all you are really getting is the fancy foil cover and one extra play token, plus a board that curls up at the edges: Whoopee!My advice: Save the extra money and buy the "classic" version.</review_text>
Rainbow fish has colorful shiny scales.  He is shamed into giving them to everyone.  Sounds like a communist primer</review_text>
I thought the art had a certain charm, and used strictly as a picture book for children who can't yet read, I think it's quite nice.  (Too bad you can't make up your own story to go with it.)  The moment the child starts to read, though--better hide it quick, because...Unfortunately, the book reads like a condensed Communist Manifesto for kids (as others have noted), or a Socialist agenda primer.  I don't know for sure that's what Marcus Pfister had as an aim, and I'm not going to speculate on his politics.  He has three kids and may raise them as he likes, and indulge in any such philosophical musings as float his boat.Yes, I suppose sharing is nice.  Certainly sharing one's talents and abilities for the betterment of others is a great thing--but in America, we get paid for that (charity is voluntary, not coerced).  Furthermore, stripping yourself of what makes you unique and interesting (not necessarily BETTER, just unique and interesting), or giving away all your possessions, is a lousy way to make and keep friends, isn't it?  Is this book implying that somehow friendship can only be obtained by placating envy (a negative personal quality that should be dealt with by self-examination and intent to change, not pandering)?  Is it saying that being interesting and having unique qualities is bad?Almost seems like it, at least to me.  Furthermore, there's an overtone of "only by belonging to a group can you have self-worth," which is as hoary a case of balderdash as ever I've seen.  Of course, people who agree with that egregious sentiment will disagree with me, but that won't make them right.(The two stars, if you must know, are for the art.</review_text>
My 3 boys (ages 4, 7 and 9) love their lightsabers so the idea of a spring activated version was too hard to pass up.  Imagine the disappointment when the fragile spring/force action is only good for about 3 tries and then it falls apart with no way to get inside and fix it.  We have 3 of them (Darth Vader, Obi-wan and Luke Skywalker). Vader was done before 9am Christmas morning. The other two are hanging on by a thread and now the boys have to be "very gentle" when they load the saber. The worst part is that the light up feature is tied to the spring so it does nothing now.  These are not rough kids and it's just a matter of time before the other springs get jammed.  Stick with the original light up sabers and forget the force action.</review_text>
Bought this for my 3 year old daughter who really uses it a lot daily.  The level of edutainment is excellent for her age and she learns a lot from it.  My only sore point with it is the lack of strength of the perforated part of the pages (for the spiral binding).  The pages tend to be separated there so I think it will be a good idea to strenghten the perforated part of the book or to use some other form of binding that will not decrease the overall strength</review_text>
I was very disappointed with the quality of this product.  I had to request a second kit because the scented oils bottles were empty in the first kit.  The second kit also had the same problem.  Both kits had to be  returned. It is difficult to determine how fun this kit would be when it is  missing items within the kit</review_text>
My sone received this as a gift and was very excited about it at first, but as another reviewer mentioned, it quickly becomes frustrating if you don't follow the directions EXACTLY. After a few minutes he gave up and moved on.I finally donated it to charity with my son's blessing - and this is a kid who saves everything</review_text>
My 11 yr old thought this was amazing but the maneuver wheels on the bottom will only run over hard surfaces and not carpet which was OK with us.  He did, however, run it over carpet and the traction wheel rubber pully snapped.  The legs are also quite fragile and after only 2 days of play, one of the legs broke.  Because of that, the spider cannot "walk" now! Too bad because its looks great.  We are going to send it back.</review_text>
Man this game sucks.  I LOVE SNL, but the questions here are SO trivial.  I was looking forward to getting this for Christmas and was very excited when I opened it.  It all went downhill from there.  I think the pieces are a good idea, but they're ugly.  The DVD clues are dumb and ineffective.  I was playing with my dad (who is legally blind).  He couldn't read the questions on the tv.  I think it would have been better if the dvd was narrated.  Overall, the game sucked, the questions were silly and it wasn't fun at all!  As an aside, I noticed that there are no African Americans on the box or the board.  One could argue that Eddie Murphy or Chris Rock were more successful SNL stars than, say, Cheri Oteri.  Whatever.  Game sucks.  Costs too much.  Stay away</review_text>
I couldn't wait to play this game.  I've been a fan of SNL for over 20 years. I was sooooo disappointed with this game.  The questions are horrible!  They are difficult to read and undestand.  The only good thing about the game is the fact that the game pieces are cool.  Otherwise, save your money.  It's not worth the $$$$.  BOOO Hisssss to the creators of this game!  You ripped off your biggest fans!!!</review_text>
In order to answer the questions in this edition of Trivial Pursuit you would need an encyclopedic knowledge of the minutae of SNL.  Most of the questions were beyond the ability of my family, who have watched SNL since it began, and who quote it frequently.  I was very disappointed in this game.</review_text>
We purchased this for our 3 year old daughter who loves the Disney princesses.  Even though we purchased it as a "play" bed we soon realized the poor design with the unsecured sides could be a hazard for any child.  We immediately returned the item and warned the store clerk on how dangerous the bed could be.   It's not worth the risk of suffocation for an air bed that probably wouldn't last long anyway.  I recommend you look else where for your child's princess dreams</review_text>
I ordered 200 hundred of these and half of them were squashed by the time I received the shipment and you can't get the shape back. If you want good quality balls spend your money on the Playhut version.</review_text>
These balls did not retain there "round" shape from the minute my 2 1/2 year old daughter played with them. The balls have that "smashed in" appearance and you cannot get them back to the original shape.  I purchased these balls to add to the ball playland made by the Moose Mountain Toymakers, Ltd that I purchased for my daughter for Christmas. The balls that were included with the ball playland have retained their shape, unlike the balls I purchased separately</review_text>
Compared with the sound sensation blocks I bought together to my 3-month babies, This product is almost ignored by them.</review_text>
Very disappointed with the quality.  Took 2 hours to put together then disintegrated as I was carrying it from the shop to the christmas tree.  I was not happy having to put it back together early Christmas morning.  Be prepared to use extra tape, glue, nails and screws to hold the contraption together.  The stairway is a joke and I threw it away as it is only held in with two 3/4" pegs.  We'll see if it survives Christmas Day.</review_text>
Without my husband being handy, this would have been in the trash on Dec 26th.  Took almost 2 hours to assembly with these small wooden pegs that barely held the unit together.  It fell apart when my daughter was playing with it on Christmas Day and so my husband improvised with stronger screws to hold it together.   Though she loves playing with it - we need to find out where we can purchase the furniture that the picture shows??</review_text>
My daughter had her Tamagotchi V4 for about a day when the screen didn't work anymore.  At first we thought it was the batteries but once we changed them I knew that wasn't the problem.  It would beep and make noise but you couldn't see anything in the screen</review_text>
This deck stunk!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!That is of course....if you didn't find the combos.I have won tons of tournaments with my Exodia deck.Once I entered a tournament with this.I found alot of combos.I deafeted two guys with it.I'm not using it again.It was pretty good. But hey, that's a starter deck for you.</review_text>
this is really the dumbest thing ive ever seen. YU Gi Oh is such a rip off. get something good.* Anime Princess Chick * - age 1</review_text>
Not the best toy I own.  I wanted to send it back after a week because the letter C wouldn't say it's name.  After a while it started working, but then D stopped.  According to the online demo the balls will say their colors when dropped in the chute.  Mine never have done this.My son likes this product and uses it.  As a parent I am disappointed in the quality</review_text>
I had searched high and low via the internet trying to find the perfect baby doll pram.  Good quality material, well made and if possible fold away storage ability.  When I found the Corolle Pram /Carriage I thought I found it plus the added bonus of a adjustable handle so no matter how tall my grand daughter was she could push her babies.  But when it arrived I was not thrilled.  What looked good on paper was not so in life.  True it folds away to store in a closet no problem.  But this ability is to easy and I fear the child will pinch her fingers.  All that keeps the stroller in an up right position in 2 lame flip over metal rings.  Now with the wonderful way a simple umbrella stroller for a real baby folds way, why wasn't this technology used on this product.  Sure an adult would have to fold it up, but I would feel better if that was the case then a 4 year old maybe getting broken fingers.  Also the cute canopy.  It does not stay on if you even move it to open a tiny bit.  I spent $113.00 on this item thinking I was getting a well put together item that would last years for my grand daughter.  Only way that will happen is if I can weld parts together and forget about ever wanting to store it.I did not buy this from Amazon only cause I wanted it right away and so bought it from another shop.  But I knew Amazon would have this forum and wanted to make sure others did not waste their money on this product.  Go with the other one for $33 at least maybe it will stay together.  Now I have to hope I can return this thing to where I bought it.  But I think Corolle should either rethink this items design or just pull it from the stores.  It's not what a good parent would want for their child.  Thanks & I hoped this helped</review_text>
This game was not engaging.  My son did not find it interesting.  He has not asked to play with it again.  You push the dice around to match letters on the cards or to spell the words yourself.If you want to have a fun game with more of a challenge and an element of chance, try What's GNU.  It is much better for beginning readers and it actually fun for older kids or adults.</review_text>
My nephew was very excited when he saw the box and the picture.  Unfortunately, the inflatable suit is not really inflatable.  It requires constant air to keep it poofy looking.  It is basically a costume that has elastic bands around the neck and wrists and requires a blower (battery operated) to blow airs in to keep it looking inflated.  The battery is heavy and will not stay put on the two inch diameter hole on the back side of the thin vinyl suit.  Everytime he moves, it pops out.  The fan is noisy so he ran around in the clingy, deflated suit for a few minutes and begged to be let out of it as the elastic bands were restricting him.  He loves superman and loves having a cape.  He opted for a regular white towel over the thin red vinyl cape the costume came with.I suppose we got what we paid for.  Cheap prices doesn't equate to quality.  I felt like my nephew got only a couple of minutes out of this toy.  Would not recommend it to anyone else... Unfortunately..</review_text>
The fan would not inflate the item....we ended up putting tissue paper in it to look like it had muscles...not good at all...a great disappointment</review_text>
Dont waste your money on this one. the picture is cute. but the quailty of the toy isnt any good. the frosting doesnt even stay in the hole and the box is flimsy it would never last with a child. the concept is supposed to be like the game memory,your supposed to turn over the donuts and match the ones with the same frosting. your better off just buying the real memory game. the only thing this is good for is the pretend food concept and even with that it isnt worth this price.</review_text>
The description didn't say that the board game was sold separately. I assumed a "Game pack" had all the necessary materials. It should hae said Expansion Pack. It didn't, so I had to go buy the original game. It shouldn't be called WB 50th Anniversary, it should be called "Scene It - Friends version." We played one full round with 2 teams and literally HALF of the questions had to do with the Friends tv show. All in all, I was VERY disappointed with this product.</review_text>
First of all, please realize that the customer pictures of this item are totally off.  This thing is a foot cube, so there's no way you could fit any baby outside of a newborn inside of it.That being said, when the cube first showed up, it seemed ok outside of the size, and my 2 1/2yr old son and 9-month old daughter seemed to enjoy it.  That is, until my son realized that the wires on top were bent in such a way that there was no way for the Elmo block to move at all.  Shoddy at best.  We've had this cube for a total of 3 days now, and already at least 4 stickers are off of it, due to not being placed center on the piece they were on, or just low-quality stickers.  My children still play with the cube, as currently it provides no real safety hazard, but the price I paid for this cube was entirely too much considering the low quality.</review_text>
Have this unit in out house, we have the one with one base unit and two mobile units.A few things to note. The ones we had do not offer rechargeable batteries. It uses alkaline only, or if you have your own charger you could use rechargeable but would be nicer if it recharged while plugged in.We live in NYC, Queens to be exact. We hear taxi cab radio chatter over this at times, especially at night. Also if unit is close to base unit static is not too bad but still annoying in bedroom, BUT if you have it one floor away, forget it. Unless child is screaming all you hear is static. on both units.Only has two channels A & B which are set manually at both base and hand held units. So if you have a bad signal in middle of night, you have to go into child's room and change channel. Just don't wake the baby! Ouch!Also missing a pager and a "walkie talkie" feature. They would be very nice. Not a deal breaker if they don't have it BUT it can be handy especially if your two floors up with baby with a full diaper and Spouse is in basement and you need more diapers from Garage.I am about to have a second child, and I am replacing this unit with a better one, I am looking at one of the new digital units that have the noise/static reduction. Consumer Reports gave some of them their top marks. They are however way more pricey than these, some are near $200 and only one receiver. But they all have charging bases and most importantly they are static free with AUTO channel switching</review_text>
It has a lot of background noise so you have to set it high to hear the baby</review_text>
Very disappointed, this item never got shipped to me, we waited close to 2 months to find out it wasn't coming</review_text>
Good luck getting this bed! I ordered it 5 months ago (with availability being 2-4 weeks. Each month I was told it will available "next month." I finally cancelled my order and purchased the Little Tykes one before my frustrated 3 yr. old outgrows a toddler bed.Kidkraft needs to focus more on actually manufacturing their products and less on marketing for orders they are unable to fulfill</review_text>
The bed looks very nice.. [...] when you have a toddler who is starting to climb out of their crib..This probably won't make it in the reviews but I'm writing it anyway</review_text>
This game is a clever combination of UNO and Rummykub. Very entertaining and can be played with kids as well as adults. It allows me to add my own special "rules" to make it more interesting. If you like cards, you'll love this game</review_text>
"Phase 10" is little more than an Uno knockoff--even sharing some of the same "special" cards: "Skip" and "Wild". Then, there are the so-called "phases", which can ultimately be frustrating for both young players, and new players. Example:Phase 3 is a set of 4 cards (4 of the same number) and a run of 4 cards (a straight). You may have the following cards: (g=green, r=red, b=blue, o=orange) 2g, 3r, 4r, 6o, 6g, 9b, 11b, 11r, 12b, wild. Ultimaely, the player before you draws a "wild" card, and completes their phase. You, however get stuck with 85 points.With all the flaws, the game can still be competitive and fun.  If you want something educational though, buy a Leappad</review_text>
I bought this toy for my son (the boy's version) for his 2nd birthday.  It was fun for a few days...until he went head over heels on a very small slope in our yard.  The toy landed on top of him, with his neck rolled and pinned under the toy.  He was so terrified of it after that, he refused to get back on.  It has been stored in our basement and will be sold at the next yard sale.  Save your money - this toy is too tipsey for toddlers and way too fast for them to control the steering</review_text>
Don't get me wrong...the concept of this toy if fantastic...and when it works it is wonderful....however, it sucks up so many batteries it is not even funny! It requres 4 C batteries and we replace them at LEAST every 3 weeks! Not only that but there is something wrong with the toy that makes it stick in the "on" position even after you turn it off (very loud and sqeaky". V-Tech knows of this problem but tell you when you call to "take the batteries our and turn it off and on 20 times to reset it". Well, that will work a few times but then the toy is totally broken. AND...their idea is for you to send it to them and they will take 2 weesk to send you a replacement....hmm....is this not a toy marketed to help children sleep...so we OBVIOUSLY need it at bedtime! I offered to apy them up front for a new one and they could reimburse me but they would not bend. Needless to say I am QUITE frustrated with V-tech!!!!!!!!!!!!!! If they know it is a problem they should tell you that on the FIRST call so something can be done about it!!!Another creepy side note....the thing says "I love you" in some strange voice to your child......SCARY!V-Tech has a great idea here and it is the best toy of its type...however, it doesn't work....looks like they came out with the technology a bit too soon!BTW...I rated Durability as a 1 and Amazon has it showing as 3 stars...hmmmm!</review_text>
Bought this for my 6 month grandson.  Worked about 1 week & then quit. Have changed batteries but still doesn't work.  Guess it was too good to be true!  Spend your money on another crib toy</review_text>
Complete waste of money!  I bought this for my 5yr old daugther and there is no way possible for her to program it!  After several frustrating attempts we finally get it programed.  Now the darn thing does not respond to her answers.  Even when I clearly repeat the answer in her ear she does not seem to register.  Complete waste of Money!!!!  Would not recommend to anyone!  Save your money and play with a rock, much more fun</review_text>
I hate this doll!  She is difficult to program, eats batteries and the tags which must be plugged into her body do not like to stay attached.  Within a week her hair was a matted mess, it took me an hour to brush out the tangles and is now braided.  I would not recommend this doll to anyone.  With all the frustration this doll has caused I would love to turn it into a shooting target</review_text>
My daughter wanted a Sewing Machine for her 8th Birthday. I thought it would be a good introduction to sewing instead of using my adult machine, but it was a mistake because the Singer Lockstitch Sewing Machine only worked once, when we first tried and this was it. I tried to work on it but it is so cheaply made that no wonder it doesn't work more than once. Unfortunatelly by the time we realize, I could not return it, because the box was in the garbagge.It is just a big waste of money. Don't buy it</review_text>
I am a seamstress who knows how to sew, and how to thread both top and bobbin threads.  My daughter received this machine for Christmas.  We threaded it according to directions.  It sews about 10 stitches then jams.  I observe that the bobbin design is such that the bobbin wobbles within the casing, and leads to a jam every time.  Don't disappoint a child by purchasing this</review_text>
some of these reviews are amazing, seems rather professional to me in most cases.these are just brine shrimp people, feeder shrimp for most fish.you want to learn how to keep a pet buy one, you want to learn how to grow food for it to feed off of then this is the starter kit.it's not a pet it's a food.</review_text>
The Pixel Chix 2 Story House was suppose to intertwine with other Pixel Chix products - I had bought my granddaughter the car that you were suppose to hook up to the house so that the person could come out of the house and get into the car and vise versa - did not work - returned this item</review_text>
My son loved the idea of this toy and was so excited to receive it as a birthday gift.  However one club broke almost immediately and the other broke shortly after that.  It is poor quality and construction.  Don't use it unless your kids are the gentle kind.  Most kids would break this the first time.  [...</review_text>
I think that this is a great idea and a very cute plush, but I immediately encountered some problems with the toy that I think are worth mentioning.  First, the battery box is very poorly designed.  Once you have opened the velcro cavity in the dog's tummy, it's nearly impossible to keep it closed again.  The dog's hairs get caught in the velcro and the battery box is too big so the cavity keeps busting open.  Now, if I handle the toy, the box keeps falling out!My second comment is that the sound effects are pretty bad.  The sounds quality is poor and it doesn't always sound like a dog</review_text>
My son received this as a Christmas gift. He and his brother and Dad were excited...got all set up to build it...and got nothing but frustration! These are really mechanically minded guys too. Very disappointing. I was especially surprised because of the Smithsonian name on it -- you'd think they would test this stuff before allowing their name on it. My guys never got as far as the reviewer who eventually got it assembled. The screws stripped and we didn't have the appropriate glue to even attempt a rescue. It simply would not assemble the way it was advertised. I am calling Amazon tomorrow about a refund.</review_text>
This is a very mediocre Knights Kingdom set.  There's not much of interest going on here, and the small castle suffers from lazy design.The colorful Knights Of Morcia are back, once again fighting against Vladek, the black knight.  Two of the good knights make an appearance here (blue and purple), and we also get Vladek, a dark soldier, and a skeleton.  The minifigs are as charismatic as ever, each sporting his own unique expression.  Vladek and his henchman have that cute "I'm evil" Lego frown.  Our knights are outfitted with the usual accessories.  Swords and shields, and a black hatchet for the henchman.The scene is a small mountainside castle that is home to a large scorpion monster.  The creature is constructed from a mixture of regular and Technic parts, and he has hinged pieces for an articulated tail and pincers.  The blue knight is accompanied by his horse, who has a cute mini-catapult strapped to his side.The scorpion can fit into his den at the base of the castle, which has a front gate that can be raised and lowered.  High atop the tower is a mini-catapult and a thin boom crane with a small barred jail cell dangling precariously from it.  The rest of the castle is just walls, floors, and a staircase.  This castle is very fragile.  Mine fell apart several times while I was working on building it.  On the whole, the design just isn't all that great.  Handle with care, and play with care.  Colors are mostly black, dark gray, dark red, and brown.  This set has one of those nice walls with the barred window, and some signature Knights Kingdom battlement pieces.This set works as an addition to Vladek's Dark Fortress.  On its own, it's stunningly less impressive.  The good news is that a savvy Lego Maniac can take the castle parts and build a better castle with them.My verdict:  one thumb up for the scorpion monster (who can be added to your other Knights Kingdom adventures), one thumb down for the rest.  Could've been better.  My advice is to get Vladek's Dark Fortress.  It's more than worth the price of admission.  For those still hungering for more Knights Kingdom action after Vladek's fortress has been built and conquered, this set is better than nothing</review_text>
I bought this identical bed at Toys R Us for $175.00. This person is ripping people off, do your shopping before paying their mark up and shipping costs</review_text>
We usually love all the Melissa and Doug toys, but these sound puzzles are disappointing.  I bought two for Christmas, the farm one and the vehicle one.  We couldn't open the back to put in the batteries for the vehicle puzzle (as the other reviewer said), and for this farm one, the sound quality is so bad!  The animal sounds aren't even recognizable in some cases.  The puzzle itself is fine, but I wouldn't recommend paying extra for the sound</review_text>
I didn't know you had to line up the arrows on the motor part so we installed it incorrectly and it rotated counterclockwise; my husband took the whole thing apart and reversed the battery terminals so that it would turn clockwise, then it worked just fine.  The instructions don't mention that you have to align the motor to the terminals in a certain fashion or it will turn backwards.  But once you get it lined up right it works fine with Hershey's syrup.  a Great starter fountain for my chocaholic 2nd grader</review_text>
Not only do you use chocolate syrup which runs off of the cookies, pretzels, strawberries, etc., but it doesn't even warm up the syrup. So, like someone else said, you may as well fill up a bowl with Hershey's syrup and let the kids dip away.  The only reason I gave this two stars instead of one is because my kids did seem to have a really good time playing with this.  They thought it was great even though it was cold syrup instead of warm chocolate</review_text>
This product is a waste of money after the lightbulb goes out and the lighbulb didn't last very long in the first place. Polyconcept does not make the lightbulbs available in the stores.  After numerous phone calls to Polyconcept (manufacturer) I have yet to receive replacement light bulbs!!!  So basically, it is now useless.</review_text>
I have since seen other similar complaints on several websites and have written to polyconcept.  I have to date gotten no satisfaction from either crayola or polyconcept.  The lines are blurry, there is no focus to begin with.  But the real problem is that the projector detaches constantly from the base, whenever you move it, touch it, etc.  The dry erase markers don't erase from the board; and the light stopped working after the second time my son played with it.  I can't fathom buying a new light bulb at $4.95 + s&h after a total hour of use in two sessions.  I think it's probably wiring; who knows; but it's a disappointing flimsy cheap piece of garbage.</review_text>
My daughter received this for her third birthday from her Grandpa and while it's a great concept and I think she would really like it, it doesn't really work. Erasing each drawing is nearly impossible, and it bothers me enough that I know it will bother her to be unable to erase old drawings and start new. So we're returning it for something else.</review_text>
Wow!  This toy was made as cheap as possible.  Shame on crayola for not spending the extra pennies to make this more durable and a better quality product. Great concept, but poor designers!  Steps aside crayola - your name doesn't stand for much anymore!</review_text>
The pieces of this toy (the outfits, etc.) all ripped when we pulled them off the starter sheet.  Also, the pieces are too little and get easily lost when played with and the outfits are uncolorful and depressing. In general, this toy is hokey and cheap.  I recommend Melissa and Doug's Magnetic Dress-Up and/orMagnetic Princess Dress-Up. All the pieces are wooden and are large enough to keep together.  Also, the outfits are colorful and beautiful and they come in nice wooden boxes with lids so that a child can keep things organized.</review_text>
If you can smell the chemicals being emitted by these slippers than your child is breathing them in! Also the chemicals are being absorbed through the skin of your childs feet.  They are made with known cancer causing chemicals. They are also manufactured over seas wher the DEQ,EPA etc; have no jurisdiction over the processes used to manufacture these slippers.  My two year old daughter was given a pair and they are now hidden in the garage. Did not want to put them into a land fill until some one has analyzed the toxic emission from these horrible smeling slippers. Benzene, Poly Vinyl Chloride, all kill the liver.</review_text>
I bought these slippers after reading these reviews, thinking "they are really cute, how bad can they smell?"  Well, let me tell you on Christmas morning they lasted about 20 minutes in the living room before they were thrown outside on the porch, and they were back at the store 2 days later being returned.  The smell is beyond awful, and is absolutely unbearable.  As cute as these slippers are for your princess, do yourself a favor and get something else.  These are horrifying</review_text>
Our daughters are four and five years old.  The skates will not fit over our five year old's shoe.  The ad clearly says three to seven years old</review_text>
I bought 8 sets of these mats to completely cover my son's playroom.  Of the 8, there were 6 perfect sets.  The other 2 had VERY rough sections that caused major irritation on my son's knees.  When I contacted the company, they gave me a VERY hard time about the issue and basically said they wouldnt do anything about replacing those mats until they received them back and could do an investigation as to how this could have happened.  They kept saying that they had never seen anything like this before as though I was making the issue up.  In the end, I was SO unhappy with their attitude that I returned all 8 sets and went with another brand.  Be careful and check the quality of the sets that you receive!</review_text>
I should have paid attention to the reviewer who stated this doll is a "piece of junk" and the only good thing is how the doll is dressed!Being optimistic, after the first purchase of the doll proved to be disappointing (she laughs adorably; she makes the sucking noise; she makes a contented sound, which becomes 'stuck' and the mechanism on her back must be turned off; she does not kick her legs; she does not close her eyes when rocked) I purchased a second doll and this doll was lessfunctional than the first one. The second doll cries continually. She does close her eyes and that's it! I returned the second one and kept the first one because she is more functional. DON'T WASTE YOUR DOLLARS ON THIS ONE</review_text>
I am a parent of a 9 year old daughter who loves dolls. She was given the Love me CHOU CHOU doll for Christmas (12/25/05). On Christmas day we were unable to get the doll to fall asleep, so on 12/26/05 I went back to the store to exchange the doll. With no luck I found that the second doll would not fall asleep either. I looked on the zapf-creation web-site under most frequently asked questions and received more instructions on how to get the doll to fall asleep and still the doll will not fall asleep.Apparently this is a problem, not only with the doll my daughter has but with other customers as well. If the company knows that this is one of the most frequently asked questions, why not remodel the doll so she can fall asleep like the instructions say? It is very discouraging for a 9 year old who has hopes of seeing the doll do something that is being advertised and it does not do that. It is also very upsetting to a parent who has to continue going back and forth to a store and hopes of looking for a working doll. These dolls are very expensive and should work like the instructions say they should.We have tried everything we can to get the Love me chou chou doll to fall asleep and nothing seems to make that happen.. I have even spoken with another parent in the store where the doll was purchased and was advised her daughter also was crying on Christmas day because they could not get the doll to fall asleep. She then explained, she had her mother a grandmother to rock the doll and guess what the doll finally fell asleep keep in mind this was not rock-a-bye chou chou. We have even tried to rock this doll with no luck of getting the doll to fall asleep.I have even taken the doll back to the store for an exchange, but was advised the doll is no longer being sold at the store where I purchased it.</review_text>
Bought this little cooler for the back of our ATW wagon to make it easier to haul snacks and juice around the zoo etc.  Cooler holds temp fine and the velcro straps go around the wood railings well, but this a totally soft-sided cooler with no frame or supports, so if there is anything in it, the cooler does not hold it's sqaure shape when hanging on the back of the wagon.  Looks terrible and I would have been better just rigging up a mini igloo with bungees or somethin</review_text>
Purchased this for our grandchildren.  IT DID NOT WORK! Unfortunately we had thrown away the original packaging, so I assumed that it could not be returned.  It gets zero stars from this household even if the form does require at least one star be entered.</review_text>
Lego is a great product, unfortunately this one's just a little too ambitious. My son fell in love with this and begged for it for Chanukah, but once we got it put together it wouldn't stay together to play with. It's great to make smaller planes with, but the original plane just fell apart under it's own weight.</review_text>
I would not recommend this product for anyone over 3 & 1/2 years (unless small for their age).  My 4 yr old son (36lbs) got it for his birthday, and broke the steering wheel within 10 minutes.  There is plenty of room for him on the seat and inside the car, but its been "parked" since broken.  I wish we would have spent the money on something that would have lasted.  The plastic seems cheaply made.  The voice buttons and noises are loud and work well.  Stickers have already started to flake/peel off after 1 month.  Consider a bigwheel</review_text>
The concept is perfect.  It is small but fit my bigger 3 year old okay.  The pedal mechanism is difficult to master, but doable. The steering is for slight turns not any sharp turns.  I rated this item 2 stars because the box was obviously opened prior to me receiving it.  It most likely was a returned item.  It was also defective with the metal rod for the pedal mechanism totally disassembled.  I fixed it but then the other medal metal rod came apart as well.  The product is very cheaply made, but the sound effects and look is perfect for a Batman lover.  I have written to EToys, and I will see how they respond.  My sons loved the car nevertheless</review_text>
This item had a description for ages three and up.  This isn't even close.  Now I'm stuck with a toddler toy for a five-year-old who is so attached to the fact it's a Batmobile he can get in, even if his knees practically knock at his chin, that I'll never pry it from him.  He's only going to be able to  even get in it for probably two more months.  It was a complete waste of money.  It's suited for two to three-year-olds and small four-year-olds</review_text>
Our grandson is barely four years and of average size for his age, yet the batmobile is much too small for him.  For a kid who loves batman, it is intriguing and he did try to use it as he pretended to be the batman of his imagination.  But after just 2 or 3 days, he gave up and returned to his tricycle. As a result, except for the initial 2 or 3 days of limited pleasure he got out of it, the batmobile has been a waste of money.  On the other hand, for a child of 3, it should be fun, I think, for at least awhile</review_text>
This was not fun at all boring and she only played with it one time Definately a waste of mone</review_text>
This toy is not good at all! its hard for the reflecters to stay still and to connect. its hard to trace the picture because you can hardly see your hand! plus it the picture moves, thats it! you have to start all over again. its better if you just take a piece a paper and putting it over the picture and traceing it that way, trust me i ended up just doing that</review_text>
My 7 year old saw the ads for DigiDraw and drove me absolutely crazy until Christmas rolled around last year. The look of excitement and happiness on his face as he unwrapped this toy was short-lived.It was nearly impossible to assemble. The time and patience it required to 'trace' just a straight line was too much for an adult let alone a 7 year old. The only useable item from this entire toy were the colored pencils</review_text>
My daughter, age 9, purchased this product after seeing on tv the many ways she could create images on paper as well clothing, backpacks etc.  Upon opening and struggling to assemble it, we realized that it was useless.  It is very difficult to use on paper and I can not imagine using it on an item such as a jacket.  I emailed the company to complain and after 5 months they responded with a standard - return it to the store you bought it at (an option I did not feel we had since it had been opened and used).  They should have just said "tough luck (...)".  Save your money, avoid this company and get a bunch of stencils instead.</review_text>
As others have said, this is a neat concept, but in reality, it doesn't work that great.  After drawing on it, you wet a sponge to erase it.  Think about a small child wetting a sponge.  It ends up a dripping mess!  Then they end up with runny marker all over their hands, which ends up on their clothes, etc.  We're good about watching the kids, too.  You really have to take control of the sponge and make sure the board is wiped properly before the kids use it.  The other thing is that none of the colors glowed very well and the kids stopped using it after only a couple of days.  Just a very disappointing gift.  Fisher Price should have stuck with the original Doodle Pro... my kids have had it for a year and still use it</review_text>
My sone LOVES this trike, but has not been able to use it much due to the fact that it keeps breaking. The first one I got had a broken steering wheel lock - it kept slipping into lock position and my son couldn't turn the wheel anymore! So I called Radio Flyer and they graciously sent out a new one(I did not have to provide proof of purchase or anything). On the new one, the parent handle would not lock into place. So I called again and they sent out a new parent handle. I replaced it and everything seemed to work fine until we went up or down a slight incline in which case the handle would come unlocked again. I called Radio Flyer AGAIN. At this point, they are sending a new one which Quality Control is supposed to look over first, and they want the old one back to take a look at it. I really do like this trike, but the quality is not great. If you purchase it and have problems, DEFINITELY call Radio Flyer to get one that works correctly. Don't even bother to return it to the store. Radio Flyer will send parts or replacements free of charge and you don't have to hassle with going back to the store</review_text>
Got a very similar model at a Babies R Us several months ago, but without the adult's handle. My son is almost 2 and can almost pedal by himself, and we generally like the style, but the trike tips so easily that I rarely take it out for him to use. Never would have thought to check this but I'll be in the market for a big-wheel type trike or one that is much more stable than this model.</review_text>
This trike in useless! Our 2yr. old tips over every time she tries to ride it. Buy something that's worth the money and safer!Now our daughter won't go near the thing, or any other trike!I expected much better from Radio Flyer</review_text>
I cannot believe Radio Flyer put this bike out! Every single time my 2 year old got on this thing, it toppled over!I actually called Radio Flyer, they denied ever hearing any complaints about this model (then I found out there are plenty of angry parents out there!) After some resistance, they agreed to refund me and they did.The back wheels are too close together, making it very easy to tip over, plus the fact that it is so lightweight makes it even more unstable.  I tried it too in the store on smooth ground, but on the sidewalk, forget it!Please save yourself the trouble!</review_text>
Very dangerous!  My daughter was constantly tipping over on this bike.  The handle bars turn too sharp and just dump them over.  There is only one good thing about it.  The seat puts the child higher than the pedals and they can use their weight to get it going. This helped my daughter learn to pedal. The constant nose dive however....was not worth it.  Don't buy!</review_text>
I bought this shopping cart for my 14 month old daughter who absolutely loves her Little Mommy doll.  She enjoyed taking the food out of the shopping cart but when she tried putting it back in the basket fell off the frame and she got quite upset.  Also, at her age it is difficult to get the doll into the seat portion without assistance from mom.  The cart itself also does not turn well when tried to walk with it</review_text>
My 15 month old daughter received this as a gift, and I have to admit she loves it, but it has nothing to do with the product design. She would love any toy shopping cart at this stage. She just loves pretend cooking, eating, and feeding her baby doll.This toy is so shoddily made it's laughable. Some of the included foods to put in the cart are actually just cardboard boxes that wind up torn and in the garbage within the first 48 hours. The cart basket is too small, the baby gets stuck in the seat, and my daughter gets frustrated when parts of the cart fall off as she plays. It's not going to last long. The best parts are the little milk carton and the banana.Check out other shopping cart toys (little tykes or small world toys).  We bought her a set of wooden fruit (melissa and doug). When this shopping cart dies, we'll buy her a sturdy one and add more wooden food toys (there are some excellent sets available). My advice is skip this one and buy your child something better the first time around</review_text>
I bought this shopping cart for my grandaughters age 22 and 23 months old. They love pushing it around without the baby seat, without the basket. In other words they are quite adept at taking it apart & rolling around the frame. The doll is difficult to put in, the cardboard groceries were put away until they are older. The other groceries are fine, the pouring milk container is great as are the pretend veggies & mac n cheese. They both put them in the containers. I am disappointed and was looking for a shopping cart that my own daughters had, that actually looks like a cart & doesn't disassemble so easily</review_text>
After hearing a lot of the songs used for other Fisher Price music toys, I expected the best from this one. I liked the songs included on the rom, but I expect a nice beat and catchy tune. (Like the Backyardigans or the Doodle Bops). These songs are performed in a dry sort of way. They aren't even as good as the Wiggles and my kids hate the Wiggles. It was a bit disappointing</review_text>
THIS VEHICLE IS NOTHING BUT JUNK. IT DOES NOT MOVE WELL ON THE DRIVEWAY AND DOES NOT MOVE ON THE GRASS AT ALL. MY GRANDSON USES HIS FEET TO PUSH IT WHICH IS NOT WHAT I EXPECTED FROM A $100.00 TOY.VERY DISAPPOINTED. I WOULD LIKE TO SEND IT BACK FOR A FULL REFUND</review_text>
My daughters are a little young for this toy and aren't that into it yet. It is very cute, with lots of sweet, tiny, realistic pieces, and I can see it having lots of play value and somewhat educational. However, they made it so the arms are jointed in order that she can hold the baby. Well, my daughter threw the doll on the floor at the doctor's office and the bottom half of the arm fell right off. Even if it hadn't broken, you have to place the arms just right or they look totally strange. This is the least favorite barbie my girls own. If it weren't for the arms, this would be a great toy. Oh, and the back of the dresser is open, so you can't really store the small pieces in it. Not sure why they didn't just close it up to make storage easier.</review_text>
I miss Happy Family. I have some. I like this doll that im Reviewing but mattel tell the Happy Family fans like me that this doll is not Midge</review_text>
This game is very difficult and lengthy to program the remotes.  Also, if you play it for more than an hour the questions repeat themselves so basically if you play it once there is no reason to play it again.  It's a huge waste of money.  For 30.00 they could have at least put a larger database of questions on the DVD or have more than one DVD included in the game.This is a BIG disapointment</review_text>
I do not usually take the time to write reviews on products. If I am not satisfied with something I would return it and write a reason for the return. The kids used this product up in about an hour so there wasn't much to send back. When I was a kid we had spirograph and it was a great thing. The reviews for the current model said that spirograph was just a memory and the new one was a cheap copy that didn't work. I am glad that the reviews were there for that product. To save money I ordered this low cost Spin Doodles toy. Five year old kids are always excited to open a toy to check it out. I played with them for a little while to get them started and realized that we had a box of junk. Why would someone go through the trouble to develope and manufacture a toy and then sell it on the internet when it is not really usable ? The gears and holder for the paper were a mess of poorly designed and warped plastic. At least the cost was low. This one was a waste of shipping cost even if the toy was free. I hope this helps someone who remembers spirograph and what a great creative toy it was 35 to 40 years ago. I guess the technology has been lost for toys with plastic gears.</review_text>
These were a gift to my 5-year old from his grandmother.  I can't return it to her since it would make her feel worse than the worthless product.  I'm amazed Amazon carries them !  A string and two cans would work better</review_text>
We bought a pair of these thinking they'd be an ideal gift for our 4-year-old nephew. They look great, and the hands-free styling is nice. But it's a good thing we tested them before wrapping the gift. They work terribly. We got very flaky reception with a lot of background noise, and we were less than 40 feet apart. They are promptly being returned</review_text>
While the doll is beautiful, I don't think she is a good representation of Chinese people because if you look at the picture of a close up of her face, you can see that her eyes are big and round just like a European. Her nose also is upturned.While some may say that some Asians do have rounder eyes, most do not and I don't think this doll looks Chinese enough</review_text>
I bought this product after pulling numerous items out of the toilet.  The suction cups never really fit securely to the toilet and after I finally thought I had it right, I found the Toilet Lock floating in the toilet like everything else.</review_text>
I completly agree with what everyone else said about this...Do not buy it!!! I wish I had read here first!!! We bought two of them and one stuck for 2 days and the other didn't even last 1 day....we tried for days to get them to stick and they just wont...we had thrown out the boxes so we couldn't even return them!!! I can't imagine why they continue to sell them!!!</review_text>
we bought this thinking the suctions would keep the darn thing on - boy were we wrong!  the suction cups are so weak that my cat jumped onto the toilet seat and knocked it over.  save your money</review_text>
I purchased two of these locks and thought that they were going to work great.  What a big disappointment.  They both continued to fall off within 10 minutes of installing them and they continued to fall off.  I just returned them.  Still looking for something to work.</review_text>
The first time my husband installed this toilet lock it stayed put for about 3 days.  I thought it came loose because he didn't wipe the toilet before attaching it.  I wiped the lock and toilet with rubbing alcohol and assumed the problem would be fixed.  The lock fell off later that same day.  Now the dumb thing won't even stay on for 15 minutes and when I do get it attached my 13 mo. old can pull it right off</review_text>
This product does not work.  The way the toilet lock stays on is suction cups.  They do not suction to the toilet.  If they do miraculously suction, my 18 month old can easily pull or knock it off with the slightest touch.  I bought two, lost the receipts and can't return it.  I would not give this product away because it basically doesn't work at all.</review_text>
My child LOVES Geotrax and plays with them everyday.  However, Big City Lights makes your track look good but doesn't have much for a child to interact; the crane has a crank to turn but the bricks are hard to get to stick in the clamp and besides a button for sounds that is about all this has to offer.  Unlike other pieces with Geomotion this one is a bore.  My child rarely plays with this piece except to watch the RC trains go under it.</review_text>
I ordered this for my 7 yr old grandaughter for Valentines Day.  Upon receipt it was not operable. The user is supposed to ask the "Love Ball" a question, and then turn it over to see the answer under a clear glass window. The answer would not appear under window it seemed to be covered with a dark liquid</review_text>
This love ball was very un-lovely. The messages would not appear clearly in the window, no matter how I tried turning it over different ways.Maybe it sat too long in the wrong environment before I received it. I put it back in the box and plan to ship it back</review_text>
Since purchasing this "Executive" set, I have purchased another one at a local store.  Although both sets are relatively the same, the instruction package with my second set is much better.  The sea monkeys in the "Executive" set lasted about a month and a half.  This was due to the fact that the instructions on how to care for them were very vague.  We did not know that you needed to add air to the water or that over feeding was extremely bad for them.  The instructions in the sea monkey set we bought locally were very good and we have now had sea monkeys for over 3 months.  I believe the "Executive" set is overpriced as well</review_text>
We went through the process of cleaning the tank and sterilizing the water, adding the package of sea monkeys, and finally feeding the sea monkeys and NOTHING happened. (...). Hope these are not dead</review_text>
This is a cheaply made, over-priced product.  It didn't last a week and I paid over 30 dollars for it and since I ordered it early as a Christmas gift - I can't return it because it has been over 30 days!!  The drawer to pull out to get the coin rolls out will not go back in all the way, therefore the coins fall to the bottom, get stuck, etc.  Total waist of money that I now cannot get back!</review_text>
This sorter is very light duty.  It jams frequently and unless the coin tubes are perfectly round, the coins do not enter them squarely.  I can not recommend this coin sorter.  I am looking for a better quality sorter...</review_text>
This toys purpose is to sort your change, and it performs poorly. In mine, the quarters get stuck unless you pour coins in one by one, which takes forever. If you pour more than one coin in they get stuck or little coins fall into the slots for bigger coins. In mine the quarter got stuck in the dime slot blocking it, it no longer works</review_text>
This is a very fun toy.  There are numerous buttons and sounds that my children enjoyed very much.  After you close the phone, it rings a couple seconds later, and the kids loved to answer it and pretend to talk to people.Unfortunately the two I bought quit working within a short time of buying them.  I bought the first one last year for my son, and it lasted for about a week.  First the recording feature stopped working.  Then none of the sounds worked.  New batteries didn't help, I even opened it up to see if any transistors had burned out or there were any shorts.  Didn't find any problems...it just refused to work.We bought a second one for Christmas 06, and it's already quit too.  We'll try to stay away from this brand</review_text>
My sons got this toy for their 1st birthday since their physical therapist recommended getting a push/ride on toy with a wide base for learning to walk.  While they enjoy the buttons and sounds and like being pushed around on it, I do not find it helpful for development.  The handle pushes forward and comes off very easily, it is not heavy enough for them to pull up on without tipping over onto them, and the seat is very wide and square so their legs will have to grow considerably before they would be able to ride it.  Also some of the stickers are starting to peel off and we've only had it a month.  For an older child it would probably make a decent ride on toy, but if you are wanting a push toy to help with early walking, keep looking</review_text>
The handle falls off easily so its not good for a young toddler learning to walk.The seat is VERY wide so unless your [small kid] has legs as long as a [grown up kid] its not going to be comfortable. The wideness does help with the balance of it for a child that would be pushing it but the handle popping off kind of defeats that purpose</review_text>
It has lot of problem, most of time it's cartridge will not be recognozed by Leap Pad.</review_text>
If you are looking to add a microphone to your product then just purchase the microphone, NOT the microhpone with these two books.  If you purchase this item then you are LIMITED to these two books!!  If you purchase the microphone you can use ALL microphone enhanced books!!!  My kids LOVE the microphone.  It is great to hear their own voice and sounds.  I give the microphone itself 5 stars</review_text>
Over Priced, Cheaply made, Bad assembly instructions.It's a good Idea, but a bad product. Very over priced. I would not have mined losing out on ten dollars, but 50 plus shipping is a lot. This was the most expensive toy I bought my son for Christmas. The bat does not fully swing, because one of the guides block it. you can't control the so called pitching, the ball is a magnet that sticks to the playing field. pitch it to the bat and it may not roll to the bat, hit it and it may not make it out of the out field. Score board dials won't stay attached to the paper score board. It takes two people to operate. it's the day after Christmas and this one is going to the trash. I can't send it back because I have attempted to assemble it. It would have to go back in the same condition it was received. I would not recommended this to anyone. My son and I are both very disappointed.</review_text>
This game was not at all what I expected.  The steering wheel and pedals are just for looks.  You actually have to control the game with arrow buttons on the steering wheel.  And many of the games had nothing to do with driving.  So glad I opened it to try it before Christmas morning.  This is one toy that is headed back to the store</review_text>
i thought baby would be much more interested in this. it's colorful and easy to grab -- but for some reason, it's a non-starter</review_text>
I recieved this itema s a gift. I thought it would be great I was wrong! The designs it gives you are really cool but the ploish that comes with this is awful!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I bought these skates for my almost 3 yr old who wants to be like her big sister.  The skates are good overall.  They are easy enough to put on and take off.  The padding inside is nice.  The only drawback I can find is the the adjustment lever that keeps the wheels from rolling on setting 1 changes by itself to setting 2 which lets the wheels roll.  I am not sure if I just got a bad pair or if this happens with all of these kinds of skates.  I will keep them but it does get to be a hassle to have to keep putting them on the correct setting.</review_text>
I bought this toy from my son for his 2nd birthday less than a week ago.  It is designed for the sandbox, but has already stopped working because sand has gotten into all the sliding parts.  It also has a locking mechanism that is too difficult for even my almost 4 year old to figure out.  But my kids love to ride around on it, it's just too bad the rest of it is so poorly designed</review_text>
A great idea, in theory, but I think this is a very poor design.  The wing nuts do not tighten sufficiently to hold the strings in place - they just spin around and around.  I will be able to get it working, with a bit of work and a few bits and pieces from around the house, but if I had given this to a child for Christmas I would feel awful about it..</review_text>
We have two new power wheels 12 volt batteries.  They take a charge just fine with the charger that came with them.  I bought this so we could use it as a rapid charger and it would take less time for the batteries to charge.  I plugged them in and waited a few seconds.  Both batteries had the flashing red indicating the batteries were either a wrong battery or bad.  This will not charge the batteries for me.  All it does is sit there and blink red.  But the batteries charge just fine with the original charger.  How can they be bad batteries if they hold a charge and we get hours of play out of them on a full charge.  Funny that.  Makes me wonder if it is a marketing ploy for people to run right out and buy a new $50 battery to replace the "bad" one.  If it would actually work to charge the battery then it would be great.  But we cannot get past the red light with ours.  It is going right back to the store!!!  It might be slower but we will stick with our original charger from now on.</review_text>
This is a wonderful toy.  I have given it as a gift many times.  BUT-This toy did not quack!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!The child was very disappointed.  (So were the rest of us.)It was returned.The experience was VERY bad</review_text>
I bought this for my son's first birthday.  He loved it!  But, after only a month it stopped quacking and he lost most interest in it.  He still plays with it a little bit, but not like when it made noise.  I wouldn't have wasted my money if I had known the batteries would only last a month</review_text>
My 4-yr old daughter really wanted this for Christmas, and Santa was kind enough to bring it for her.  The quality is fine, but it just doesn't do much.  She played with it for the first day, and has touched it maybe twice since.  I've seen these on clearance everywhere I've gone lately, too.  If your child is into playing "mommy", this is cute, but the extra money you pay for something that moves and talks doesn't really equate to lasting play value with this one</review_text>
My daughter loves Strawberry Shortcake.  This interactive doll and book are uninteresting and do not work together very well.  The book has to be on a flat surface and then still does not work well.  The doll and book quickly became seperate toys and neither are played with very often</review_text>
I agree with the other people who wrote a review...can't figure out the sequence of events or maybe stylus does not work.  Child not happy and tired of hearing Shortcake say the same thing over and over.  Save your money and buy a good book for your kid!!</review_text>
My son received this car for Christmas.  It worked the first time we used it but we noticed that if we forgot to switch the car to the OFF position when we were done the batteries would die.  Each time my son wanted to use the car we would have to replace the betteries!  The last time we tried to use it we changed the batteries in the car and the remote and it won't work.  So now it's garbage!</review_text>
I was also discouraged by the reviews but bought it anyway. It was a lot of fun! While it worked. We experienced the same symptoms as the other reviewers here ... I appreciate the info on how to fix it but should we have to? It's too bad because it really is a cute toy and my 2 year old loved it. I would not buy it again. If you are considering purchasing this toy make sure the company has fixed it first</review_text>
I saw an advertisement for this toy on the tv.  I was SHOCKED that they were still selling it!  Years ago, my young son got his arm trapped inside the hole where the balls come out.  We had called Playskool and they had us return it to the store and they sent us a free 'I'm sorry' gift.The one pictured on Amazon is the DANGEROUS one that many kids have gotten their arms stuck in.  If you look on the Playskool website, they have a newer version which offers a cover over the hole where kids like to stick their little paws.Be sure you get the newer version!  It is a super cute toy, and I am glad they have fixed the problem so many have had</review_text>
We bought this for our 10 month old son for Christmas.  He really enjoys it, but the steering stripped out within the first week so he can only go straight.  We have to follow him around and turn it.  Other than that it's been a good buy.  He can play with it inside and out.  He's 16 months old now and will be getting a bigger, faster 12 volt 4-wheeler soon</review_text>
I ordered two soccer ball kits for my two young sons. They were unable to inflate either soccer ball on Christmas day because neither of the accompanying pumps and needles worked. If there had been no accompanying pump and needle with each kit, I would have been better prepared ahead of time to have my own pump ready. I had to go out and buy new needles the day after Christmas. We'll try again another day to see if we can inflate the balls with a different pump</review_text>
it sucks it breaks easy and doesn't work good   dont waste your money like i di</review_text>
It says that it works with vibration, maybe if you are dancing on a trampoline. The kids are not really that impressed</review_text>
As stated by the other parents on this item this belt is a cute idea, but it is so small it barely fits my [...]. It will only fit him if he is not wearing a shirt and even then if he bends down it sometimes pops off. He gets very frustrated and so am I. If I have to re-velcro this thing again I am going to scream, and he only got it this morning for easter. I called fisher-price but they are closed for the holiday...I plan on calling again tomorrow and I WILL be getting some sort of refund....hey maybe I can score a free Field Journal. HAHA... Good Luck To You All.</review_text>
Although my 3 1/2 yr old loves this belt, it barely fits him. It only fits him if he wears it under his shirt as big as it will go. In fact, my 1 1/2 year old wears it very close to the edge of the velcro. The smallest setting of the velcro barely fits our teddy bear. Also the magnifying glass does not actually magnify at all, and the compass is just a sticker of a compass face. My son loves it for the brief time it sort-of fits him, but I am disappointed with the quality, and the size</review_text>
I brought this because  my kids love spongebob & ice cream..perfect toy, right? WRONG!  The ice cream oozes out of all of spongebob's cracks leaving most of it on your table and very little in the cone.  We have to use half a container of ice cream just to make 2 small cones and then I have a huge mess left in the kitchen.</review_text>
This thing took about 6 hours to build.  The directions are terrible and extremely difficult to follow, but I figured it was worth it because it just looks so cool.  Unfortunately after completely assembling the thing and flipping the switch the motor, on fresh batteries, didn't have enough power to lift the ball the almost 6 feet consistently.  We spent as much time trying to get the motor to do what it was supposed to as we did building it.  Ours also came with a special ball that had a skateboarder inside.  He looks really cool, but the motor never was able to lift him more than about a foot.  I love KNEX, but this set is a DUD</review_text>
Not sure what happened, but I received my daughter's gift in the mail today. There were no penguins in the box, and but the packaging looked original with no tampering. Beware, if you're ordering from Imaginarium! What a disappointment this was for us</review_text>
We've had a number of Gazillion bubble machines.The first - this one, with an upright rotating set of bubble wands - worked relatively well, but stopped working after maybe a dozen uses.  (Granted, one of those uses was for a few hours).  When the level of liquid is low, the machine stops making bubbles since it has to pick up enough liquid to cover the wand.We replaced it the next year with the Typhoon machine - this was awesome, produced a huge quantity of bubbles and worked more reliably since the bubble liquid is sucked up and put on the wands, no matter how low the supply of liquid.  It has a large reservoir at the bottom so you don't need to fill it very often - it takes a lot of liquid though.Our issue now is getting the liquid.  Gazillion liquid does produce the best bubbles - they last well, etc. etc. etc.  HOWEVER, very few stores stock the liquid, and except for when I first bought the first machine, no-one stocks large size bottles.  Even the online vendors like toys.com who are supposed to have them, never have them in stock (I've been on their notify list for a long time!)  I've ended up buying from someone in Canada on eBay - otherwise, buying the smaller bottles at ToysRUs, Target, etc. is just too expensive.Both of these machines don't really work if you try other bubble liquids - other liquids (especially the cheaper kinds in very large size bottles) are much thinner and the liquid drips right off the wands before it has a chance to pass by the blower part to make any bubbles.We're planning to start making our own bubble liquid and hopefully that will cover us.  Otherwise, the machines are useless now.</review_text>
Like all other sy - it stops working after a few uses and even when it did work the bubbles were NOT a plenty. People seem content on buying again after it breaks, but it would be nice for it to have some durability. It is better than blowing the bubbles yoursel</review_text>
I purchased this for my eight year old niece. We were both disappointed when it broke after only two weeks.  Be prepared to have limited options for fun without downloading it on your computer. The program takes up a lot of memory on your computer's hard drive</review_text>
I hate Monopoly, but loved the idea of making my own game board. Sadly, MYOO had so many limitations! I gave it a higher ED rating because you can turn the game into an educational one, but it isn't intrisically educational.It doesn't print out spaces with color bars, just little green squares that you glue on the board below the pre-printed color bars. The background on everything you print is School Bathroom Green. You are stuck with Lotto squares on the board (bad for me since I believe gambling is evil). And you only have twelve Good/Bad News cards. I liked making my own money, though.I figured out how to do most of the same stuff in Word. Here's how:I took the board from a "Your Town" clone of Monopoly and measured between the big squares. I think the individual squares are 2.5 by 3.5, but it doesn't matter, since your board may be different. In Word, I used a legal-sized paper (I think that's A5 for you Brits) and made a table that was nine columns that's how many are on my board) and two rows. Then I messed with it to get the proportions correct. You can fit three rows on one sheet of legal paper, if the return is really small, like 5 points. That gives you space to cut.  To get color bars, get your cursor in the top row. Type any letter.Then highlight it, go up to "format" and click on borders and shading. Click on shading, click on a color, then make sure it says "cell" and not text or table. I use only 15 percent for most colors. Click on OK and you should have a color bar. Type in whatever text you want. Then click below to type in your property name. On printing, I found the last squares were outside the printing range, so I will only have eight squares next time and will print a separate sheet for "railroad" squares.The corner squares are about 2.5 inches on my board. I would recommend you make them bigger, then trim to size, so you won't have any dead space on your board. Cut and glue to a board you picked up at a thrift shop or yard sale and painted or covered.The property cards. These were actually easier than I thought. Make a table one column wide and two rows deep. Make it fill the whole page. Color as above, and type in whatever you want. When you print them out, print out 8 or 16 pages to a sheet to get cards.For chance and community chest ... well, what I came up with was using mail merge and a shipping label template. Youjust print out on regular card or paper, and cut. The data file used for the merge would have your classy one-liners. I don't know about putting graphics in. Also, I can't figure out how to use merge. I did it once but can't figure it out now.Money I haven't been able to do. I have QuarkXpress and Adobe Pagemaker but don't know how to use either program. Plus, I wanted to make the money in Paint or something simple. Hope these directions help someone</review_text>
My title says it all.  The black balls fell off of the sticks within a couple minutes of normal use; therefore the toy was also a choking hazard.  The balls wouldn't even glue back on effectively because the ball openings were clearly too large for the sticks they were matched with.  Cheaply made and potentially dangerous</review_text>
Here's a quick primer for parents looking to buy science kits for the early grade school set (i.e., K - 3rd).  Every science kit, including this one, basically tells you to mix vinegar with baking soda and "Voila!" you made a volcano.  Nevermind that in later years some kid will go hiking in the crater of Mt. St. Helen's during an eruption thinking it is just harmless cooking products.  Use safe chemicals to make scientific changing colors? You guessed it -- food dye.  All these kits basically include a set of plastic test tubes and instructions telling you to open your kitchen cupboards.  Back in the Middle Ages people who sold this kind of hokum for the price it now commands were called alchemists.  They eventually went out of business.  Buy the kid a Suzukie violin or a football helmet instead</review_text>
I bought a pair of these phones for my 6 and 4 year old daughters because they love to play on the cheap phones that we were buying them from the Dollar Tree. When i first saw these and realized that they could call each other and take pictures I decided to give them a try. I have two complaints with this product. One, the battery life with constant use is like 1 hour and that was with the top of the line energizers and I could'nt get one of the phones to communicate. The pictures are a little grainy but what do you expect with a play phone.</review_text>
We bought these skates for our 5 year old. She could barely skate in them. They are too big and bulky for children just learning to skate.  We returned them and have yet to find another pair</review_text>
After the safe arrived my son was very excited to use his new toy.  Unfortunately, one of the key features the toy promises, setting your own secret code/combination to open the safe does not function.  Neither he or any of the three adults in the room were able to reprogram it to the numbers he chose.  He was very sad about it but after waiting so long for it to arrive by mail, would not return it.  Since it arrived at my home I have researched other reviews at Amazon.  You already have product reviews stating the same complaint.  This is not an inexpensive toy and it does not work as promised.  It should be taken off your item list until it has been fixed.  As it stands Amazon is selling a low quality item to young children and parents who are very disappointed.</review_text>
We purchased two of these safes for our daughters for Christmas and they both broke within 3 weeks.  Don't waste your money!!!!</review_text>
A torture device disguised as a toy. How would you like to spend all day playing on the stairwell? Might as well go lick some dirty socks. I think my dog actually used to drag its bottom along the stairs to relieve a recurring rash. Hey, Ma, why does Slinky go down but not up? Who's the genius who found this at the scrapyard? Most toys in the 1970s relied on mankind's perverse craving for repetition and/or irritation</review_text>
As soon as I got it out of the box and put the batteries in, it didn't work at all. My husband checked it out and we noticed that the plastic was out of place and the little motor fell out of it's place. Well my husband clicked everything bak in place and the darn thing still wouldn't work. We returned it the next day and got our money back. Didn't even bother for a replacement because is so flimsy we were afraid of getting another one just like the first one. In ALL it was a great dissapointmen</review_text>
This is a horrible edition of this game.  It has a limited amount of games and it doesn't play like the TV game at all.  Save some money and buy the old boxed editions from [...] or get the newest version...you'll like it a lot more.</review_text>
3 of my friends' sons have had this tractor. All 3 have complained of the tires popping right off, exposing the wire that connects the 2 together. I figured maybe it was because they bought them from another retailer or something, maybe rough housing? Though our sons are 2, they're truly not rough with these much cherished Cars toys! :)Anyway, bought mine from the Disney store for [...] 2 days later, after watching my son simply watch the movie w/the tractor, play randomly w/it- nothing crazy- the tire popped right off. Thank God I noticed before my other son, who is 15 months old!Good luck with this one- I'm on my way to write the company on this disastrous & dangerous product- don't purchase is my advice, unless you want a sort of rental toy (it WILL break within days</review_text>
I bought this puzzle for my kid after he solved the original cube.  I had read the review here and other places stating that one needed to be cautious when turning the puzzle.  However, our major problem with it was that the orange stickers (within ten minutes of playing with the cube) began to peel back and fall off.  We tried using glue (they had no stick to them) to put them back but it was not long after that the green stickers began curling back and falling off as well.The major problem is that these turned out not to be "stickers" after all, but rather colored squares of vinyl adhereing to additional stickers beneath (all white) by means of static.  They fall off easily.This is a nice puzzle for show (impressive on the desk) but not for actual continued use.  Hopefully, Rubik's can use proper stickers or adhesive in the future and maybe even tighten up the design so that this can be used as a fun puzzle</review_text>
Great company - Terrible toy.  My daughter got this toy for Christmas and waited all day for daddy to bring home the 4 C batteries which were not included.  She was excited until we turned it on.  1) the frame is not secure and will open when you reach into the middle to change the picture disk.  2) the light is not very bright and will not work in mid-day light. 3) the image is quite small - only takes up the middle 3 inches of the paper - not even close to what is pictured on the box.  4) the clamps that hold the paper are not easy for tiny fingers to use.  5) because the small picture is in the middle of the page and the clamps are on the far edges, you can't shift the paper to re-use the paper.  You get one tiny picture in the middle of standard size piece of paper and its a waste.The chalk board was fine - but the whole piece slides across the table when you push to draw.  Big disappointment.Get some washable markers and some tracing paper and don't waste your money on this suprisingly junky toy</review_text>
I have the same review as the rest.  Thankfully, we checked it out after we bought it and were able to return it for another model before Christmas.  The remote control Lightning McQueen with the regular controls (one lever for forward and back, another lever for right and left) was an excellent alternative.  I would recommend it for any child over about 3 1/2.</review_text>
I WAS TORN AT WHAT REMOTE CONTROL CAR TO BUY MY 4 YEAR OLD SON.  THE SALES CLERK AT THE DISNEY STORE COULDN'T SAY ENOUGH ABOUT THIS CAR, MY SON IS A HUGE "CARS" FAN--I WAS SOLD!!  IT NEVER WORKED, IT JUST JERKED A LITTLE BIT!  MY 2 YEAR OLDS FISHER PRICE CAR WORKS A LOT BETTER FOR A THIRD OF THE PRICE.  NOW I GOT THE BOYS FIGHTING OVER THE BABY CAR AND DON'T EVEN ASK FOR LIGHTNING MCQUEEN.  I AM GOING BACK TO THE STORE AND GET MY MONEY BACK.  DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME ON THIS TOY!!  THANK YOU.</review_text>
A one star rating for this toy is way to charitable. The car does nothing but jerk, and thats only when repeatedly hitting the button. Disney should be a shame of themselves for marketing this toy! Surely they had to have an idea about their product's poor performance. My advice is everyone should print off the reviews from Amazon and all like it. With this in hand, march into Disney stores and demand (1) their money back (2) an apology. The only thing less reliable than this was my 1991 GMC Jimmy</review_text>
My son waited 8 hours to play with his "Lighning Mcqueen" only to be disappointed. This thing is way to expense to only jerk around my kitchen floor!  My only hope is I can return this dumpy car because my son tore into the box with excitement!  Shame on Disney.  DO NOT BUY</review_text>
This toy is a piece of junk. I can't believe Disney actually did any testing whatsoever on this toy. An adult can't even get it to work. The car is supposed to sense the infrared light in front of it and follow, but all it does is jerk forward a teeny bit and then stop. If anything, it senses when the light clicks off and then it jerks forward a little bit. We read the instructions and saw that the car does not work well in bright lighting conditions so we took it down to the dark basement (as if my son should actually be expected to only play with this car in the dark!) but it didn't even work there.  BIG DISAPPOINTMENT on Christmas morning that we had to wait 8 hours for it charge, and then even BIGGER disappointment the next morning when we finally got to play with it and it didn't work. DO NOT BUY THIS TOY</review_text>
We bought the watch for our 8-year-old granddaughter for Christmas. It ran for about a month then stopped. I tried a new battery twice new but no luck. Cute wristbands, nice concept but the watch itself doesn't make the grade.</review_text>
Within the first hour of buying this product the second hand broke off and caused the hands not to turn.. was very flimsy and not well made.  I would not recommend this product to anyone unless you enjoy dissappointing your children!!!!!</review_text>
While I certainly didn't expect these drum sticks to be whisper-quiet, I found them to be quite loud for little kids' ears. And there was no volume control. Also, I was hoping for a more authentic drum sound that I have found in other toys. I returned them</review_text>
If you are a picky mom like me...i.e you DO NOT let your child watch "sponge bob" or "Scooby Doo" and you maybe even read Mothering Magazine, DO NOT get this book.I didn't feel the jokes were appropriate, I guess I am a bit of a nerd about these things. It isn't funny to have a headless man poor beer/ale down the "hole" in his neck. They discussed murdering Shrek (hey leap pad, not age appropriate!!!!), and I didn't like to see "human" Shrek in chains fighting to get free (nor did my son).They have "ugly" phrases that could have been more kid friendly, my son pointed out the ugly phrases, and snarled his nose at them saying "Mom, that was UGLY!".I was dissappointed with this book, and I am taking mine back to the store.I really like the leap frog system, even though I don't normally buy toys that require batteries...i.e the toys do something for the kid, instead I normally buy "old fashioned" natural toys where my son has to make the toys do stuff (blocks, leggos etc) BUT I REALLY love this system. It is a treat for my son to have an electronic toy so he really gets into Playing it and of course "accidently" learning.I also didn't like the Hop on Pop leap book for similar reasons, even though the Dr. Suess part was great, the leap pad people added unneeded "ugly" phrases again that were just NOT age appropriate. Although I did like the minimal writing on most of the Dr. Suess pages.I do like the regular "Leap" ones...moss lake etc, and the honey pot one with pooh bear.Sorry to be so picky, if you are not picky you will probly like this book.</review_text>
Ok so my daughter was 2 3/4 and not 3 (toy rated for age 3), but she loves Elmo and loves playing with this toy. It is somewhat loud an there is no volume control. Also after 4 months of use the pen stopped working, rendering the toy worthless. Also the binding is weak and my daughter has torn the sheets with normal use. So fun toy while it lasts</review_text>
As the other reviewers stated, it's difficult for my 5 & 2-year-olds (& their Mommy) to figure out.  Also, it's made of a very cheap, flimsy plastic -- which seems to be the norm for a lot of the Hot Wheels tracks, etc. Terrible truck with such great potential</review_text>
Our 3 year old son just loves Hot Wheels cars.  This transporter, however, is not one of his favorites.  It's easy to see why.  The back is difficult to lower, with it being controlled by a very small button on the bottom of the trailer.  Who ever thought of this design for a child?  It's also very easy for the child to accidentally get his fingers caught in the trailer when lowering it.The cones and barrels are easily lost and the storage of them in the trailer is badly designed.  They have a small piece of plastic that "locks" in the barrels or cones which is impossible for a child to figure out.I'd recommend passing on this toy if you have a child in the 3-5 year old range.</review_text>
My grandson loved this toy because of the sounds and the lights.  A month later it wasn't working at all.  We thought it was the batteries and changed them, but sure enough nothing was working.  We called Tonka and then they passed us off to the company that manufactures them...P.S. I still haven't heard from them and it's been almost 5 months.  It's not worth the money!  I highly recommend you buy some other brand of firetruck for your lil'firefighter</review_text>
My 9-yr old received this toy as a birthday present. Of course it looks COOL.  Against my better judgement of immediately returning it, we opened, played for 10 mins, got frustrated, and will now return it.  The boys were VERY patient adusting the straps properly to their bodies (it took 20 mins).  Seems like good quality wiring - I was afraid they'd pull at it while strapping in, but it didn't.  Must stand 10 feet away from each other (a good thing!).  The punch/block sounds are cool, but the boys got very confused trying to figure out who scored, what the lights on chestplate meant, etc.  It's possible that you must go slow and perhaps wait for 1 player to throw punch.  Then block.  Difficult for excited boys to be so choreographed and patient!  Block with opposite hand of partner's throwing punch hand WHILE squeezing a button on palm strap of your other hand.  There's some maneuvering to get used to.  But within 10 minutes, all sound/power went down, and we couldn't get it to recharge/work again.  It's supposed to recharge quickly so I don't know what the problem is.  Instructions say when nothing happens, change batteries...but 10 mins into game?   Hmmm.  Too frustrating for all the effort</review_text>
I just purchased it for my 3 year old granddaughter for Christmas. My kids played with it 30 years ago and loved it!  I am so disappointed to read these negative reviews on it now. PLEASE...someone say something good about it!!!  I hate thinking that I wasted my $$$!!</review_text>
My kids really liked it until it broke the next day. There was nothing we could do to fix it as it had an electronic problem</review_text>
We bought this for our kids for Christmas. Of course we open the box on Christmas Eve at 10PM to put it together and there are no instructions! It looks easy but without instructions we are not sure about the pins etc. Could someone post the phone number of the company so we can call them. Tomorrow morning should be interesting!Merry Christmas...</review_text>
My daughter loved this toy but the microphone stopped working within a week of using it.  Now we are shopping for a wireless microphone</review_text>
The "microscope" never worked at all. It is cheap plastic and very badly made. You get a few small pieces of indicator paper and a few bags of baking soda, citric acid and gelatin plus one prepared slide you will not be able to view with the "microsope".Very disappointing. The Discovery Channel kits are better value. Don't waste your money on this kit</review_text>
Extremely disappointing. Bought the toy for my son for Christmas. It didn't come with the battery ($30 extra) and the battery is still sold out everywhere, including online, almost a month later.Don't bother. There are lots of other great RC toys out there</review_text>
It wroke 2 minutes later after openning, my husbund try to fixed but surprice all the inside partes are "plastic" you can`t fixed. DO NOT WAIST YOUR MONEY</review_text>
TALK ABOUT A WASTE OF MONEY.  FIRST OF ALL WHAT IS TYCO THINKING.  $70 FOR THE TOY AND YOU HAVE TO BUY THE BATTERY PACK SEPARATELY?!?!?!NOT TO MENTION I COULD NOT FIND THE BATTERY PACK ANYWHERE.  ALL THE STORES WERE SOLD OUT. ALL WEB SITES (TOYS R US, KAYBEE TOYS, ETC) WERE SOLD OUT.  ALL OTHER SITES (SPECIALTY HOBBY SHOPS) HAD THEM AT RIDICULUOUS PRICES, WHICH DID NOT INCLUDE SHIPPING.I FINALLY FOUND IT AT AMAZON.COM AT A REASONABLE PRICE AND I OPTED FOR THEIR FREE SHIPPING WHICH TOOK LONGER THAN I WOULD HAVE LIKED BUT AT LEAST THEY HAVE THAT MONEY SAVING OPTION WHICH HELPS.MY SON PLAYED WITH IT ONCE AND HATED IT.  IT WAS HIS # 1 CHOICE ON HIS X-MAS LIST.  TALK ABOUT A BIG DISAPPOINTMENT FOR US BOTH</review_text>
I purchased this for about $20.00.  And I followed the directions carefully. Despite that, a coin slipped into the mechanism.  There was no way to remove it, even though I tried that as carefully as possible.I threw the device in the trash.  I did keep the plastic tubes that the holds the coins, and I now separate coins by hand. The advantage of the tubes is that they hold exactly the right number of coins, so you avoid counting them</review_text>
I had this this a couple years ago and it kept jamming on me</review_text>
I recently purchased this pad set for my #22 Radio Flyer Wagon, but had to send them back.  If you check the Radio Flyer web site, you'll notice that the #22 Wagon sides only have two wide slats.  When I received this pad set, I noticed the picture on the package shows a wagon with three narrow slats.  The loops to attach this set of pads are intended to be affixed to the center slats.  Since my wagon only has two slats, and they are wider, the loops were in the wrong spot and weren't big enough to fit around the slats on my wagon.  I'm only guessing, but I think these might be for an older model of wagon</review_text>
Just received my Original Big Wheel for my son and the axle that holds the back wheels on is not in the box.  I call customer service and left a message on their recorder that the part was missing.  Went to the website for faster service................ After you fill out the information, it tells you that you will have to wait 3 or 4 weeks due to high demand.  Try telling this to your kid when he is watching feverishly as you open the box.  Looks like the parts were just thrown into the box without proper packaging.  Thumbs down until I can get the parts to repair</review_text>
My son expected the tie to be maroon and it is definately purple so we were extremely disappointed and returned it! Amazon was VERY prompt in refunding out money</review_text>
This "game" is so disappointing. My nephew loves Spiderman. He needs fun and subtle cues to stay engaged. He was so excited to get this his first LMAX cartridge we could barely get the box open fast enough. We popped it in and had to wait until the commercials or very long intro completed. Then we had to blindly navigate through the screens to get to games. They were NOT intuitive and then THUD. He lost interest and has not returned to the LMax since. What an absolute waste of money.</review_text>
I played this at a friend's party, and it was a wretched party game. It basically consists of a person reading the puzzle in a monotone voice and allowing everyone else to attempt to figure it out. It is incredibly monotonous, and a throughly awful game to play at a party.I admire its cleverness. It took a lot of creativity and know-how to make up these challenging puzzles. But for the sake of all your guests, I emplore you: Hide this boring game. Hide it as well as possible.The painful thing is that out of a choice between Mad Gab and Lost: The Game my friend chose Mad Gab. It's sad, really</review_text>
What a disaster.  It takes too long.  Then you get a tiny gross little blob of "cotton candy".  It is quite a mess to clean.  Then the kids will cry because it is not at all what they expect and are so disappointed.  My 5 year old wants to know how Santa's elves made such a "stinky, bad toy".  Expect to be disappointed with this one</review_text>
We used the machine once, and were disappointed by the performance.  The second time that we attempted to use it, it wouldn't heat.  After contacting Roseart, I was told that I could ship it to them at my expense for a replacement.  I will probably not bother, as it was a lousy product to begin with.</review_text>
It was neat to be able to make "cotton candy" at home, however, the machine only makes a very small amount at a time, so it is a lot of work for not much enjoyment. It takes an adult to run the machine and watch over it since it gets hot. then it cools for almost 10 minutes. It doesn't even come with the sugar needed! The product should list it on the outside of the box..sugar not included! then you have to clean it (ADULT only)It would not buy it again.This review will not mark a 1 for educational value. It keeps giving it a 2 and I put a one (FYI</review_text>
I bouht this object and I think I would of rather bought a doll or something. I brought it home and it didnt work at all so we returned it and the next one was worse!! We folloed all the instructions and the sugar that we poured in didnt stick to the stick. even worse, the store wont let us return it because they say thats how they all work.</review_text>
it makes cotton candy in 30 minutes because  it has to warm for 10 minutes then it have to put put the suger in the middle then wait til becomes webby then wait agian to turn it off.PARENTS THIS MACHINE DOSEN'T WORK ONLY MADE WITH SUGER THATS ALL IT IS AND ALSO IT TAKES FOREVER ? THINK BEFORE YOu BUY  YOUR CHILDREN WILL GET CAVITIES YOU WILL ALSO SPEND YOUR MONEY ON THIS INSTEAD OF FOOD OR OTHER NEED</review_text>
With five kids under the age of 9 and four Leapsters in the house, there is rarely a time when someone isn't playing one (if not all!) of them. We have about 10 of the cartridges, and this was the most disappointing (followed closely by Spiderman). There simply isn't enough for them to do with it. The beauty of the Leapster is the ability to interact with the games, and learn while they do it. Watching a video on a 2 inch screen just doesn't cut it.</review_text>
Purchased these diapers(6/pack) and was blown awary at the cost. Took the advice of other reviews and purchased "premee" diapers.  Try to cut the cost and maybe other Moms and Grandmas will purchase your product</review_text>
Battery is way overpriced. Contact Battery Store near you! I did and found this same exact battery type(2-6volt Batteries) for much less. While there they told me I could use a low amp 12v Deep Cycle battery instead. It did take some time wiring (FUSED LINK IS A MUST) but is well worth it. Lasts all day and you can charge it at a 2 amp "trickle charge" with a "amp selectable" car battery charger. All told it cost me less than $60 for everything. It now longer just "Takes Up Space"</review_text>
Let's see. You need two different batteries AND two different sized screwdrivers. So after buying the 9V for the remote control and searching for a long enough screwdriver to open the bus to put in the double As... I turned it on.*HONK!*HONK!*It's loud. Really loud. Ugh</review_text>
My 3 year old has 8 Vsmile games and this is his least favorite. His top 2 favorite is Toy story and Winnie the Pooh</review_text>
I loved the concept of the markers. However they have left a greasy stain on my daughters clothing!! The package said that they didn't stain! I called and they gave me a long process to try and remove including Tide with Bleach..Is that one of their subsidiaries? I was very disappointed</review_text>
MY GIRLS GOT THIS PUZZLE FOR CHRISTMAS. THE FIRST TIME THEY WERE PLAYING WITH IT I NOTICED SOMETHING IN MY DAUGHTERS MOUTH. THE ITEMS THAT WERE ON THE PUZZLE PIECE HAD CAME OFF WHICH HAD A SCREWS AND WASHERS THAT WERE HOLDING THEM ON. THREE OF THE FIVE PUZZLE PICECS HAD THE ITEM COME OFF AND WE HAD ABOUT TEN SCREWS AND TEN WASHERS. THEY ARE SUCH SMALL PIECES WHICH I WAS SO SHOCKED THAT THIS PUZZLE WAS EVEN MADE THIS WAY. I JUST WANTED ANY PARENT WHO HAS THIS PUZZLE OR IS THINKING OF BUYING IT TO BE CAREFUL AND MAKE SURE THE ITEMS ARE ATTACHED TEH CORRECT WAY. I HAVE CONTACTED CONSUMERS AFFAIRS TO LOOK INTO HAVING THIS PUZZLE RECALLED. HOPE THIS WILL HELP ANOTHER CHILD FROM BEING HURT</review_text>
I agree with the other reviews.  My four year old received the ranch as a birthday gift - none of the pieces stay together - at all.  How do you explain why the gate won't hold together - why the horse won't stand up, why the barn doors keep falling off - and what do I say to the gift giver when they see it</review_text>
What a super-cheap rip-off of the original Rubik's Cube that was introduced to us in the mid-'70's. Seems like every doctor's office, break room,friend's basement,etc. had one of these cubes to kill time with. Main reason that I, personally didn't like this modern version was that after the first day or two, the colored stickers start to peel off. The Rubik's Cube HAD it's day. In this high-tech age, I cannot see many kids having any interest in this item. They might actually have to 'use' their brain. PLEASE don't bring back the Pet Rock</review_text>
We got this when our son was about 4 months old and at first he did love it. There was a slight rubber\plastic smell with everything in the Tub Time tub but we thought it would fade with time. Well six months later the smell was still there and our son ended up stop playing with most of the bath toys except the squirting bath buddies.We did all the precautionary steps to keep the bath toys clean yet they grew mold in a very short amount time.The Playtime tub toys were good except the teething sailing boats which also had the rubber smell. Plus the stacking tubs do not make practical storage because the lids are too flimsy.There are some good points with this product but I feel it is not worth the $35 price tag. Guess that's why it was on clearance at the store. It was the combination of quality and price that made me give it only 2 stars.</review_text>
I bought this toy for my sons 3rd birthday. He likes it, but the bean bucket is really light and only takes one or two beans to tip it. He does not seem to mind because he is so young,but as he gets older I do not think this will be one of his favorites. I have a feeling this one will be sitting in the closet</review_text>
This item was not at all what is seems to be.  The box was the only durable part of the toy.  I unfortuantely purchased 3 of these as Christmas gifts for 3 different boys ages 5 & 6 years old.  After seeing them open and what was in the box, I was very disappointed</review_text>
My 6 year old son wanted this SO badly from Santa.  Well, he got it and it is sitting in his bedroom and has been there since the 28th of Dec.  What was a fun attention grabber initially became a boring, furry annoyance rather quickly. It is cute but there are several things that I (and my son) found wrong with the product. When he is supposed to be sleeping his eyes don't close all the way...kind of creepy especially for something that looks so real! Then his arms that move up and down and are supposed to close in an attempt to give you a hug make a HORRIBLE grinding noise!  My son was shocked by the grinding and got upset that his monkey was broken. I explained it away by saying that he probably just needed a backrub.  What else are you going to tell a child on Christmas morning when his first choice present turns out to be a bummer?!Cute toy in theory, not so much in person though. I would not recommend this toy</review_text>
This pirate chest is a total rip off.  The chest is cheaply made and the contents inside are minimal.  When I ordered it as a gift for someone, they sent me someone else's order....then refused to let me return my item for a refund when I finally received it.  The company was very rude and not helpful in the mix up at all.</review_text>
The game has a nice concept, IF IT WORKED. I've been trying since christmas(over 3 months) to connect this game to the internet to update it for my kids and finally was able to update the firmware today. Something that you will have to do to be able to get to the virtual worlds,BUT THE WEB SITE IS ALWAYS DOWN!!!!! EXPERANCING TECHNICAL PROBLEMS!!!  and the nice window that pop's up on the home page from the Chief, asking for suggestions goes to a bad link!!!I only gave it 1 star because the review process doesn't have a 0 stars.DON'T WASTE ANY MONEY ON THIS THING!!!!</review_text>
This product is a waste of time! Don't bother. The handheld game is entertaining for my daughter, but connecting it online via the website is frustrating to say the least! Once connected, we walked around the "virtual world" with nothing to do. It is too complicated for my 8 yr old to do alone. There are much better products out there for children that are similar, but easier to play with. I would suggest Webkinz or Neopets. These 2 sites are very kid friendly and have educational games to play, unlike the Muichiz site! Good luck..</review_text>
This toy can't be unsed unless you go online and "update" it.  We have spent countless hours trying to "update" this toy - and ther is always a problem.  The website is down or some other technical problem.  Then IF the website is up - you go through the whole process and the toy still does not update - so it is unusable!  It is a complete waste of money</review_text>
Don't waste your time on this thing until they fix the bugs. We bought the Bratz one & it thought it was a Pawz when we took it online. After 10 or so total hours (Yes, I know what I'm doing) fighting it I gave up & took it back. Tech support is a joke. There's NOTHING in the manual or online help, only a link to tech support who sends the exact same auto response every time, and none of those responses addresses the issue.</review_text>
I purchased this for my eight year old niece. We were both disappointed when it broke after only two weeks.  Be prepared to have limited options for fun without downloading it on your computer. The program takes up a lot of memory on your computer's hard drive</review_text>
The seller shipped promptly but the merchandise disappointed ... materials/workmanship not so hot; my husband stuck his hand all the way through a side panel while setting it up.  Since there was no taking it back from our 2-year-old after he saw it, he now has a tent with an extra window in it.  Child is delighted with the toy, parent is not delighted with durability</review_text>
The parts of this set are not well made - light, flimsy plastic. The highlight of the set, the battery-operated hairdryer, worked for a few seconds and then never again, even with fresh batteries - I suspect due to poor connection. The cover for the battery compartment was badly made and didn't sit well. The rest of the items included are nothing to write home about either. I bought this for a Christmas present for my dd and sent it back for a refund</review_text>
The board for this game is a pain...half the time the tiles that cover the letters stick.  It takes forever and a day to look in the book, locate the letters' locations, and uncover them too.  I love Wheel of Fortune, but you're better off playing a computerized version where you don't have all the hassle</review_text>
I don't know who Dark Wolf is, but he must have shares in the company who makes these mini-rubber chickens.These are some of the ugliest, cheesiest and most poorly manufactured novely items I have ever seen.Do yourself a favour.  Get something else</review_text>
You'd be crazy to pay this price for a $3.50 toy. Don't support the greed of this vendor! Let him sit on these a while and you'll be amazed how quick the price will drop</review_text>
Do not buy at this price. Ridiculous!!!  Just bought this car on ebay for 8.99.  And bought another very rare one("Mr The King") for $10.00.  These sellers are nuts!</review_text>
All the above comments are SO TRUE! I can't believe the prices on Amazon. I too have been running back and forth to Walmart, Kohls, KB Toys trying to get the whole collection. I Am also missing Chick.. But, I won't resort to these tactics. The normal selling price is $3.99 - these sellers should be ashamed!!!</review_text>
Why Should I buy anything from Amazon when they Allow Price Gouging by third-party retailers</review_text>
FOR $50, THE SCANNER NEEDS TO WORK CONSISTENTLY.  WE WERE ABLE TO GET THE ORANGE JUICE TO SCAN 3 TIMES ALTHOUGH WE'VE ATTEMPTED TO SCAN EVERY ITEM PROBABLY A DOZEN TIMES EACH.  NOT ONLY CAN A 4 YEAR OLD NOT GET IT TO SCAN BUT NO ADULT THAT HAS TRIED CAN GET IT TO SCAN.  I CAN'T RETURN THIS ITEM QUICK ENOUGH.  WITHOUT THE WORKING SCANNER, I WOULD BE JUST AS HAPPY WITH THE $8 GENERIC SHOPPING CART THAT TRU SELLS.</review_text>
I recently purchased the Magic Touch N' Crawl Pooh as a Christmas gift for my best friend's 7 month old little boy.  I was so excited to read the rave reviews (with only one mentioning a mechanical sound).  To my dismay and disappointment when Pooh arrived and was started, he sounded like a car wreck was occuring every time he turned his head!  I was extremely disappointed and promptly returned him.  (I must note that Amazon.com does make returning a purchase extremely easy.)  Please be aware of this terrible sound that is much louder than the music that plays when considering purchasing this product</review_text>
i hate to write a bad review- i think it's actually the first one i've ever written. this was a gift from my husband's work christmas party for our 2-year old. the extension on the pole is a stiff plastic piece and doesn't stay extended so that you can catch the fish; it folds back on itself. so our son wasn't able to catch anything with it. it would be better if the extension didn't bend at all, but just stayed in one place, and even if it did that i wouldn't buy it. it's more fun to have a pole with a string so you can reel it in</review_text>
These are great little toys, and my three year old is obsessed with them! He's getting most of them for Christmas, but we've already bought him a few. They're die cast, so they are a good weight, but note that some of them have plastic pieces as well.Even though I like these toys, I'm only giving them two stars. This is a horrible price!! I honestly bought Sally today at my local K-Mart, and it was on sale for $2.89 (normally $3.19). Now I know when items are scarce and in high demand their price goes up, but this is a crazy markup. I understand that this is a third party seller, but Amazon should note with their sellers that there is a difference between mark up for high demand toys and rip offs. I have purchased Chick Hicks ($9.50) and Lizzie ($5.00) off of eBay, but I've been able to find the rest of the cars at my local Targets, Wal-Marts, K-Marts, etc. It takes time and searching, but it beats paying these prices</review_text>
Although this new release from Barbie looks very much like the real life singer, the doll itself is not something I would recommend for a child under 12. The doll is dressed pretty sccantilly and is adorned with realistic jewlerly.  It also comes with a bracelet appropriate for a teen.  The short hair of this doll and tight clothing does not lend itself to childs play and is more suited to a serious doll collector or McBride fan</review_text>
I bought her because martina mcbride is my favorite singer and then my lil sis gotm madded and she chopped of the head~7 year old</review_text>
This lite-Brite is a piece of junk! Don't wast your money! Maybe if I weren't comparing it to the older one I would think it was ok but even then I am not sure. I loved my lite-brite as a kid and wanted to get my daughter one so she could have as much fun as I did with mine.This has not left the box since the first day. First all of the screens where you stick the pegs are white not black like the old one so without the refill sheets it is useless.Also without the refill sheets the pegs are too big and they do not stay in.This was very frustrating! Even with the sheets sometimes they still fall out! I am really unhappy with this purchase and I can usually find something about a toy I like but not this one. I just didn't want anyone to be deceived into thinking that the screens were black and you could  make your own "art"</review_text>
I got this for my 6 and 3 year olds.  They both really like it (3 year old needs help remembering which letter goes with which color).  Of course they used up the 8 designs in the first 2 days.  Hasbro.com does carry refill packs, but the website is so bad that it is hard to find them.  Don't bother searching on the word "refill"! There is a form you can print out and then mail in, but this is kind of ridiculous both in waiting and in price.  The form is under replacement parts, but it doesn't even identify what you are buying.  After digging around, I  deduced that it was refill sheets: I think 10 pictures for 6.99 including some bonus pegs?  There is an after-market web site where you can instantly purchase downloadable pictures 13 for 4.95, but you actually print them (including the black background!) on your own printer with your own ink!  Ouch.  Hasbro really disappointed me on this one.  They shuld have included at least 20 pictures with the item and should sell 40 packs replacements online for about 5.00.  Thumbs up to the toy.  Thumbs down to Hasbro.  Also, the light bulb on mine flickers all the time as if it is about to short out</review_text>
I bought LeapPad Plus Writing on impulse at the store, wanting to help my son with writing, phonics, etc.He used it a few times, but I almost have to beg for him to use it...and that's sad. I wish I would have gotten the original LeapPad or perhaps even the Leapster.For one thing, the book doesn't recognize all pencil movements. A child could make an incorrect number or letter, and it doesn't seem that the LeapPad would recognize it. Also, the child has to keep erasing over and over, providing limited usage.Not only that, there are only a few books published with LeapPad Writing in mind, and the exercises are repetitive (e.g. writing the number 6 ten times).I've bought quite a few LeapPad books and Quantum Pad books for my son, and he is just not interested after initial use. I'm sure he's learned a little bit of phonics using the phonics books and such, but I think he learns more from workbooks bought at a bookstore or a department store--and they're cheaper! Not only that LeapPad books are very short...much shorter than workbooks you can buy.Considering that LeapPad books are usually around $15 a pop--and that Amazon doesn't carry/list them all and there is a VERY limited selection in Stuff Mart-type stores (at least, that's the case in my geographical area)--you may want to re-consider investing in the LeapPad system.</review_text>
Our family has the original LeapPad, and recently purchased a LeapPad Plus Writing.  I must say that there is no comparison between the two products, and the original LeapPad system is by far superior.  My kid love playing LeapPad, however the addition of a graphite pencil is a mess!  Once the pages are written on, you can never get them completely clean, and also younger kids have a hard time erasing it all together.  If we were to do it all over again, we would have purchased a second LeapPad system, and not bothered with the "Plus Writing"</review_text>
Just received one for my son's birthday. He loves it as he has a laptop like daddy. The quality is terrible, like another user's experience the right side of the device doesn't work properly and this is brand new. Apparently the sensors on the device don't line up properly with the go circles or volume icons on pages with them on the right side. I can't exchange it as I am not in the US so we can only play with half a book unless we experiment with finding where the right side sensors actually are. This of course is very frustrating to a 3 yr old as it really messes up alot of stuff.Also the type of pencil seems rally sharp and brittle for a 4 yr old.  PS the box says for 4-8 yr olds vs Amazons text of less than 4 by the manufacturer</review_text>
i though i hated yu-gi-oh because mostly everyone i played against summoned like a dark magician without even sacrificing  weird right :( so instead i bought the computer yugi the destiny 2 learn how 2 play im a very good duelist now  because i have 2 god cards obelisk and shining dragon so i bought this deck and i found this deck was unstoppable</review_text>
This is a great starter deck for any duelist.  With just a few booster packs this deck will become unstopable!  After only a few days of practice with this deck I had beaten all of my friends who had been dueling for months.</review_text>
My 2 year old already has the items on the puzzle pieces memorized after seeing them only 3 times.  Our version did not include the "5 ways to play" as stated on the box.  (I've requested a copy from Briarpatch.)  My 4 year old - who received the gift - lost interest after the first time he played.  Both of my boys LOVE the "I Spy" and "Can You See What I See" books.  This game just wasn't challenging enough for them</review_text>
My daughter (3 at the time) received this as a Christmas present and it took her all of 10 minutes to memorize where the pieces belong thus ending the usefulness of the game.  The game itself only comes with 12 puzzle pairs (24 total pieces).  I would avoid this game entirely.</review_text>
I gave this to my fiance for Christmas, who loves Sudoku and video games, so I thought it would be a brilliant combination.  He was excited, but has been frustrated by how not easy it is to play.  He can't always tell where the cursor is on the board, so if he sets it down for a minute, he can't see where's he's left off.  Then when he was playing in the semi-dark while we were on a train, he couldn't see anything either (backlight would be a nice feature).  It just seems this model is not designed very intuitively: he keeps wanting to press clear to change a number, but it clears the game.  all that to say, 2 million puzzles sounds great...unless it's too frustrating to play</review_text>
This particular Sudoku handheld was not as expected. It has only basic functions and the person I purchased for said it is easier just to do Sudoku on line or in the newspaper or in a puzzle book. Really inconvenient functions. May be good for young children, but not adults</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter's 1st birthday after seeing an ad for the entire set of Chicco Happy Garden products.  My daughter loves the Little Tikes set that is at her daycare and this looked similar but much cuter.  The eggplant has been a bit of a disappointment.  She would sit on it and rock for a few seconds at first but would quickly lose interest.  Now that we have had the eggplant for 3 months, it has been completely shoved aside.  It just doesn't rock much.  I can't imagine a child over 1 wanting to play with it.  The eggplant has very little curve to it and is pretty boring. I would stick to the Little Tikes set.</review_text>
This is the grossest blob of sugary water ever to touch my lips! How could you make ice cream taste so rotten? Bat barf I say!! Even if it was good, it is much too great of a hassle! It took my Dad over 2 hours to put together, and what did we get?! A tablespoon of milky water with sprinkles on top! I got this hunk of junk 2 years ago, Christmas. It has gathered dust on my shelf ever since!</review_text>
the kid who wrote the 5 star reveiw is wrong. he needs to go to preschool. first, the pagages arent free, if they didnt come w/the maker no one would buy it. second, this kid says it cant get any better, but it cant get any worse!!!! the 1 star reveiws say to go to mc donalds if you want a mc flurry, but dont go there and support them thats just what they want you to do so they can earn more money!! go to DQ or just make one yourself. DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS PEICE OF JUNK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
My daughter wanted this for Christmas more than anything.  But the doll is very difficult to use.  Suzie has these sudden shutdowns where she turns off for no apparent reason.  Then suddenly she'll come back to life later.  She "grows" almost instantly.  Despite my best efforts to try and protect the grow button.  I reset her constantly.  Getting her to do all of the fun "big girl" things she is suppossed to do  is frustrating for my five year old.  Essentially, I have spent more time fiddling with Suzie than my daughter has spent playing with her.  And the face paint came off almost immediately.  Even with the small amount of time that she has been working.  Perhaps when my daugter is a little older, she can spend time fiddling with her.  She does play with her as just a "baby doll" so it hasn't been a total waste.  But I certainly didn't need to spend the extra money for all of the electronics that don't work.  Oh, and sometimes I'll walk into my daughters room and she'll suddenly "wake up" and start saying MaMa.  Very horror movieish.</review_text>
I purchase this by the picture inside it shows little closet type places and a bar for hanging clothes, none if this is there, its cute but I would not recommand this procduct.  the picture of the inside is false. It's not even close.</review_text>
Thanks to those of you who reviewed this..I WON'T waste my money.  I too remember the good old days when the clasp was metal and you could load up the case and it stayed shut.  I'll stick to plastic tubs that click closed and allow you to see inside.  Too bad Barbie/Mattel is missing a great money-maker by going cheap on quality</review_text>
I purchased two of these cases for my daughters, ages 5 and 7, but we were all disappointed with them.  It supposedly holds 3 barbies and their accessories, but they are hard to close if you put that much stuff in.  They also come apart everytime the girls open them, and they are hard for the girls to put back together.  They are good for keeping all the little Barbie accessories out of the way.  I just wish they were better quality.  A friend of mine has a soft plastic case for her daughter (with a zipper), and she says it is great, but I have not been able to find that item anywhere</review_text>
I found this toy to be a waste of money.  It was hard for my five year old to close or put more than two things in it.  It says it holds three barbie's and cloths but then how do you close it</review_text>
My cousin bought this for my daughter thinking she would have hours of fun making braclets and necklaces. However, she can not even use the gift.  You need to buy the Totally Beadifully Jewelry Maker to use this kit.  No where in the online description of this toy on Amazon does it tell you this.  Toy is being returned b/c we don't have the bead maker</review_text>
All the cut shapes are the same, so it's very easy for my 3-1/2 year old to force pieces in the wrong place. The pieces also seem thin and flimsy. The coolest thing about the puzzle is the lunchbox/carrycase. All in all, the quality is much less than I expect from Ravensburger .The Ravensburger "Thomas Giant Floor Puzzle (24 Pc)" is a far superior product, but no longer complex enough for my kid</review_text>
My 7 year old son received the Giga Ball for Christmas. It was a big hit. He and all of his cousins had a great time with it for several hours. Unfortunately, the very next day, it pretty much fell apart. I didn't expect it would last very long, but had hoped that it would last more than one day</review_text>
What a waste of time to air this up.  It developed leaks in less time to it took to enter the credit card info to order it.  This was the worst gift because it had such a high expectation but turned into the biggest disappointment.  The vinyl was so thin that rolling it over normal bermuda grass created holes from small seed pods and sticks.  Save your money..</review_text>
This toy looks great in the ad but it took us 2 hours to blow  the dozen or so chambers up.  The instructions were terrible.  You have to force too much air into one chamber so that it will go into the next.  The chambers do not stay inflated and some don't work at all.  My son does still have fun with it but I wouldn't buy it again</review_text>
My son received this as a gift when he was 15 months old--He was already much too tall for the toy!  The box advertizes height adjustment, which simply allows you to lift it up about a half an inch.  However, even if he were smaller, the base does not even come close to providing the necessary stability to stand up to even a soft swing!  My son was amused by the lights and sounds for a brief period of time, but quickly lost complete interest in the toy.</review_text>
The only good thing about this kit is that your child can get some joy out of painting a few volcanoes on a cheap plastic sheet.  But the real promise of this kit--to see a model volcano erupt--may not be fulfilled.  We followed all the steps and got tripped by a poorly designed base (above mentioned cheap plastic sheet) that is extremely difficult to balance on 4 ill-fitting stilts.  A poor experience for the kids.  The eruption was more of a fizzle.  Waste of money and time</review_text>
My little brother received this toy as a present, and constantly had problems just keeping the toy together. He barely had any fun with it, since it fell apart most of the time. My brother is generally good with toys, and he has fun with practically anything, but this toy proved to be the exception. You could buy something much more fun for the same amount of money</review_text>
If you are planning on getting a good deck then do not waste your time with this..it has the essentials, sure, but your money is better spent at one of the 4 "STRUCTURE DECKS"!! They are much better than this..I can say so beacuse my sis owns this deck and I can beat her every time :) Konami needs to put some better stuff in this deck - like Senju of the Thousand Hands X 2. Also they need to take away the change of heart since it's "advanced" forbidden. but still, this deck deserves an OK rating since it has all the essentials..this is no better than the first yugi starter deck. So if you ALREADY have a starter deck, do not get this as it is not worth it - a lot of weak non effect monsters.</review_text>
I recieved the car and set it up according to the manufacturers  instructions and it didn't work! I contacted the manufacturer and they mailed me a shipping return label and I returned it to them. I am awaiting a new or fixed car back from them</review_text>
This car pictured could be a BASE or First Version defintely not worth 299.00 These are going for 100.00 and less on the web.If you havent noticed the differences in the packaging it wouldnt suprise me. Lots of people dont notice. Heres the differences below...On these 5 cars there is TWO versions of each driver(5 different drivers) that were made. First versions or BASE version and Second versions or "Added Features" Version.The FIRST versions have NO "added features" stickers and you CANNOT race ANY TWO (or more) cars of the 5 different drivers' cars at the same time! Dale Sr. and Dale Jr.,  Jeff Gordon, Jimmie Johnson and Tony Stewart cars of the FIRST versions (no added features) CANNOT race together! Transmitter frequencys cannot be changed. Speed and steering are straight function. (no varilable anything) They either turn right FULL turn or left FULL turn or it goes straight. Speed is either it goes FULL ON or it doesnt. Same for reverse gear.Again, each of the 5 different drivers' cars made are two different versions of the same car one has more features than the other.UPDATED or "ADDED FEATURES" versions have "ADDED FEATURES" stickers.Those "Added Features" are...Digital proportional steering (variable steering), which means you can turn the transmitter wheel slightly and the car turns a little. Turn the transmitter wheel alot and the car turns alot.Variable speed control  this means you pull back on the trigger a little the car moves a little, pull back on the trigger all the way and the car takes off! This also works for reverse gears as wellNow if this isnt cool enough...Each "Added Features" car has  DIFFERENT Frequencies for different drivers' car.  The transmitters for the cars are different as well. "ADDED FEATURES" version transmitter has two "trim" adjustments on the back of the remote as well as the Frequency Chip on the side of the remote than can be changed, and can also be changed on the chassis of the car. So if you own 2 of the Tony Stewart cars, you would have to have a Frequency pack to race them at the same time. Now, two or more different drivers' cars can race together (or Five people can race 5 different cars). NO TWO ALIKE CARS can race together UNLESS you have the "frequency of another car and transmitter"  to change it, or a "Frequency Pack" from Team Up Inc.ALL 5 Frequency Chips DO NOT come with the car in the box, off the shelf. This "Frequency pack" is sold seperately!You can also purchase tires, suspension parts and body hold down clips, fully painted and ready to use new spare OR other drivers' teams bodies, extra rechargeable battery packs seperately!I have done lots of research on these cars and should you have any questions please ask...nascarnbroncosfans@msn.co</review_text>
Anxiously awaited this very expensive box of cards mostly for the special insert cards but there was only the Autograph card and NO MEMORABILIA CARD. You cannot realize the disappointment one feels when this happens. You look and look, searching through the wrappers and identify each card hoping that you missed it somehow, but no. No Memorabilia Card as promised right on the box and in all advertised articles. Of course, the Topps Company doesn't have a website for me to complain to but this did turn out to be a surefire way to find another hobby!  Thanks.</review_text>
This toy does not work.  I do not recommend it.  There is no quality to the workmanship.  A total disappointmen</review_text>
This is not really a practical toy. My son gets discouraged, because you have to press on the keys really hard and in order to follow the music you have to be rough. It's like playing musical chairs with 5 bullies and a moving floor</review_text>
The doll is ok, not as good as one expect after seeing it online. Anyway, for 6$ (including shiping) is worth</review_text>
I had to return this product for my son because I couldn't get  his name which is unique. If they make a product they should have something on it to make unique names by typing it in if it's not on the list. I mean there are more and more unique name sout there and there sure will be more. If i was a rich person I am sure I could have had one made just for him. Get witht the real world people and make things so unique people can have things too.</review_text>
My 5-1/2 year old son received this for Christmas.  He loves pirates and legos, so it seemed a perfect fit.  We were wrong!The Mega Bloks are poorly made, and it's very difficult (even for an adult) to get the pieces to stay together.  Imagine how frustrating this is for a child.....we will never purchase Mega Bloks products again, we're sticking to the original LEGOs!Nothing more satisfying than spending money on a gift that makes your child scream and cry in frustration...thanks MegaBloks</review_text>
I bought this as a gift for my nephew. Unfortunately it didn't work when it arrived, but fortunately my sister in law was able to take it to a local discovery store and exchange it for one that worked fine</review_text>
I bought these for my 13-year old niece, who loves percussion, and was so excited to get them for Christmas. They looked like a great buy.Well, the disappointment was palpable two hours later. We got them hooked up, installed appropriate batteries etc., and the light was on, but we could not get any sound from the drumsticks at all. Which was a bummer, but OK, if we could simply either (1) get help or (2) easily replace them.Nope.  The "instructions" were a tiny folded sheet of paper, there is absolutely no troubleshooting, no help, no nothing.  I went through everything that came with them but could find anything to help us on next steps or returns, etc.  I finally retrieved the original plastic packaging and found a URL in tiny letters for the company. But when I went there, the site again offered no help, tips, or troubleshooting (just a PDF of the really awful original instructions).There is video on the website showing someone playing the drumsticks but this was no help to us in trying to troubleshoot (except to mildly disappoint my niece when she realized that you have to drum "in the air" to get the best results -- which we did try, with no luck or sound, again).I next e-mailed the company and got no response. I e-mailed them again and -- seven days later -- the e-mail (in badly worded English) simply asked me if we had tried "plugging in the head phones." Seriously.Anyway, do NOT waste your money. A terrible product, no support, and no recourse if it doesn't work as it should</review_text>
The videos are not useable except in the Leapfrog Leapster.  I did not know that until I received the order!  Thanks alot Leapfrog.</review_text>
The hide n seek care bear really wasn't all it was made out to be. My kids played with it, with my husband, on Christmas, and they all gave up after 5 minutes. It was giving out wrong directions, and just wasn't really a good substitute for a game of hide and seek. So my girls forgot about the remote control and play with the doll like it's an ordinary stuffed animal--an rather expensive stuffed animal</review_text>
Spongebob IS  making an obscene gesture.  Personally, I don't think it is an appropriate toy for children.  Anyone that thinks Spongebob is merely "pointing" a finger shouldn't be so naive as to how toys are marketed and the moral decline of our society!!</review_text>
It is just like Mr. Potato Head except not as many pieces.  There aren't very many options to dress SBSP, but he is always a fun toy.  After a year of play, he is a little torn at the edges, but overall in good shape.</review_text>
I should have paid more attention to the reviews. He is top heavy. There's also no way to store the extra parts like Mr. Potato Head. But I love Spongebob anyway and he's now a part of my collection.</review_text>
Kids played it one time and haven't touched it since.  Bought the extra tower attachment which was a complete waste of money.</review_text>
Well, the toy just does not perform the way it's suposed to. They don't fly high in the arena and hardly EVER knock eachother out as they are suposed to do. VERY unhappy with product. HUGE disappointment for my 6 and 8 year old sons!</review_text>
This is a cute idea, and a cute design, BUT! It is not realistic! When you put your babydoll inside, it takes a bit, esp. for a child to get the sling hanging around neck correctly and turned right, then, the poor baby doll falls, directly out of it, no back support on it, the only way she stays in is if your hands never leave her! So if the price, which is on sale right now, lures you, I would suggest an older child, rather than , say 3, or so, my 3 year old, doesnt like it, and for her abilities, I dont like it either, but now, my 6 year old, she can do it, when she is being patient enough! Only 2 stars given, for its cuteness and price at the moment, otherwise too difficult and unsupportive to suit my girls:)</review_text>
After reading the other reviews of this product, I felt confident enough to go ahead and buy it as a gift for an 8 year old boy. He is learning multiplication tables now, so I figured this was a great present.Unfortunately, once the batteries were in, it kept malfunctioning and when the dials were twisted to 2 numbers, it would read out two totally different numbers and give their result instead of the 2 numbers the dials showed. We tried over and over to get it to work, but it is a DUD!I live overseas so returning it is not an option I am willing to pay the extra freight/duty for. I bought another Leap Frog product at the same time that I have not given as a present yet, I really hope it works</review_text>
I purchased the Twist & Shout Multiplication for my grandaughter who is 8 years old.  She has not put it down since she received it.  However mine was malfunctioned and would not give multiple choices.  It would only ask the question and then gave the answer. She was hesitant to give it up when I explained I needed to exchange it for another.  This is the only toy she has that has held her interest for long periods of time.  She nows brags to friends that she knows her multiplication tables</review_text>
THIS GAME IS EDUCATIONAL BECAUSE U R ASKING QUESTION`S TO OTHER PEOPLEAND IF THIER WRONG THEY HEAR THE ANWSER ANYWAY SO I THINK U SHOULD BUY THIS GAME BECAUSE IT WILL TEACH UR KIDS ALOT.I WISH ALL U PARENTS AND CHILDREN GOOD LUCK</review_text>
I purchased two of these hand held Deal or No Deal games for my two 8 year old twin boys. The boys found that they had trouble indicating that they'd like to "Take the Deal".  When the pressed the button to say "Yes" to the deal, the game continued as if they said "No Deal".  They got annoyed, but kept on playing.  I tried the game, thinking that they did something wrong, but I also had the same problem.  I'm annoyed because the game was $20 each and I think it doesn't work properly!</review_text>
If you run a spellcaster deck, buy the good cards individually because in my opinion, I rarely get good cards out of this booster</review_text>
Education 5/5This game is educational1. Making friends2. Adding, Subtracting, and Thinking3. Having funDurability 2/5They can get damaged easilybuy card sleevesthey are only $5.00they can prevent $50.00 worth of damage~~~ABOUT THE CARDS~~~There are monsters called amazons and when another one is on the field they can get stronger, master their true effect, and much much more.This pack introduces us to counters.  Counters can be put on cards by an effect.  You can take away counters to activate its effect and you cand add counters until it has enough to use its effects.  When you use a magic card you cand put a counter on a card that can have them or put them on by a cards effect.  You can take counters off to use cards effects.There are monster cards called Union cards.  Union monsters can equip to other monsters.  It will make the monsters stronger and give them great effects.  You can unite or seperate the monsters each turn.  There are cards that put unions together also.You can make a magician deck.You can make an amazon deck.You can make a union deck.You can make a counter deck.look at all the decks you can make outta this pack~~~Ratios~~~rarity/identification/this many of these in this many packs/valueCommons/Not Shiny/8;1/worth $0.25 - $2.00Rares/Silver Lettering/5;6/worth $2.00 - $5.00Super Rare/Holo Picture/1;6/worth $5.00 - $20.00Ultra Rare/Holo Everywhere/1;12/worth $20.00 - $30.00Secret Rare/Glitter/1;228/worth $40.00 - $60.00The ratios are based on how the companys put the cards in the packs.You are not garenteed a certain rarity if you buy a certain amount of packs</review_text>
~~~EDUCATION VALUE~~~MAKE FRIENDSUSE YOUR BRAIN TO THINKHAVE FUNADD AND SUBTRACT~~~DURABILIY~~~THEY CAN GET DAMAGED EASILYGET SLEEVES AND A DECK BOX~~~THE CARDS~~~THIS PACK INTROPDUCES US TOUNION MONSTERS - WHEN YOU CONNECT THEM TOGETHER THEY GET STRONGER AND NEW EFFECTSSPEELCASTERS - CARDS THAT GO WELL WITH DARK MAGICIAN AND OTHER SPELLCASTERS</review_text>
Our daughter became this as she was a baby. We tried several time during her past 2 years if she would reach a moment to like it, but she always wanted to go out after 1 or 2 minutes. Maybe other babies are diferent, but I think its not the right material for such a playground. For a hot environment like ours in the south, it quickly gets very hot inside and you can not leave your baby or little child alone playing because of the plastic material that can be dangerous. We finally sealed the holes on the bottom and do not pump up the upper part so we fill it with water and use it as a litle pool, thats the only way for us to use it</review_text>
I was anxious to get this game for my daughter for Christmas, as she loves all princess things.  Unfortunately, the instructions were so confusing (do they even test these games?  with real people?), we quickly grew disenchanted with it, and tossed it.  Quality is not top notch, and the instructions and actual game concept are poorly thought out</review_text>
The product shown does not match the description.  It is NOT the Marble Roller Coaster Kit. Please fix</review_text>
Ok, maybe that's a bit strong, but this is hands down our most hated toy (by the adults, and the kids are plenty frustrated, too).  We received it as a gift (and WOW whoever would pay $35 for this is CRAZY.).  Our son is nearly five & needs help to load the truck, which has to be loaded fully to work without jamming; a time-consuming procedure, since the dominoes have to be loaded one-at-a-time.  The dominoes themselves are also almost too lightweight to stand well on end, and are prone to easy collapse.  After the initial newness wears off this toy is going to disappear, and that's something I've never even contemplated before</review_text>
The truck gets clogged up often, it is extremely difficult for our kids to load and they almost always require an adult to load.  The tower is decent, albeit, it doesn't quite work as advertised as well.  Our kids wound up just knocking down the dominos the old fashioned way.  I grew up in the "Domino Rally" days and compared to the original toys, these don't stack up.The truck and tower just aren't worth it, you are better off buying a bag of dominoes and letting your kids make their own domino trails</review_text>
I was very dissapointed with the product, it was displayed as something that was simple to use and fun for all ages....I ordered 4 of them for my grandchildren and when they opened them forChristmas, we found that they were "clumsy" to use, the sound quality is poor at best, and they are made of hard plastic which is not particularly safe to be "whacking" on anything and everything as I was led to believe.  We are a musical family and therefore more inclined to try to produce music from various sources, but I am afraid this is not worth the money.  If I had opened them before Christmas I would have returned them, but it was too late so now they are stuck with them</review_text>
I had this sent to my little brother and they threw away the packaging before discovering that they recieved a broken unit, and of course they didn't tell me in a timely fashion.  Shoddy merch is not cool, anything we can do to swap it out is fine, but being over 30 days I guess you win</review_text>
I bought 2 pair and the light did not work on one pair at all and the light only worked on the other pair initially then stopped working as soon as the mask got wet (and never worked again).Very disappointing because they sounded like a lot of fun</review_text>
Although these keys are one of my 14 month old son's favorite toys, one of the buttons came off and fell into the shell of the remote control.  It was the larger button to turn on the light and he would have likey choked on it had it fallen into his mouth.  If you purchase these, be sure to supervise your child playing with them at all times!  However, I would suggest not purchasing them</review_text>
Please be careful and make sure you can see your baby when playing with these keys.  The plastic ring holding the keys can break.  We found the small broken piece in our baby's mouth!  We received this toy only three weeks ago</review_text>
Mixed low review-  The single biggest negative is the contrast/brightness level of the screen, which makes it near impossible to see except at certain angles and light conditions.  Unfortunately, that is a huge Achilles heal.  Otherwise, great electronics, features, and stylus operation.  I would try to demo this before buying since the screen issue could be a deal breaker (unless there is something wrong with mine, which I doubt, I would not buy this again</review_text>
My children have loved playing in this tent. I like it also because it is not huge and doesn't take up a lot of room, but it is also not made out of very durable material.  I picked it up to move it out of the way and it ripped.  It is easy to pop-up and down, just will probably not have a very long lifetime with kid's play</review_text>
Hideaway bought for my daughter who loves it.  Easily assembled, up within 60 seconds. I have noticed that there are two loops attached to the hideaway, presumably to tie some rope to them and then stake to the ground. There was no rope or stakes with the purchase, I am unaware if these should have been included. Two entrances into the hideaway, the front inverted T entrance is great. However, the rear is a porthole type entrance, not good for children when playing games as they can trip on the material in the bottom. Material not that durable, but with care there should be no issues. a lot bigger than it looks on the site, which was a nice surprise.</review_text>
I agree with all of the other reviews about this tent and its durability, however my daughter absolutely loves it.  First the three plastic sticks that come with the tent to hold it open broke and warped pretty quick.  I went to Home Depot and bought three wooden dowels for 79 cents each and cut them to the correct length and it works great.  My daughter uses this mostly inside and it is fine, when outside the wind and everything else did move it around.  I bought a 4 pack of plastic tent stakes from target for about $1 and put one in each corner to hold it in place, works great.  I think we paid $19 for this at Target and it definitely seems worth the amount of enjoyment my daughter gets.  If you are expecting a $200 high quality camping tent, you will probably be disappointed</review_text>
This item is too difficult for a six year old even though advertised as for 5-8 year olds.  You cannot return the item once opened, so do not order</review_text>
I bought this game on the fly cause the cover illustration looked so interesting that I couldn't resist. The instructions were a little confusing to understand at first, but once gameplay started it was picked up pretty easy and much fun was enjoyed by everyone. The game is geared for those ages 10 and up, but it was so easy to understand and so much fun, that my 8 year old neice was able to play without teaming up with an adult. The game promotes math skills which is a HUGE plus since many games today are only about fun. This game has it all, fun, education and the artwork on the cards is fantastic. When we played, we threw in chocolate gold pieces so we'd have real pirate plunder and everyone had to speak like a pirate. It's a really great way to spend quality time with your family and it's fun for all ages</review_text>
I have bought quite a few barbies from Amazon recently, including the caligirl series, fashion fever series, and barbie loves micky mouse. This barbie is quite different to all above. She does not have a rubber skin like others, so we may see her leg joints if she is wearing a skirt or shorts. Her foot is quite flat; only the slippers in this package fit her; all other barbies' shoes do not. I guess this "pooh" might be made with the "former generation" technology</review_text>
The tent is extremely flimsy, has no bottom to it and falls over all the time. It will not stand straight up. Could have bought a better child's tent at a cheaper price</review_text>
We received this item as a gift from grandma because my son loves barnyard animals, barns, etc.  He LOVES the tent; however, the construction was so poorly thought out that he cannot touch it without it falling over and collapsing on top of him!  There is no way to anchor it to the floor (weights, etc.) to keep it from toppling over.  The sides have no stabilization whatsoever.The idea is super, but maybe they should consider more product testing to ensure its durability</review_text>
I was so excited to get the time tracker and am now so frustrated with it. The first one that I got did not work at all...they sent a second one and this one worked for less than 5 minutes (we tried 3 different sets of new batteries). It is such a great concept, but unfortunately is very poorly made. I was also surprised at how cheap looking the whole thing is in real life.</review_text>
If 0 stars were an option, that's what I would have given this awful product.  Doesn't work anything like they show on TV.  So sticky, messy, and slimy, and the smell is just awful.  I didn't even want my kids to touch it because of the terrible chemical smell.  I find it hard to believe they can label this product "non-toxic".  Total false advertising.  Do not buy this mess</review_text>
I bought the familiy fun pack ($65) from the ad on TV!  What a mistake!  When it arrived one tub was open and spilled all inside the box while another unopened tub was nearly dried out. No return label or customer service number was enclosed so I couldn't even return it! It is such a mess and smells like chemicals.  It stuck to a votive candle holder ok and it looks kind of cute but when you try to just mold it all it does is stick to EVERYTHING including your hands.  Some are really gooey like slimy paint while other tubs are nearly dry and you end up with micro-mini styrofoam beads all over the place and they sink down into the carpeting and won't come out.  Needless to say, it sat around for awhile until it finally made it's way to it's new home....the trash</review_text>
Do not waste your money. My son was so excited to get floam. He had been asking for it for a very long time. Finally I gave in and bought it. It is like little pellets in green slime. It is so wet and slimy that it is not possible to mold it into anything. And you can't stick it to anything like they show in the commercials because once you thouch it it is hard to get the slimy mess of off your hands. It is very messy and impossible to play with. The commercials are very misleading.</review_text>
My 3-year-old son liked Floam because of the goop factor, but unfortunately the goop the little foam pellets are suspended in seems to be a GREAT medium for growing MOLD.  This happened to us twice (despite clean hands/work space) so we gave up on it entirely.I suggest you try PlayFoam instead.  It's also available here on Amazon, or at Lakeshore Learning Store (look for samples at the checkout for 49 cents!) Playfoam has a nicer consistency, less sticky (but still moldable) and no odor</review_text>
Am totally dissatisfied with ths wagon as it came dented.  The wagon is shipped in a cardboard box with no styrofoam or other packing - the wagon bed absorbs any impacts.  The parts are in the bed and there is cardboard to prevent scratching - there were no scratches and the finsih was nice.  The pacaging is totally inadequate.  I would return the wagon if time permitted.  I am glad that I am not giving it to a child as a gift.  Buy it where you can look it over first to be sure it's not damaged</review_text>
If one good thing can be said about Dread Pirate, it's that the physical game components reek of quality.  The cloth game board, glass jewels, metal coins, wooden dice and pewter game pieces all come together to give an overall sense of realism to the game.  It's a pity, however, that the game itself isn't nearly as exciting as the pieces.Dread Pirate relies entirely on random dice rolls to determine every single outcome of the game.  To move from place to place, you roll dice.  To challenge another player to a "skirmish" (which is how you steal their treasure), you roll dice.  To steal jewels from an enemy's port, you roll dice.  To trade for jewels at a port, you roll dice.  There's absolutely no semblance of any real strategy in this game.  You win by accumulating the most treasure, and the amount of treasure you accumulate depends entirely on how lucky you are in your roll of the dice.This game is not fun, and can even be frustrating, especially for a young child who keeps rolling low numbers.  There's SOME thinking involved...  you need to judge for yourself who you should attack and when, but even if you make the best possible strategic decision, you can still lose the die roll and end up empty-handed.I would recommend Dread Pirate only if your family is specifically looking for a game where you don't have to think, and only if your children are mature enough to deal with bad luck (as good/bad luck is the only way to win/lose this game).  If you're looking for an enjoyable family game that everyone can play, I would very much reccommend Cranium over this.  It's less expensive, there's ALOT more to it, and it will have your family getting up, being active, and laughing out loud (instead of sitting around and rolling dice to determine the number of jewels you can take)</review_text>
You can't be serious.We are not in the caveman era, you know. We have games to play that involve strategy. This game is pure luck - roll a die, roll a die, lose. It is like playing Roulette. Even Blackjack and Monopoly have choices. There is no way in which a "good player" can win in this game more often than a "bad player", as there is no way to be good or bad at this game.We have eurogames. We have games that involve strategy. We do not need this baseless luckfest</review_text>
Our family bought this tank and we went through plenty of goldfish with it. We stopped buying when our 10 year old was using the scope to look at the fish. She was pulling it up and down and turning it and when she was finished, she put it down and saw that she had put it down on the actual fish. The fish was bleeding and died. The kids were not very happy. I guess this is an okay tank but not great. You might want to put only beta's in it. I would suggest getting something with a filter and heater if you want any other kind of fish</review_text>
It is a waste of money and a big disappointment.  I will be returning it.</review_text>
This machine does not work.  I will be returning it to find a better "first" machine for my daughter.  The stitiches do not hold, every instruction was followed to the letter.  It is not worth even 4 cents, much less 14 dollars.  I would have paid more for something that acutally works.  I'll keep lookin</review_text>
My daughter was very excited to receive this for Christmas, until she tried to change the thread that came with the machine.  It literally would not work anymore.  I tried everything.  Maybe it's defective.....but from other reviews I read, I think it's just a really bad attempt at a great idea. Too bad....she is very disappointed....</review_text>
I got this for my daughter who will be 10 in Feb. She has wanted a sewing machine very badly. This one is made of cheap plastic, and no matter how many times we read the instructions and try to close the end, as soon as we remove it, it unravels. I think I'd spend more money and get something better. As my daughter says "It's very irriating."</review_text>
We purchased this for our daughter as a Christmas gift.  What a nightmare.  First of all, the scissors it came with...well let's just say my teeth cut better.  This scissor is so DULL we'd be willing to allow our three year old to handle it.  It cuts NOTHING.  This sewing machine comes with one tiny square of material, so you have to be sure to have material on hand if you want your child to actually attempt sewing something.  It's incredibly difficult and frustrating to thread the needle.  The stitches are way too loose and break apart at the slightest touch.  There is no bobbin, so there's nothing to hold your stitch together.  We wanted to make a simple little pillow for my daughter's dolls...wishful thinking!  The minute you attempt to turn your project right-side-out, the stitches come apart and you have NOTHING.  My daughter just walked away. We can't believe Singer would be the maker of this 1.99 piece of plastic.</review_text>
These were purchased for my Grandson for Christmas. They are hard to get on. Clumsy and don't have the effect they would have you believe. He never really used them and  a waste of money. They were useless and also very dangerous.  Defintely would not recommend.</review_text>
My daughter just turned seven and we got these for her birthday because she loves to be outside.  She thought they were cool for a few days and now they are sitting in the garage.  We put the appropriate number of strings on for her weight (56 pounds) but she doesn't seem to bounce very high.  And she needs help getting them on.  She was upset because some neighbor boys made fun of her due to the fact that they are so big and awkward looking.  I wouldn't tell someone not to buy them but I wish I would have gotten something else for her.</review_text>
Purchased 2 pairs for my 8 & 9 year old daughters for Christmas. The shoes are made of cheap pieces of plastic. The box includes bunches of black, elastic bands that you need to really s-t-r-e-t-c-h onto the shoes to provide the "bounce". The more your child  weighs, the more bands you use, but you have to double or triple them onto the same hooks. They are very hard to install and could be dangerous if they snap back into your face while you are installing them. Once assembled, the kids played with them for about 10 minutes before becoming bored. They haven't played with them since. Don't waste your money</review_text>
Like many of the other reviews (that I read after receiving the doll), I got a hispanic doll with red hair... whoever heard of that!  My daughter is adopted from Guatemala and has black, straight hair.... This doll depicted how I style her hair and would have been a perfect match, as it also had black hair.... after waiting for a week, I received the doll, expecting it to look like the one pictured, and it wasn't.... I am highly, highly disappointed, and have emailed all of my contacts telling them about this and giving them the sight to view all the unhappy comments on this as well as pass along to their contacts..... I will never make this mistake again....  as the saying goes.... "Fool me once, shame on YOU...fool me twice, shame on ME.... well, shame on them!!!</review_text>
I was very happy to discover that I could purchase an Asian Cabbage Patch Girl doll...it was for a little Korean girl....the doll pictured on the website looked like the little girl that it was purchased for (the hair). Well, I was excited to find one and I wanted to make sure that I would receive it in time to wrap it and mail it to Texas in time for Christmas.  I ordered in on the 27th and received it on Dec. 1st (I paid for faster shipping).  When I opened the box it was an Asian doll but not the one with the ponytails...this doll had short hair.  I called Amazon immediately and although they expressed being sorry they said that they could not guarantee that it wouldn't happen again. I have used Amazon before with no problems but I am extremely unhappy with the bait and switch.  I should have read the other reviews.  I will never let that happen again.  BEWARE...do not order things of this nature from this website.  You will be disappointed</review_text>
IF YOU WANT A BEAUTIFUL ASIAN DOLL, I JUST FOUND A COUPLE IN EBAY UNDER " ASIAN BERENGUER GIRL DOLL ".  THE ONE I GOT ON EBAY WAS GORGEROUS!!!  MY DAUGHTER LOVES IT AND WON'T LEAVE HOME WITHOUT IT.</review_text>
OH MY GOSH-THIS IS TERRIBLE! My husband and I bought this game because I loved watching this as a child. This game uses the same prizes and games over and over. If you played once you have played too many times. The games are boring, the prizes are boring and it is a waste of money and time. I don't know why the box says "13 and up" because my 10 year old daughter could play this. This one is going back to the store-I got zonked out of my $24.99...if you want my opinion take the cash and run</review_text>
Save your money...Because if you buy these for your kids you are going to need your money for the hospital....They do not work like you think that would..You kid is only bouncing on big rubber bands...And fall ever time they try to bounce...very dangerous..they aren't made for anyone..they should be taken off the marke</review_text>
THE TRAILER IS SOOOOOOOOOOO FAKE. IF I JUMPED AROUND IN THESE "MOON SHOES" LIKE THE KIDS IN THE TRAILER ID BE IN THE HOSPITAL BY NOW!!! THESE SHOES HURT YOUR ANKLES SOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO BAD AND ARE NOT I REPEAT NOT BOUNCY AT ALL!!!I WAS EXCITED WHEN I GOT THESE BUT VERY DISSAPOINTED WHEN I USED THEM. THEY ARE THE WORST TOY IN THE WORLD. I MEAN COME ON $40.00 FOR THE WORST SHOES IN THE WORLD. WELL THAT MONEY JUST WENT DOWN THE DRAIN!!NEVER, EVER THINK ABOUT BUYING THESE DISASTROUS SHOES FOR YOUR CHILD! AS I TYPE MY FRIEND IS USING THEM AND SHE EVEN SAYS THEY ARE A TOTAL DISASTER TOO!!!!!!!!! NEVER NEVER NEVER NEVER EVER EVER EVER BUY THESE SHOES!!! I HATE THEM!!</review_text>
At first this case seemed like a good idea, but after the 3rd use, the zipper broke. Since the case does not stay open on its own, there is  tendency to push the case open and force the zipper backward and apart. After fixing it a couple of times, it is now permanently broken. Bad design. Maybe Velcro would have been better</review_text>
I would give this toy a 0 if it was an option.  When you unfold the tiny track and get the train going, it can't even make one corner turn without coming off the track!  The train is too big for the sharp corners and it either sticks or completey comes off the track.  This is very frustrating for my kids and I cannot believe they even put this on the market?  You can't even get it to stay in the track when you manually push it.  I am just bummed that we threw away the box before we put in batteries and saw how bad this toy really is.We wanted this toy for portability.  Our kids also have the GeoTrax Working Railway, which is awesome, but not as portable</review_text>
This was a fun and very portable toy for my 18-month-old son.  Unfortunately, the elephant noise quit working after about 6 weeks of play, and then the monkey noise stopped working about 2 weeks later.  Also, the train easily comes off the track, but my son loves playing with the train that way, too.  He's very disappointed that the animals are now quiet</review_text>
Normally I am a big fan of the little tikes name, but not so with this product.  I bought this for my 2 1/2 year old daughter and although the concept is cute, it is not like other Little Tikes products.   To begin with, the train frequently comes off the track.  Also to activate it, you must press the button where the conductor goes.  However, it is difficult for my daughter to place the figure on this spot without it falling off.  She often presses the button in the process which activates the train while she is still trying to put the figure on it which frustrates her.  Since this is geared for toddlers, you would think that Little Tikes would have put the button to activate the motion in a different spot from where the figures go.  Also, at age 2 1/2 she is quickly bored with it.  She has more fun letting it go on the floor across the room than riding on the track.  Needless to say, it is going back.  The only good feature is that you can "pack it and go" for away from home fun</review_text>
Dont waste your money.  I bought a set for each of my kids, and they didn't work well.  The paper that came with the pens, was thin and cheap.  We followed the directions, and twisted, and it either didn't work, or blended for a split second, and then back to original color.  Total Waste of Money.  They are now in the trash</review_text>
I bought this toy for my four year old for Christmas thinking it would be the perfect toy for her since she loves Care Bears and she loves the game hide and seek. This toy was a big disappointment! She was so excited when she opened the package but when we tried to play with it, she got frustrated and lost intrest very quickly. The Care Bear "finder" does not give good clues to where the Care Bear is hiding and makes it very confusing for a child. It was saying "come find me" even when she was within a couple feet of it and she had to be right on top of it before it would tell her that she's "getting warmer." It doesn't let the child know that they are getting close to it until they can see it. My daughter gave up on it quickly because she would be wandering the house aimlessly without any clue as to it's where abouts. I do not recommend this toy to any one. I would have given it no stars, but she does like the bear itself. Do yourself a favor...buy a care bear (much cheaper), hide it somewhere, and you can truthfully tell your child when they are "getting warmer!</review_text>
Don't waste your time with this thing.  By the time we invested in the toy, the batteries, etc. we had quite a few dollars into it... for about 15 minutes of fun.  The toy can't just be set down on a table, so when my son actually gone bored with it (to my shock because he LOVES bubbles) he tried to set it down and it spilled the remaining GOLD solution all over.  Yuck.  Mommy promptly threw the toy in the trash.This toy is just a gimmick - stick with the good old magic bubbles and save your money</review_text>
The bar is nice, and I suppose the mat will come in handy for reviewing the basic positions. But the DVD... it's just awful. The music is painfully bad. Seriously, what dp little girls dressed like fruit have to do with ballet? And the "host" is a confusing choice: her accent is distracting, and it's made even worse by the fact that she's talking around braces. The two little girls who help her don't look much happier. In fact, the one on the left looks like someone told her to smile or else.Trying to keep up with the nominally enducational DVD is harder than you might think, as the mat has two sides and you have to flip it over mid-stream, only you get no warning and no time to do it. And the positions are introduced too quickly and with no discussion; they're just lyrics to the annoying song.Our daughter got this for her 3rd birthday, and she actually looked at me the first time we watched it and said, "I want the fruit to go away." I had to laugh out loud and tell her I did too! Overall, I'm sorry her grandparents spent $15 on this. Total disappointment</review_text>
I would have bought this item, but the shipping ($5.53) was almost as much as the item itself ($5.99).  Thanks, but no thanks.  I'll go to a competitor.  Weird thing is -- other Play-Doh items are listed with FREE shipping</review_text>
The idea behind this isn't too bad, and my 4 year old really enjoyed them for a short time, but it has some really ridiculous quirks.The shoes are not on any type of timer, so they will stay on indefinitely unless your child turns off each of them individually.  So what ends up happening, of course, is dead batteries within a day or so.  The wand and the tiara both work fine, so maybe that set wouldn't be too bad, but it annoys me that they would even release something as ridiculous as this</review_text>
This Jack in the Box is pretty flimsy.  Not worth the price. Would have returned it but it would have not been worth the expense.</review_text>
This toy is TERRIBLE!!  My daughter got this for Christmas, and it only frustrates her.  It takes too many cranks to get the clown to pop up, and she can't get the lid to stay shut without my help.  The "music" is terrible.  I would definitely not recommend this toy.</review_text>
This is a very cheap toy and mine arrived broken,  or at least I hope it's not supposed to sound like it does.  It sounds nothing like the classic Jack-in-the-box that I was hoping for</review_text>
I am very unhappy with this product.  The handle is hard to turn, and it takes too long for the clown to pop up.  When the clown does pop up it smells like a forst fire inside of the toy.  Over all I would not recomend it</review_text>
It's a cute little set - and I mean little.  Wayyyyy over-priced.  (...) Just didn't live up to expectations</review_text>
My boys thought that a treasure chest sandbox was a cool idea, being into the pirate theme. Thankfully I purchased this sandbox in-store, because I returned it the very same day.  I didn't even fill it with sand before I realized it was a cheaply made toy.  The plastic is thin and was bent or warped in a few places.  The lid wouldn't fit on correctly, even if it wasn't bent at some of the edges it wouldn't have been a good, secure fit.  I was surprised that Little Tikes would make something so flimsy.  I exchanged it for the Step 2 Naturally Playful Sandbox, which is sturdier and the lid works much better.  Spend the extra $10 for a sandbox that is higher quality.</review_text>
I purchased this toy for my 3yr old in December last year. He has not been able to use it since we have not been able to find ANY products (discs, carrying case etc) for the videonow. I have called the company several times. Everything is always unavailable and I do check on a regular basis. My son has been watching black and white discs recently from his older brother on the machine so he will get some use out of it. It was a good idea but the company leaves a lot to be desired. If you make a product make sure that there are enough discs. It is simply a waste of money and time. I cannot continue going on line and checking a couple of times every week. I hope this info factors in in your decision to purchase this toy</review_text>
She is DISGUSTING!!! The only good thing about her is that to scare people away simply show them this doll and they'll go screaming! My friend, Lucy Banette, has this doll. The hair tangles, the clothes rip, and even she admits it SUCKS!!! Her white skin makes her look like a vampire ghost. Not one for decoration!!! Not even for a 'playing-with' doll. Too fragile and disgustingly sickening to look at! What are we trying to teach children here??? That it is good to dress like you have just died? Have you ever seen a goth look like this? NO!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! So please, MGA, carry on with lil' Bratz. THEY RULE!!! But NOT your silly gothy, punky Bratz. I have two lil' bratz. They are in the collection 'life style'. I have Sasha and Cloe. I don't know why you called Cloe Ailani and Sasha Zada. They are STUPID names! I HAD to redo their names! It feels nice to express myself! Bye, to goth haters! GO AWAY, you silly fans of this Bratty goth doll</review_text>
What a disappointment! We got this for my daughter because of the enticing TV commercials that make it appear to be fun, moldable and not messy.  However, it is none of those and is VERY MESSY!  It is just a cross between dust and sand and NOT fun to play with OR to clean up. It stays on your hands and a child can easily wipe their eyes and cause problems. Go with Play-Doh or Floam instead</review_text>
We tried adding the soap and turned the handlle " really fast" but it still dosent do much??</review_text>
I thought this would be a great addition to our tub toy collection, I was wrong.  It doesn't work!!!! We tried shampoo and baby wash in it and there was no "mountain of bubbles".  This product doesn't work, save your money!!</review_text>
This obviously is a re-release of the OLD "Empire Strikes Back" kit released in the 80's.A decent size kit (approx 15 inches) it gives an experience modeler a good opportunity at super detailing.The kit is relatively easy to build out of the box, but it has many inaccuracies most notably the inaccurate sensor/bridge deflector DOME on top of the ship.These inaccuracies can be addressed by looking in the Internet for replacement parts and articles on addressing those inaccuracies.However, the kit is worth the price.My only disappointment is the kit is not in scale with the new "Republic Star Destroyer" from "Revenge of the Sith".  The new kit for the new movie is over 19 inches long.  In order for this kit to be in scale with the current movie version, it would need to be about 24 inches long.Hopefully someone will make the "Imperial Star Destroyer" to that scale.</review_text>
Not worth the buy. Very hard to use in the pool. Vendor delivery service was great</review_text>
These Rook cards do contain the larger font of an earlier edition.  However, the yellow suit is very pale and difficult to see. After we opened the cards (two sets were purchased), we found that the Rooks on the backs of the cards were printed upside-down.  The cards are also not particularly sturdy. These cards appear to be irregulars</review_text>
I bought this toy for my 9 year old son who loved it at first but after awhile he was dissapointed. It stopped working correctly on one side. The remote may be the problem, I am not sure. We changed the batteries but that did not help. I felt bad I bought him a Christmas gift that didn't last the day</review_text>
My daughter got this for Christmas and it only says, "Know what goes good with everything? Ripped Pants!"  Then he sings, "You won't end up like the fool who ripped his pants." and then says, "This is so embarrassing!"  My daughter dropped the toy once and it said a different phrase but we can't get it to do it again. It seems like it's stuck in the "demo" mode and we can't figure out how to make it work.I called Fisher Price and due to unsually high call volume they disconnect you after telling you to call back another time,  Probably due to the fact that every parent who's child recieved this toy is calling to complain.</review_text>
We bought this item for my Daughter's Christmas present and the strings do not work at all.  All it does is play the 3 songs, and the microphone works.  But the other functions (anything to do with the strings) do not work at all.  We bought this at Toys R Us and we're taking it back tomorrow.  As I can see from the reviews (which I wish I'd read earlier), we'll be getting a different brand of guitar.  These seem faulty as a rule.  Do not buy this</review_text>
My daughter is almost three, and she was so excited when she received this for Christmas.  Unfortunately, the strings do not work, and also the star buttons are supposed to play notes and/or chords, and they don't work, either.  I was going to send for a replacement because my daugher absolutely loves this, and I was so disappointed when Amazon responded there are no replacements available.  I'm going to see if the manufacturer can replace it</review_text>
We got this guitar for my 4 year old, she loved it, but it stopped functioning after less than a month, I thought I need to change batteries but even after that it didn't work, now I don't know what to do with it, I didn't keep the box so that I could return it, very disappointed...</review_text>
My daughter got this doodle bear for christmas 2006.  She wrote all over it and I washed it like the directions say.  I took it out of the washing machine and the bear was ripped.  She played with it again and I washed it again in the pillow case.  The bear came out of the washing machine worse off.  It seems that the bear rips at the seams.  Don't waste your money on this bear.</review_text>
We finally bought these Barbie Magic of the Rainbow dolls for our 4-year-old twin daughters after hearing them beg for it repeatedly after each time the commercial aired. At first, they were very excited to play with them. Positives: The doll is durable. It encourages participants to follow instructions. Negatives: I notice my daughters have to wave the doll a few times before the DVD "hears" the instructions.Positives: The DVD provides clear and easy to understand directions, so your doll can be programmed with your remote control. Negatives: The doll set off our fire alarm a few times before we figured out it was the doll (and we did check to see if there really was a fire!) When the DVD is not in, the dolls control the volume on the TV! This can be very annoying when the volume increases just as you realize your daughters have started playing with the dolls. My suggestion: de-program the doll when your kids are finished playing the DVD! Or, just keep it deprogrammed and use your remote -taking all control away from your kids and keeping them from standing so close to the TV</review_text>
This is probably one of the best booster packs out there. Every monster that comes in the pack has an effect. Effect monsters can be very useful. Not to mention that my very first Pharaonic Guardian pack came with a secret rare! That is one of only two of the most rare cards in the whole pack! Even the common cards are great. Such as Giant axe mummy or the Gravekeeper cards! Your deck cannot be complete without this booster pack! I highly suggest this pack</review_text>
We bought this for our son for Christmas this year based on glowing reviews. What a disappointment! The "musical instruments" are basically glorified rattles that all sound basically the same, the song the drum plays is tinny, scratchy, and short, and nothing seems very well made. I at least expected the different instruments to sound different from one another.On the plus side, it is cute, and the lobster has a pretty wind chime like sound</review_text>
You could make your own!  I bought these through a catalog for my 3 year-old last Christmas.  He pretends they are leaf-blowers.  If you find the "sweet spot", the tones are okay, but finding that spot isn't easy.  Too much money for not-enough product</review_text>
It would be really nice if they could put out sets in single ethnicities. I do not like my child having multi-cult propaganda shoved down her throat via her TOYS! She wants to play with dolls that look like her - this is only natural. Too bad, cute set and I would have bought it</review_text>
this is the cutest furreal I have seen it could have been much better if they would have made it where it would open it's mouth. ...Why did it come with a bottle? all ir does is grunt and beg. doesn't walk and it's eyes do not close so you can't pretend it is asleep. I can't return it cause it was a valantine's present but at least it is cute as just a stuffed pig</review_text>
Ok, my kid loves it.  But, after seeing it in person, I cant believe how much I was charged for list little plastic toy.  Cost is way over excessive.  Strongly suggest saving your money, unless money is no object</review_text>
My son received this as a birthday gift and it broke the 2nd time that he played with it. While I was putting it on him the plastic belt just snapped in half. Luckily we had a different belt from another toy that we could use with the gadgets. The previous reviewer was right about the difficulty of taking the gadgets on and off. There's no way that my 4 year old son could do it without my help. If I had the receipt I would have returned it</review_text>
Our son has dyslexia.  We are using this as a tool to build his family of sounds and spelling rules.  He thinks it is fun and is building on his skills at the same time</review_text>
The pieces were very tiny and the sticker flags kept popping off the plastic. My daughter's favorite part was the pink and white horse with the carriage, which she promptly took over and put with her dollhouse. After asking Santa for a Cinderella Castle she was a bit disappointed. This playset would probably be fine for a child who was just going to set it up and not play with it</review_text>
My sons received this for Christmas and it's already out of commission. The quality of the fabric (more like paper) is such that the polls very quickly poked through, leaving the folding/elasticated sticks to stick out.It's a great idea, but if it was a better material so that it would last more than a couple of weeks...Here's hoping that I can sew up the holes without tearing it more</review_text>
This high chair is a lot smaller than the photograph implies.  When screwing together the sections, I managed to split the wooden bar that would be the foot rest.  Any half decent person with a jigsaw would be able to make a more sturdy toy.  This toy is very basic, the seat of the highchair is wooden with a skimpy section of cloth.  Invest in some power tools and make your own, I guarantee it would be better than this one</review_text>
The item arrived to us the week of Christmas three weeks after we had ordered it.  It arrived with several broken and several missing parts.  Amazon would not send us new parts, they would only replace the unit if we shipped it back first.  This was to be a Christmas gift to my son, so that was not optional.  Had the order arrived when the order tracking said it would I would have had time to return it</review_text>
I tried this toy at it's lowest volume, and it's still lound enough to damage young eardrums.   Remember that this toy is much closer to their ears than yours.</review_text>
I'm not sure how this toy ended up with a 4.5 star rating after all the broken microphones!! Ours was yet another that broke within 2 months of gentle play. It wasn't thrown or dragged around by the microphone or anything of the sort. My son loved it and figured out the microphone very quickly. He loved to see the lights and the little puppy "dance" when he "sang" into the microphone. I continued to let him play with it even after the microphone shorted out and the static began and he still kept trying the microphone until he got frustrated and then I finally put it away. I wish I had spent the money on something that would have lasted longer. My son is now 18 months old and the only other toy he has ever managed to break was the Vtech Nursery Farm which was broken 3 weeks after Christmas last year, just before this piano broke. I highly recommend Fisher Price or LeapFrog toys over Vtech. We have never had a problem with their toys and 2 of the 3 Vtech toys we have owned have broken on us. Garbage!</review_text>
Even though yugioh is dead, this is my favorite pack (even though i don;t get them any more). The deck that i made is an Archfiend deck, which can kill you if you don't have a spell card on the field that says you don't have to pay life points for Archfiend cards. They are also one of the strongest group if cards. There is TerrorKing Archfiend, InfernalQueen Archfiend, Archfiend Solder, and others. Even though yugioh is dead, some people still play ot, and some stores but them from you. I sold my deck for $$$, you should too.</review_text>
I was really excited about this toy. I was very forgetful when it came to putting my son on his tummy, so I thought this would be a great toy for him to  have some good quality tummy time on. Wrong. He could care less about this toy. The second I'd lay him in front of it he would just roll onto his back. He was five months old when we bought it, and it is just sitting there. He STILL loves his Gymini and he is six months old now. Also, by the third day the aquarium had sprung a leak..which apparently has happened to almost everyone who  has bought this thing. Do not  purchase this toy, it takes up too much space, and it's a waste of money. Baby could care less about it</review_text>
When we bought this, I liked the versatility it offered.  I quickly noticed, however, that it is mostly good for strewing the soft pieces everywhere.  There are actually too many pieces to keep up with, and frankly I'm getting sick of stepping on the cow.My 6 mos old likes it for a couple minutes, until he's rolled away from it.My 3 year old thinks it's interesting, but she just ends up taking it apart and the pieces end up all over the place.After a couple days of playing with it I usually put most of it away and keep out only a couple parts to complement our other toys.The water play mat lasted until my 3 year old stepped on it once or twice.  Then that was gone</review_text>
I thought this toy looked fantastic as I was searching for developmental toys to help in various areas while they grew. The versitility of this one looks great. Well, I liked it more than either one of my children did, as they almost never played with it except for the simple joy of taking it apart and strewing it all over the playroom! The black and white face was good when they are first starting to be attracted to faces but other than that, it just got taken apart and lost its interest, no matter which way i arranged the peices. Infants would do much better with a flat playmat with a mobile suspended above their heads</review_text>
I bought this item for my newborn - thinking it would grow with him and be useful for at least the 1st year.  I was SO wrong.  First, as I feared, the water "fishbowl" leaked the 1st time I filled it.  I returned it and the next one leaked as well.  Then, the mirror is one of those "plastic" mirrors that gives a distorted reflection - which was of no value or interest to my son. The cow that makes noise died after less than a month of light to no use.  Finally, the toy just didn't have that "fun" value that a $43 toy should have.  He hated it - never attempted to crawl down it, never played with the features. Save your money - this toy is of poor quality and poor entertainment value. There are tons of better products out there..</review_text>
this tor breakes when you build tall buildings, but I made a mouse out of them. when the magnets are pushed back that makes me angry, but you can make people by just putting four magnets on one ball, but in all I say you shuld decide yourself.</review_text>
My kids love Magnetix, but I am unable to order them online because you do not ship to Canada. This problem occurs a lot. Someone should fix that. I find it very frustrating when I try to order something and then it tells me they are "unable to fullfill my order because we can't ship outside the USA"</review_text>
Our family loves all types of memory games, and this is the most attractive.  The colorful stripes on the back are great, the pictures are good, the click of the squares on the tabletop are satisfying, and the fact that they are true squares means that they fit easily and perfectly into the box.  My only negative comment is that there is no indication  which country each child represents.  The children who play this game are capable of learning country and costume together...I think it is an obvious teaching opportunity. In fact, I would like to know this myself</review_text>
The dolls and outfits in this set are adorable and the case was a cute idea.  The only problem that kept me from giving this item a high star rating is the case itself.  I wish the case closed more tightly, it closes with a small gap along the sides also the entire case lid keeps coming off easily.  Overall tho, aside from the annoyance of the lid, for the price it was still worth purchasing because as I've said the dolls and outfits are so adorable and a great addition to my 8yr old daughters polly collection.</review_text>
When I received the doll I turned it on and she made about 4 or 5 facial expressions before she said a word. She is not operating properly and since I ordered the doll a month and a half beofre my daughter's birthday, I was unable to return or exchange. I was told to contact the manufacture. I guess the doll was mishandled before it reached me...Be careful</review_text>
My friends and I (all over 21, for reference) sat down to play this one day and we just could not find this game interesting or fun or amusing in the least. I'm not sure what is needed to make this fun or challenging... but none of us could make it past 15 minutes of play. It will not be brought out again</review_text>
This is the worst game I have ever played.  It was so bad that we didn't even finish.  It came down to just guessing and could have gone on all night without a clear winner.  This game sucks! I wouldn't buy this game with somebody elses money, even if it were only $1</review_text>
My daughter received this as a gift for her first birthday.  She loves tub toys, but when you pull the tail on this one it just sits in the water.  My daughter actually plays with it more out of the tub and my husband figured  out that it actually works better if you pull the tail and let it  &quot;swim&quot; on the floor.  I'm a big fan of Sassy toys, but I'd pass  on this one</review_text>
I bought this vehicle for my son...we have been through 2 already...they do not work. The controller is not made very well...the two cars we bought did not respond..the first one you had to put the controller right up to the car to make it work...the other car would only go forward...and we tried this with brand new batteries and the charger pack we bought. Definitely a disappointment</review_text>
The controller range is less than 40 feet.  This car is much too fast for the short range.  It is very easy to outrun the contoller.  There is also a delay between control input and vehicle response.  All batteries were new and fully charged, checked with a meter.  A scanner verified that nothing was causing frequency interference.  The older Tyco turbo cars had a 100 foot controller range and no delay.  Tyco apparently changed the design to the new digital control to allow multiple cars to run at the same time</review_text>
I never imagined I was going to be such a bad experience, when you start the game is almost lost for the ones that chosen the light side. Then the game is complicated and it is not balanced, so everybody will choose the "dark side" because they have advantages. Dont waste you money buying this game, better buy the normal risk, acquire, or axes and allie</review_text>
This game is very confusing and hard to play.Thisn is a piece of junk. Get the origional Risk</review_text>
I have checked out almost every card shuffler in the market. And I can tell you that apart from the one made by Excalibur they are all the same, and Cardinal is not an exception. So here is my review.This is the kind of gift you will give to someone you really, really hate. This thing does NOT shuffle plus it WILL eat up your cards badly. DO NOT BUY THIS PIECE OF GARBAGE... that is unless you wish to annoy the hell out of someone and have fun doing so. If you do go ahead and spend your hard earn mula on this purchase, here are some suggestions on how you can use your brand new Card Shuffler.1. Pet Dog's Chew Toy2. Door Stop3. Play Street Hockey4. Stress Release Stomping Toy5. Mother-in-law Birthday Gift6. Modern Art for Coffee Table7. Nerf Ball Target Practice8. Condom DispenserKind of think about it, this is a great toy. Have fun!PS. If you are looking for a shuffler that really works maybe you should take a look at Excalibur Professional 6 Deck Card Shuffler; you might like it.</review_text>
We were extremely disappointed with this toy that we bought as a Christmas present for our four year old son.  The parking garage came with pre-drilled holes and needed to be assumbled.  Unfortunately, due to poor quality, the pieces did not line up correctly and we needed to sand some of them down in order to make the toy functional.  It would also have been helpful for the manufacturer to include one or two spare screws in case they got lost or destroyed during assembly.</review_text>
I had a problem with Brietta a day after I bought her. I was combing her hair, and suddenly her head broke! The part of her head that has hair seperated from her forehead, and there is no way to fix her. So she is stuck with a crack in her skull. I'm very upset about this.Other than that, I adore my Brietta doll. She has long strawberry blond hair that curls at the end in a messy way, so I cut the hair shorter to get rid of the messy curls.  Her face has a gorgeous expression, which looks so friendly to me. Her gown is light pink with a real overskirt and long sleeves, and she has pink shoes that ACTUALLY STAY ON!I'm just sad that she broke, but I still love her nonetheless</review_text>
I ordered the ants in December (Christmas present), and although the temperatures were unseasonably warm here throughout January, no ants arrived. I have called several times, with the same excuse. They have my money and won't deliver the ants.I would suggest any other company besides Uncle Milton Industries</review_text>
The gates and fences are hard to set up and they fall back down easily. Best for modeling not play</review_text>
The nose is glued and sewn on, but my baby still managed to chew it off.  I found it hanging by a thread from it's face one day.  So, cut off the nose before giving it to your baby, or never leave your baby alone with it once teething starts.Too bad about the nose because my baby loves his puppytunes.</review_text>
I think that the new style of the people are not as nice and durable as the old ones</review_text>
My friend got this toy for me saying it was the best, and because I'm a dancer. When I opened it, the doll's head fell off and when I dropped it, it broke. I suggest instead going to a real studio, because this was a waste of my friends money.</review_text>
All Thomas the Train products are overpriced. There are too many companies out there with a better selection of wood train sets for half the price. Choose one of those! Save yourself some money</review_text>
We baught a bunch of these fish for our 8 year old.We have a inground pool and thought they would be lots of fun!! Okay we took them out of the package, and had to rearrange the batteries 82 times before it would even respond to the water!!! When we placed it in the pool all it did was go on its side,in circles. Nothing was "realistic" about these things!!!! I should add that it was not just this one, but all of them!!!Do not waste your money or time buying these!!</review_text>
I purchased this for myself and my 7 year old to play with. The screen is way too dark to be able to use at dusk or after, but if in direct sunlight, you can't see it either.It's pretty small (buttons and screen) and a little confusing. If you are a person who is using hard earned money to purchase this, then don't. But if you just want to check it out and be okay with not wanting it later or losing the money you spent, go for it</review_text>
My mom is an avid wheel of fortune fan, and for x-mas i thought i'd buy this for her since it reminded me of a wheel of fortune game we use to have. Man do i regret it. She NEVER plays it anymore. The puzzles are limited and will start to repeat within a few weeks. The keys on the keypad are hard to push in, and if you don't push it in right soon enough you lose your turn and the general game-play is blah. Really, if you bought this for someone, it's the kind of present that they'd be happy with for all of a few hours. Then they'd let it collect dust. Like my mum is =</review_text>
My daughter was thrilled to see a new Wheel of Fortune game out and we bought it immediately! It's quite abit smaller than the original..can't imagine why they would do that..and it already has problems with the bonus round!  We may just have a bad one..but my daughter has gone back to using the 20 year old one she has..even with the faded screen and weak sound</review_text>
I misunderstood the dimensions listed ( 7.5 x 1.5 x 10.5 inches ) and thought it would be large enough for my mother to see and handle. It isn't. Apparently, the dimensions include the packaging. She loves Wheel Of Fortune on TV, and I thought this game would be terrific therapy for her hands. Very disappointing. I'll be returning it, unopened.</review_text>
Radica used to amke good hand held electronic games; this was is cheap. Buttons need to be pressed unusually hard to respond.  dark screen that lights up only when the room is nearly pitch black</review_text>
We were so excited to order this item. Sadly the quality is very poor. We have had it set up for less than a week and the front "counter" has broken off and one of the front panels has had a leg rip off. My kids love the idea of this item but it is extremely flimsy particle type board -it has basically disintergrated berfore our eyes . Even with general play it sways back and forth, a little scary if little ones are playing in it.I am going to call the maker - hopefully we can repair this (...</review_text>
This playhouse theater is an excellent way to spark your child's imagination.  My son received this as a Christmas gift last year and it has not only been a theater, but a house, cave, secret hideout, restaurant, and schoolhouse.  Very colorful and the front chalkboard is excellent for strenghtening writing skills!  The only downside I have with the theater is that it is not very durable.  The theater is made of some sort of flimsy plywood and it is not secured with screws, etc.  It slides together and a child can easily disassemble it.  The front panel that the child rest's his/her arms on broke after two weeks of having the theater.  Other than the durability factor...great product</review_text>
My daughter got this for her 5th birthday, and it really looks cute and fun in the box.  Within 5 minutes of playing with it, the small clip that holds the starfish open broke.  In addition, the mermaids and other pieces that come with this toy are microscopic.  If your kids are like mine, they will lose the items and bug you all day to help them find it.  This toy is really cute, but not worth it.  Save yourself the hassle.  Buy the big barbies and pretend there is a big seashell to play in</review_text>
I bought this oven for my children. After I lugged it home, my wife, an aspiring novelist, told me that "It was a quear, sultry summer, the summer they electrocuted the Rosenbergs, and I didn't know what I was doing in New York." I said "Don't you like the kid's new stove?" She replied, "How frail the human heart must be - a mirrored pool of thought. "I left it at that, and cooked some macaroni and cheese for dinner, after a good cigar and a glass of Weller's, I came back into the kitchen, only to discover....well, that's a long story, I just hope you realize this ain't no kids stove, it's the real deal, bud. Chance rules every corner of the universe except the chambers of the human heart</review_text>
If you want your child to know the true & Bibical account of Jesus' birth...the shepherds came first!An angel announced His birth the shepherds hurried to see Mary, Joseph & baby Jesus.They were first on the scene. Some chronicle the kings coming as much as three years later.I will return my three sets & order the one with the bells & whistles AND two shepherds!!</review_text>
this is not quite what I was expecting - I thought the mat was at least electronic or something to provide feedback, however it's just a plain cheap filmsy plastic mat that really adds nothing to the whole cheerleading experience.  Also, the video really moves too fast for my 4 yr old daughter and just up frustrating her.  It might work okay for older kids, but it's not very good for the younger ones</review_text>
Product is average...On ours the button whole is sewed so tight even I have problems buttoning... impossible for my 20 month old.  It says clothes remove fully and easily... which I thought would be great for my daughter since she likes to try and dress things... but the pullover has to be removed by pulling over the head and it isn't easy... and again is almost impossible for a little one.  Also... ours didn't come with a back pack which I'm sure would have made the toy more fun!  Perhaps she'll gain interest and capability with the toy in months to come... but right now... she has about as much interest in it as she does in say... carpet</review_text>
I was very disappointed with the durability and time that it took to get this tent set up. It took me about 2 1/2 hours to assemble the tent and then once it was up it could never stay up. The joining brackets couldn't hold the poles together and everytime the tent was moved or touched it fell apart. I went inside the tent to put it back together and one of the poles fell straight down hitting me under the eye and cut it. This is why I am returning it. If it's not safe for me to be in then I certainly don't want my daughter playing in it</review_text>
This toy needs work ... First of all, it's HEAVY!  My daughter (now 19 months) usually likes to pick it up and throw it.  After all, it IS a ball!  We have hardwood floors - throwing this ball is extremely loud and it can really do some damage to our floors!  We don't have any problems with it moving around ... however ... when you're asked to find something on the ball, even I have a hard time finding it to push the button in time.  So, I don't know how a 6 month+ baby/child could find the correct answer in time.I think this is a nice idea for a toy, but it just doesn't work.  It is colorful, and my daughter does enjoy throwing it, but that's obviously not it's intended use.  She never played with this toy as a crawling infant.  She only plays with it now, and she only throws it.  Please don't waste your money on this toy.  It's not worth it</review_text>
We bought three of these over the last few months since they keep breaking.  The last one lasted a single afternoon, and the kids were upset when it broke yet again.  Its not made very well; dont waste your mone</review_text>
My 3 yr old son received this toy last year for Christmas and was so excited. In less than a week, one of the rear wheels cracked in half, rendering it a non-returnable piece of junk</review_text>
Yo Brannan, Relinquished does not fuse to or more monsters.  It lets you equip oppontents monsters to it.  Learn Yugioh you... error!!!  My favorite cards in pegasus deck are toon world, relinguished, and blue eyes toon dragon.  I gave the durability 2 stars because when you leave your cards in the sun in the car, they get in bad cond.  You know that annoying snap action.  The only thing i don't like like about pegasus deck is that theres not that many high attack monsters. I would reccomed deck protecters.  Also buy a kaiba evolution for megamorph.  In pegasus deck use seven tools of the bandit you lose 1000 LP.  Then use Toon World.  You lose another 1000 LP.  Special Summon Blue Eyes Toon Dragon.  Then use Megamorph.  6000 LP for your Toon Dragon.  Then use Toon Special ability.  Your opponent losses 6000 LP and he/she probobly will lose.  Lose 2000 LP with Seven Tools! Megamorph is worth it!!!!  Hope my review was helpful.  P.S. Brannan this is a good review.</review_text>
Quick shipping on product but the product was not what I was hoping for.  The "snow" was much grainer than I had expected.  I had seen what I thought was the same item in stores during the holiday season and that "instant snow" was very fine and really looked like snow.  This product doesn't look much like snow and doesn't have the same texture</review_text>
I was very happy to discover that I could purchase an Asian Cabbage Patch Girl doll...it was for a little Korean girl....the doll pictured on the website looked like the little girl that it was purchased for (the hair). Well, I was excited to find one and I wanted to make sure that I would receive it in time to wrap it and mail it to Texas in time for Christmas.  I ordered in on the 27th and received it on Dec. 1st (I paid for faster shipping).  When I opened the box it was an Asian doll but not the one with the ponytails...this doll had short hair.  I called Amazon immediately and although they expressed being sorry they said that they could not guarantee that it wouldn't happen again. I have used Amazon before with no problems but I am extremely unhappy with the bait and switch.  I should have read the other reviews.  I will never let that happen again.  BEWARE...do not order things of this nature from this website.  You will be disappointed</review_text>
IF YOU WANT A BEAUTIFUL ASIAN DOLL, I JUST FOUND A COUPLE IN EBAY UNDER " ASIAN BERENGUER GIRL DOLL ".  THE ONE I GOT ON EBAY WAS GORGEROUS!!!  MY DAUGHTER LOVES IT AND WON'T LEAVE HOME WITHOUT IT.</review_text>
Got this for Xmas present for 2 year old. He loved it, but sounds and steam quickly stopped working with zero abuse. Incredibly cheap for a toy costing 40 bucks. This is just how to ruin a fan of the show. The folks who design such badly designed stuff should be ashamed of themselves. My son is important and deserves toys that can last more than two days</review_text>
BUYER BEWARE!!!!I recently ordered (December 15th, 2007) this product through Amazon filled by Joe Brands for my son for Christmas.  On Amazon's website it says you can cancel an order any time before it ships, if it does ship, you simply refuse receipt.  I canceled this order on December 16th less than 24 hours after I placed it, I called and emailed Joe Brands & emailed Amazon. Never the less the package arrives on December 22nd.  I called the shipping company, called and emailed Joe Brands, emailed Amazon and the package was finally picked up on the 27th of December.  The billing however has yet to be straighted out.  My credit card has yet to be credited, I do not have the product, and no one returns calls or emails.  BUYER BEWARE!!!</review_text>
My husband and I have ignored many poor reviews in choosing toys for our 18-month old and have often been pleasantly surprised to see our son thoroughly enjoying such toys.  Unfortunately, this was not the case with the Peg Perego Thomas Ride-On train. He is exceptionally tall and strong for his age, yet there is no way his hand could possibly depress the button required to keep the train moving, much less hold it down for any length of time.  So the operation of the train requires an adult to depress the button and spin in circles while your child bats your hand away and is totally distracted from the experience.  My son enjoys pushing the train along the track more than riding it.  However, the train is flimsy and easily comes off the track, so this usually lasts a few seconds before he is again frustrated and annoyed.  All this and then you need to get out the screwdriver to charge the battery every time you  "play" with it.  Don't buy this toy or you will be kicking yourselves like we are.  It's a gimmicky piece of plastic junk that even major Thomas-lovers will probably not enjoy.</review_text>
The start button is too difficult for even a three year old to hold down. The battery is tedious to re-charge (required after every use!). Dangerous. When child leans slightly to the side the entire engine will turn over. For all your time and money you will only see a child with a bored expression - or a frustrated child who can't operate start button alone. You could tape down the button and then the child must ask for you to stop it. Total supervision required any way you look at it. A real expensive, gimicky toy!</review_text>
I was so disappointed with this item. My son (who's 3) received this for his bday. The child has to continuously hold down a button with his hand to keep the train moving and my son couldn't do it. He ended up getting so frustrated, he broke down in tears! The noises the train makes are MUCH TOO LOUD! And you need a lot of room in your home to set up the track, which we do not have. I was surprised at how poorly designed this was since it's a Peg Perego. The manufacturers should've really tried this one out on the recommended age group before they released it. Why couldn't there be a pedal to step on to make it go like every other ride-on toy for little ones? I put it back in the box and back to the store it went.</review_text>
This one doesn't work. It is supposed to come on when it hits the water and it doesn't. One it came on randomly but we couldn't seem to replicate it. None of this type of fish seem to do all that well but this one is worse than the others. He is pretty though</review_text>
It never worked - period.  Not even for a second.  Get the disney fish - it doesn't look as real but at least it works.</review_text>
My five and half year old daughter asked for this particular barbie doll. She was so happy when she opened her present and found Mermaidia Elina doll. She took it out of the box and started to play with it. Soon enough she lost interest however. The wings are large, so large they are actually a burden. Placing the doll inside the mermaid tail is not easy for little hands either. All in all, this doll is just "make-up" if you see what I mean. Pretty but not easy to play with, and easily forgotten. She is on a stand in my daiughter's room, and hasn't been touched or played with since Christmas morning...Not worth the price</review_text>
I purchased this product along with the Koi and turtle and they worked for one day. The koi would not turn off unless the batteries were pulled out. The turtle would not turn on unless you physically held the button in and the fish just quit altogether and sunk to the bottom of the pool.</review_text>
I bought this for my 5 year old and as another reviewer said....he would have to be double his size for it to fit (he wears a size 5-6)....and the items attached to it keep falling off.  We had to Duct tape it together to fit him because of course I would rather have returned it...but it was his favorite present!!!  It frustrates him a lot so I do not see him sticking with it!</review_text>
I bought this for my son's fourth birthday because he's a superhero nut. It's a cute toy except for one critical flaw: it doesn't come anywhere near fitting around the waist of my average-sized 4-year-old (wears a size 4T). I'm talking about three inches of waist gap on even the smallest setting. Yet the belt can be adjusted to a size that would fit a teenager. If you have a 9-year-old who loves running around in a Batman costume, go for it. As for my 4-year-old, he still plays with it sometimes, but we keep it on him with a pair of firefighter's suspenders.Update: The thick plastic of the belt is now ripped halfway apart. We've only had it two months, and he's hardly played with it for the abovementioned reasons. Not so great for Batman, but perfect for playing Super Chintzy Toy Man</review_text>
FIRST OF ALL, THE QUALITY IS HORRENDOUS. SECOND OF ALL, THE RULES ARE SO NONSENSICAL AND COMPLICATED. I HAD TO CHANGE THE RULES JUST TO MAKE THIS GAME PLAYABLE AND ENJOYABLE. YOU THINK THAT THEY WOULD MAKE A BETTER GAME FOR LOYAL FRIENDS FANS. I GUESS NOT. AT LEAST THE QUESTIONS ARE GOOD. THEY ARE NOT ALL EXTREMELY EASY WHICH MAKES IT FUN TO PLA</review_text>
My son (now 4) loves cars, so when I saw this bed frame, I thought this is it!  Well, looks can fool you.  I also read many glowing reviews about this bed frame, so I was confident that this was a MUST buy.  But after using it for a while (1 year now), I am very disappointed.  If I would buy another bed frame, this one would not be in my shopping list.What I and all my family don't like about this frame :1.  The front end of the car frame is shaped like a sports car, so people hit that protruding part all the time when walking in the room, making people falter sometimes.2.  Since it is made of plastic, it gets really cold, and it really feels terrible.  I don't know why it is damn cold all the time.3.  I had to exchange the regular-height box spring for a half-height one, because the regular-height box spring would be too high and the sides of the bed frame would not provide adequate protection against falling.4.  So many toys and things fall between the mattress and the bed frame.  I have to lift the damn mattress and then go into the car frame to pick up all the junk that my son loves to shove into the little openings.5.  I think the bed frame takes up way too much space for a twin sized bed.  It is waste of space.6.  My son was disappointed that the wheels don't spin.  And I think he has a point, since this bed frame costs so much.  My son now don't even think it's a cool thing.  Well, he stopped liking the bed only after a few days.7.  The head part of the bed is also plastic, and for some reason, your head can go under that plastic, because that head part comes over the mattress.  It is quite annoying, and we had to put another pillow to cover that part of the frame.  And you can't even use it as a shelf since it is not flat.  Dolls and little toys that we put up there would slide down to hit our son or slide to the sides and fall into the corner where there is a big opening between the walls and the car frame.8.  Again, it is very very cold, and it really feels terrible when you want to sleep at night and everything around you is so cold and hard.This is a miserable bed, and I feel bad that I bought this horrible bed for my loving son.  We are gonna sell it for 100 dollars (we hope) in the summer.The only reason for giving 2 stars is because, it is very solid</review_text>
all non-yellow parts of the ducks are painted and come off pretty easily. a little moisture and some teeth for a minute can remove paint.  this toy is best for those who are past placing toys or anything in their mouth. I still think they are cute and a great idea...just need to be made better/safer</review_text>
The wooden Thomas the Tank Engine trains do not fit in this case.  The case is way to small for the trains to fit in.  I would not recommend anyone buying this item.  It is just a brightly painted metal box, that doesnt serve any useful purpose.  The manufactor should be ashamed for false advertising.</review_text>
My son received this as a gift.  I love that the inside is set up like "shelves".  My son loves to organize his trains in it.  I don't like how thin the metal is.  It dents as easy as a cola can.  If it were made better, it would be worth the money.  Save your money on this one and find something better made</review_text>
Well, now this carry case is a goner.  The latch will no longer close and the top rim is hopelessly bent.  It was fun while it lasted</review_text>
This game has zero replay value. Once you play the three episodes, you're done. Each run through of each episode is the same. Played through the entire disc in an hour and half. My advice: Spend a few dollars more and get Scene It!</review_text>
i bought this thinking it was going to be really cool, but it was very boring and stupid.  it contains 3 puzzles all of which a 5 yr old can do and the games are the most stupid games ever.  the one with the spinner only shows the objects on the puzzle move smaller as you look at it.  thats the whole thing.  your pupil is just going back to its smaller, regular size and it makes the picture look like it's getting smaller.  and the one with the magic cards is rediculous.  anyone can see that all you have to do is choose the cards that you can see the character you chose through.  very disapointing.  i wish i could have seen the box before i bought it.  then i would have seen just how lame this was</review_text>
My daughter plays with an older round version sit and spin at daycare alot. All the kids like it there. She got the Simon Says version for Christmas from her aunt and it pretty much sucks. She tried to play with it every once in a while but got so frustrated we have now just put it the attic because she won't touch it and it was in the way. It doesn't spin very well at all (possibly due to the oval shape??) no matter where my daughter sits on it. Also the audio is very loud and annoying with no volume control. Also it seems much cheaper made than the older style she plays with at daycare. I would say DON'T waste your money on the Simon Says Sit n Spin - try to find an older one at a second hand store or garage sale. My recommendation to Playskool would be to go back to the original design - a round sit n spin, no sound - just pure and simple fun</review_text>
I can see from reading the below reviews that I'm not the only one who hates this thing. What a total waste! I got it for my little one, remembering how much I (and every other kid I've ever known) loved this toy. Well, this version has been made too safe to have any fun on. It barely spins. If you want your toddler to develop amazing upper body strength, then force them to work out on this thing a couple times a day. It's almost impossible to spin and you never get up any momentum at all. Not to mention the loud loud music with no volume control. Which I could deal with if the thing was any fun at all</review_text>
We bought this gadget for our 2-year old. To risk sounding like a broken record--or faulty spinning plastic toy, in this case--I'll just add my vote to the design flaws:1. Volume. Not only is the volume loud, it's unbearably so. Even my daughter grabs her ears when she's playing on it. The voice is a bit garbled as well, so when the command 'Ready..Spin!' sounds more like 'Wordy...SPEW!' I prefer to spare my daughter's hearing loss for live concerts in her teenage years, so I've disabled the on/off switch.2. Spin quality. A Sit n' Spin should have a fluid, effortless motion (like a lazy susan). This toy requires enormous effort to turn. To add to my daughter's frustation, the handle's base gives a bit (even with screws tightly fastened), making for a tedious experience rather than the joy ride we loved as kids.Spare the expense and the frustration of fitting this thing in the garbage can on collection day--buy an easel and finger paint kit instead.</review_text>
My two year old absolutely would not leave the store without this and she still plays with it a year later. However, there are two problems. One, it immediately needed repair to the basic connections and, two, it has a pinching hazard between the basket and the frame. But of course, my daughter never noticed either of those. She simply loves to play with it, constantly, and has to take it on walks around the block</review_text>
The features on this toy are cute, just not planned out very well.  My boys love the music and bubbles, but the micky and goofy that go up and down on the sides broke off after a couple days.  The voice recorder is very hard to work because of a short cord. For a ride on my boyslike the radiio flyer retro rocket more.  Overall, in our house this is a bubble machine.</review_text>
I though this shark would be bigger.  I bought the same one at a gift shop in RI for 99 cents 2 years ago</review_text>
This Item is nothing like Picture poorly made I could have made a better one myself out of old pillow cases.Not worth the money avoid this item</review_text>
it lauches the marble so forcefully that the marble bounces off of the ramp it is being lauched to.  Instead of using it for the fridgits set, my youngest son used it to launch M&M's (but that's another story)..</review_text>
A friend of mine has Zombies!!!, also by Twilight Creations.  I've played it a few times, and found it pretty enjoyable.Zombietown is sort of a followup to this in some ways, and tries to expand the strategy of the game somewhat.Unfortunately, it ends up far too confusing and complicated to make for fast gameplay (it's often very slow, in fact), and the strategy is more shallow than Risk.Ya know the stereotypically confusing instructions of insert Tab A into Slot B?  That's pretty much what the instructions to this read like.  They're fairly poorly written to boot.  There were also a couple problems we ran into the rules didn't seem to cover.  I can't recall them off the top of my head, and they didn't come up very often, but it was still irritating.Overall, definetly not reccomended.  At $40 in stores, and $35 off Amazon, it's also a HUGE ripoff.  What do you get in the box?  Like 100 tiny army men-esque figures, a couple of packs of cards, and a laminated piece of cardboard.  I understand why it is expensive, as I'm sure this was a low budget item and such, but Zombies!!! was much less expensive.</review_text>
If rating a &quot;no star&quot; was possible, that's what it really deserves.  I bought this for my two year old twin boys and as I was inflating it - with a handpump - it blew at the seams!  Beyond patching!  Unfortunately they never even knew that they had it.  I would not buy it again because of the quality of the product.  How can kids be safe jumping on something that blows out when being pumped by a hand pump???  That's like blowing it up by mouth!</review_text>
I got this on clearance like 2 years ago. I new it would not hold up. I had many kids on it because I do home daycare. My rule was only 3 kids at a time. The bigger kids could only go on 2 at a time. It got 3 holes which I patched. They even took naps in it. I must of had It for about 6 months and only keep it up for like a week at a time. My problem was it was hard to store. I had to leave it inflated some and pushed it in back of my closet. Finaly one of the big kid did a big belly flop on it and popped the seem. No way was that fixable. If I ever find it on clearance again I would buy it but not for what they are asking for it. Not worth it if it will break in a couple of months</review_text>
Had 3 leaks all in the seams! Could not patch correctly even after waiting the &quot;30 mins.&quot; to re-infalte like the directions stated. My son was extremely upset. From other reviews, it sounds like there is a 50/50 chance of getting a good product</review_text>
We bought this for our 3 year old daughter for Christmas.  We turned it on right away and she was very excited until the sound suddenly started to fade out.  We thought it was just a case of dead batteries, so we replaced the batteries - several times - until we realized the product was just bad.  When trying to get it replaced, we were told they were out of stock and our money would be refunded instead.  Needless to say, our daughter was very sad and we will not be buying this product anywhere, ever.  We'll just stick with another type of keyboard to help our daughter develop a love of music</review_text>
I was looking for a durable tape player for the kids and this was not it.  The microphone only worked for a couple of weeks.  It plays tapes ok but would have liked to play with the other features before they stopped functioning.  My kids are rough on toys but not that rough</review_text>
Christmas morning, my daughter tears the paper off this toy and is soooo exited. What a disapointment. Nothing I did caused the tail to wag, the leg to move and no licking action. I changed the batteries, still nothing. After hours of trying to get it to work, I went on line here and read somebody elses review about rubbing under the collar VERY HARD. Finally, the tail wagged, the foot moved and then, it actually licked. What a piece of work, very cute but WAY too much work. In time, I will eventually rub all the fur off under the collar. Save your money</review_text>
I support the comments that others make: this game is so poorly designed, it is laughable. I cannot imagine that the designers or writers even sat down to play the game once.  Forget trying to follow the directions; they left out many important rules.  The board doesn't work, especially the way the pieces fit into it, and what a terrible ending with a spinner that doesn't even work like a spinner.  What is up with that?  Forget this game</review_text>
Well, this game is fun but I can't believe some people thought that it would actually take you into space!Well, Its kinda stupid you just take apart a house puzzle according to some stupid card. But still, the game is really fun.--- Delane</review_text>
We bought this dollhouse, because when we went to the store, it had an adorable display and looked like a step up from the Twintime Dollhouse, which has very small rooms.  You could press the button on the display, and the people would talk to each other.  My kids thought it would be great.  When we were at Toys R Us, I looked for accessory furniture/people/animal sets to go along with this dollhouse.  I did not see any.  I thought it was probably due to Christmas just having passed.  We got home, opened the dollhouse and discovered that there really were not many phrases that the provided people/furnitureanimal did, so I went to Amazon to try to find more sets in order to achieve the purpose of this dollhouse (to get the 200 phrases). Thats when reality set in that we had just made a huge mistake.  You cannot find ANY accesory pieces for this set.  You can go on Ebay and pay many times more than the original price for USED furniture.  I was really disappointed.  I even tried the Fisher Price website, only to find that they are marketing the Twintime Dollhouse furniture for this Sweet Sounds Dollhouse.  What a shame and a sham....  I really like Fisher Price toys and we have many, but I am very disappointed in the fact that they are trying to fool the consumer.  What good is a dollhouse, if you cannot get it to accomplish what it says it will do---200 phrases.  Not to mention, what is included with the Sweet Sounds Dollhouse is not much.  Just a Mom, Dad, girl, baby, swing, cradle, radio, cat, and a scant few more pieces.  Definately not enough to keep the kids interested for long!There are actually three Fisher Price dollhouses that are still available, this one, the Twintime Dollhouse, and the one we eventually ended up buying at Value City (also available on Ebay)--the Fisher Price Special Edition Townhouse.  It has a doorbell that rings, doors that open, birds that sing, phone that rings, lights that come on, fridge light comes on, computer lights up(and is part of a desk set attached to the dollhouse), and a fireplace that crackles and lights up (which is also attached to the dollhouse).  These things are all ON THE DOLLHOUSE itself.  No accesory furniture or people are needed to make this happen.  The battery replacement compartment is on the back on this dollhouse not the bottom, like the Sweet Sounds one.  The front of the Townhouse has flower boxes with likelike flowers you place in them (comes with the set).  You can get it A LOT cheaper than the Sweet Sounds Dollhouse, too (almost half the cost). It comes with a great deal of furniture:  2 beds with pillows and comforters and blankets, a lawnchair, 3 people, potted plant, real curtains, kitchen table and chairs, clothing for the people, computer chair, lounge chair and more.  The kitchen counter, stove, microwave and fridge are part of the dollhouse.  It also has closet doors that open and stairs the people can walk up.  You practically do not need to buy anything else, but if you do, you can get the Loving Family accesory people and furniture sets.  This dollhouse is so much larger to boot.  There is plenty of room to put everything. It shuts and closes together just like the Sweet Sounds, but it is clearly larger.  We also thought about the Twintime, but it had too many comments on how small the rooms were and the display at Toys R Us looked jammed packed.  I did not know how more than one child could play with it and not have a shoving match, because they could not play, as well.My kids absolutely the Townhouse with all of its sounds, especially the doorbell.  The great thing about it is that these are greatly reduced in price, because they are an older model, which is what they should do with the Sweet Sounds Dollhouse.  Let the public know ahead of time, so their kids do not get disappointed, because it does not live up to what it says at the store. Thank Goodness I was able to take mine back, because I had my receipt and box.  Be careful and keep the box and receipt if you do choose to buy this dollhouse even after all of the warnings, because after your kids see that it does not do what it says and because it is on the small side compared with the Townhouse version, they may not want to keep it. When we took ours back, a Toys R Us worker stopped and talked to us and agreed that Fisher Price is just trying to get rid of their extra stock of Sweet Sounds Dollhouses. Unfortunately, it is at the consumers expense and disappointment!!</review_text>
My 5 yr. old son got this for Christmas and played with it only while we where watching (so we know he didn't do anything to break it).  The day after Christmas morning it stopped working...we changed the batteries that came with it and still it made noise but no longer would the shovel go up and down nor would it go in reverse.  I bought this from Toys R Us in our hometown.  I  threw the box away on Christmas day so I can't take it back.  I will try calling the company.</review_text>
I'm sure this would be a fun toy, but for us it didn't last long enough to find out.  We had this in our pool for 5 minutes and one of the guns stopped working.  The boys were very disappointed!I will be taking this back to the store tonight and try to exchange it with a new one that hopefully works</review_text>
Painting the plates is a fun activity because you can be creative. The only problem is that you have to be careful or they could crack or break</review_text>
Want a sure fire way to kill your party??  Put this DVD in, turn the music off, make people sit down and play this game.  It was not fast, it was not frightening, it was not fun. Your guests would have more fun watching the paint dry in your basement</review_text>
This is a very cute set however, it's not very well made and the holders are free-standing so when a ball knocks against it they fall over.  In regular croquet the wires are pushed into the ground so you don't have that problem.  With kids . . . the stands are knocked over frequently so you have to run over and set them back up in order for the game to continue.  I wouldn't buy this set again if I had it to do over.  Disappointing</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter when she was 2. I agree with the other reviewer about the weight of the product. It is so heavy that it can actually hurt a child if it turns over. I still let my daughter play with it but only when she's being supervised around it. And I have to make sure that the toy is not on any type of unstable ground. There are other good shape sorters out there - I wouldn't waste the money on this one because of the potential safety hazard.</review_text>
We bought this toy and returned it as it is poorly designed.  Because it is tall and narrow, once a few blocks are in it, it is nearly impossible to get any of the shapes in the lowest holes as the space inside the building is filled with blocks already.  This was a frustrating, not very fun toy for our then 12 month old son</review_text>
This seemed to be well put together and would do the job fine except it was not stated anyware that I saw as to the weight the zip line was for.  Rated at only 100 pounds was not enough of a weight limit for this child.  This information should be published in the advertisment</review_text>
The first time I "flew" the chicken it flopped 2 feet in front of me.  The second time it went about 6 feet.  The third time it decapitated!  I was left with a piece of stuffed chicken in each hand.  Unless you are accomplished at disassembling and reassembling stuffed animals, it is not repairable.Save your money for something else</review_text>
My daughter loves the van but can rarely use it all alone! The doors pop off the babies fall out of their seats the stroller gets stuck on the roof rack (an elastic band) and the seat belts are just annoying! I can't even buckle them all up! Needless to say she still wants to play with it</review_text>
I'm sorry no as a matter of fact I am not sorry this doll looks like she can be in three six mafia video dancing in the background. Who told Mattel that this was a good idea? Is this Mattel's vein attempt to give the dolls an "urban" feel if Mattel feels this is appropriate to teach young girls to dress like ho's and teach them that their body is all that they have to offer then Mattel has some messed up views of the world. Honestly people this doll is not innocent looking it looks like it could be on that HBO documentary about hookers. What happened to the times when a kid could be a kid and play with a normal looking doll.</review_text>
We like the lunchbox because of the cute designs,but were a little disappointed in it's durability. The first time I dropped it on the ground,it scratched off parts of the design. So,mom did some creative thinking and did some touch up paint and sealed the design with "self laminating sheets". That did the trick. We also wished the thermos and lunchbox were insulated. Other than that, it's o.k</review_text>
My son is a Thomas fanatic.  This lunchbox didn't last one week without one of the legs snapping off, so it wouldn't stand up.  Then a few weeks later, he dropped it and the handle shattered.  Total waste of money.  It's a shame - it has a nice storage box in front, but the quality is below even what I'd expect from a Chinese sweatshop</review_text>
The box was a huge hit with my 4 year old and he LOVED the extra, "hidden" compartment for his treat on the front.  Ours however got a crack in it within the first few weeks.  It must have dropped just right on a corner.  It's still usable, but we'll probably be switching before Christmas break</review_text>
I would not suggest the purchase of this product as you will only get a few laughs before it starts falling apart to a useless stage.  If you have the money, and you want to buy it go ahead.  Maybe it's a great product and I just got a defective one, but still not a good show of product to me on their part</review_text>
Just about everything negative that can be said about this doll has been said here, but I still feel that I have to put my two cents in.  My daughter will be nine next month and, as always, she wants a Barbie doll for her birthday.  This is one doll that not only will my daughter NOT be getting, but one that she will never even see if I can help it.  Little girls love things that are shiny and sparkly and glitzy, but this doll goes way beyond that.  The doll looks like a [...].  The clothes and makeup just do not make sense in any other context.  Yes, it's just a doll, and it's the parent's responsibility--not the toy company's--to teach kids what is okay and what isn't.  But do you want your sweet little girl looking at this and imagining how pretty she will look one day in a crotch-length skirt?</review_text>
This is a new low, even for our feminazi-drenched anti-culture.  The whole message of this whore of a doll is to tell impressionable little girls that being superficial, arrogant, shallow and slutty are positive attributes, desirable & healthy, and that by contrast, having true strength of character, integrity, honor and modesty are for 'losers.'  In other words, looking and behaving like a skank tramp = "empowerment."  That term has been SO misued over the last 30 years (and particularly the last 10), that it ceases to have any truth to it whatsoever.  Barbie used to epitomize what it meant to be feminine, a lady, and fulfilled -- with a husband, a home and children.  Now that standard has been completely perverted and ruined with the onset of dolls like this -- exchanging true values (being a good wife and mother) for false ones (materialism and promiscuity).  Even Barbie's face has been uglified -- grossly overdone mascara/eyeliner and collagened-out lips -- resembling those hideous whored-out Bratz dolls.  Realize -- this is a WAR on our children's souls!Mattel should be ashamed of themselves, to the hilt.  This is child abuse, pure and simple.  Any mother who allows their child to get one of these monstrosities should be jailed for neglect and have her tubes tied</review_text>
Isn't Barbie supposed to be pretty? She looks like an ugly prostitute, hands down. I wouldn't "wear that to a club" and neither would ANY of my friends. Her make up is gross, and especially the look on her face says, "Do me now." There's a difference between beauty and over-the-top trashy. You can't deny that she looks like a porn-star, which is an industry that is illegal for teenagers who get this doll to participate in, but I guess we're preparing our youth for this at a younger age now</review_text>
Ever wonder what drives someone's daughter to go into porn? This has got to be some of the most irresponsible marketing ever. Please do yourself a favor and make sure toy companys get the message to stop peddling this type of garbage</review_text>
Ok, I don't have this doll, I won't buy this doll...If I ever have a little girl she will never have anything like this. I saw some girls saying how the doll was appropriate for 10-13 and I almost fell out of my chair! This doll is -IN-appropriate for someone under 21! The short skirts the short tops. How the heck can Mattel think that this was a good idea? I'm 23 years old and I would NEVER dress like that NOR would I allow my CHILD to dress like that. Bottom line: SHAME ON YOU MATTEL!!</review_text>
This is pretty much kid vs kid only.  Adults cannot play along.  You can make it into a solo game for one child, but its really more like flash cards for spelling if you do that.The product is basically a set of flash cards for spelling, with some letter cubes for the kids to spell out the words.  The rules propose two games, which are basically see if the kids spells the word right, they get to keep the card if they do, first kid with 5 cards wins.  Adults can pretend to play along if the child is younger and will "fall for it."  It really works as a game only if there are two kids the same age playing.I don't know, but I can't see my daughter pulling this out when a friend comes over.  Therefore, to the extent this is a set of flash cards for spelling, its kind of expensive for what it is.Don't get me wrong, you can definitely make it into a learning tool.  Your call.</review_text>
Like many others, the arm on my 4 year olds excavator broke as well  Who can we contact for help?  There is NO information on the box</review_text>
Toy makes EXTREMELY loud animal noises, along with a screeching motor when backing up or at top speed going forward.  My son enjoyed the heck out of it for about 2 minutes before my wife said it was going back to the store, which is exactly what I was thinking.At least 3-4x louder than any other toy i've ever seen, let alone purchased.Also when performing its "flip" maneuver, it gets stuck 70% of the time and then makes the same screeching motor sound while it repeatedly tries to reset its "flip arm".Might be okay for just outside use if you can stand a lot of high pitched noise.Controller was extremely toddler friendly compared to other RC toys.  Toy also seemed fairly tough.</review_text>
I bought this for my 4 year old grandson for Christmas.  We opened it up and sat on the floor and began putting it together.  He was excited because he is a Lighting McQueen fan.  He got about four pieces of it together and got very frustrated.  It would not stay together.  THE PUZZLE IS JUNK!!!!!!!!  The pieces are not flat and do not interlock so that they stay together.  He lost interest and left.  I finished it enough so that they were laying together to see the picture - which is very cute.  But, no way would they ever all fit together.  Do not waste your money on this.  I also had to retape the corners of the box, as they were all coming apart too.  Yea for cheap imports.  The USA is so much better off for them???????</review_text>
a waste of my hard to come by money--- I am on a fixed income and bought this item for my 10 month old grandson for Christmas. Really a disappointment, good idea-BUT he can't even hear the animal sounds because they are so low..... If I could have taken it away from him, I definitely would have returned it for a refund!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Big disappointment. Cheaply made. T-rex model does not snap together, can not even fit together as parts are improperly molded.  Microscope less functional than a magnifying lens.  Volcano is ok, the plaster does work, but you must provide ingredients for the eruption.  Weather center very very flimsy and breaks.  I was quite surprised a name like Smithsonian would be associated with this low of quality in a product.  Supplies for crystals subpar for what is required.  Was an enormous disapointment after the holidays for my sons.</review_text>
I have to agree with the first two comments.   We went to check it out after my 4 year old saw it on TV and liked it because the bear had glasses just like him. The product seemed decent in the store, so we bought it. He has only played with it once or twice since Christmas. The only time he had fun with it was when I got mad and yelled at the thing because it wouldn't do what it is supposed to.  SAVE YOUR MONEY AND DON'T BUY THIS JUNK</review_text>
I bought this for my 5 year old daughter for Christmas.  She played the sound game.  She always got the answer correct, but 60-70% of the time the bear still said it was incorrect.  The rest of the family tried it and it did the same thing.  Therefore, this is not a learning toy and it is no fun.  After trying a few times and the bear telling my daughter she was incorrect when she actually was, she decided she hated the thing and didn't ever want to play with it again.  I took the thing back to the store and got a refund</review_text>
I bought this with high hopes of getting a well modeled vehicle. It took about only ten minutes to put together, and it comes with General Greivous!!! But, the legs are really weird. I wasted $20.00 dollars at a local super target I could have got a star wars video game or a few figs..... I just like adding it to my collection. But, if you have the Obi-Wan with Boga, put them together like I did.The Star Wars saga has introduced some really good toys, I am just saying that this toy is fairly good. Not a favorite. I suggest it to a collecter only........I love the line of E3 collectables. They really rock. I suggest this because it is okay in the stage of durable and fun. Star Wars E3 General Greivous' wheel bike is a great toy I hope people should think about buying</review_text>
This is more for a kid who is 4 or 5 years old NOT 8-11 as it states.Talk about a waste of money. I returned this the next day for a refund as my 10 year old daughter would have been so upset with me had she received this under the Christmas tree this year.It was a shame the description wasn't more accurate, because I was not refunded my expedited shipping costs I paid for this "TOY"Thumbs Dow</review_text>
Just what the world needs, another clone of the worst board game ever to sell like hotcakes.I can not think of any reason to recommend this game. The winner is determined by luck, there is no skill involved in winning this or any game of monopoly. The game hardly fits into a single evening of play, and for a few unlucky players who exit early that means either sitting around watching or finding something else to do (This may be a blessing if it means not playing anymore).So to anyone who is buying this to play it (not because you are a huge dog fan and must own everything that has a dog on it) I recommend that you look into a better product.I would start by going to Google and searching on "board game". Follow the 1st link you find</review_text>
this product arrived broken and all the pieces are smashed.  The saddest part is it was a birthday gift for a child who really wanted to play.  Now, learning I purchased this from toys r us via amazon have found i cannot return it to amazon it has to go thru the manufacturer. To rate this product is very hard because it is in pieces.</review_text>
I bought this for my 7 year old son. It did not take long before the A and B buttons became stuck in the down position. The games were not that challenging for a 7 year old. But he thought it was great when the A and B buttons fouled up, he said it made it more of a challenge. Dad thinks the thing is a piece of crap</review_text>
I purchased this for my sons birthday this year. He is three. He was so excited to have the play tent but when I took it out of the box and started to put it together I noticed the stitching was not straight and missing in some places. It took him no more than 24 hours to brake it. The plastic supports and cheap fabric were horrible. There was also a center support pole with no place to put it. He likes it but the quality craftmanship was a ZERO.</review_text>
"Jack" doesn't pop up after only a few weeks of owning it.  Don't waste your money</review_text>
I bought this for my pony-obsessed daughter for Christmas, mostly because it was the only way to get the Breezie "Zipzee" (one of the main Breezies in the new movies). Thank goodness I wasn't expecting much out of this toy after reading reviews on the other playsets, because it didn't even last a day! After I assembled the "braiding" handle and my daughter quickly learned how to operate it herself, she came out not an hour later in tears because it had fallen apart. Not the handle you snap on, mind you. That was still firmly attatched. The rest of the mechanism had more or less disintegrated as she used it! Fortunately she gets enough use out of Zipzee and Daffidaisy that it wasn't too much of a loss that I had to throw it away only hours after opening the box.  So, unless you're really after Zipzee or Daffidaisy, don't waste your money on this junky thing that could potentially be a choking hazaard for younger siblings. Horrible!!</review_text>
I bought this as a Christmas present for my 4-year-old daughter.  She is a huge My Little Pony fan.  Ponyville lives in our house in fact.  We got it out and played with it for a couple hours.  We didn't have the problems described with the hand crank.  That seems to be very durable.  The problem is with the flower that Zippee goes in.  A pony steps on the flower to open the flower and then you wind the gear counter clockwise to close it.After a couple hours, the flower petals are now broken and can't be repaired.  Toys certainly don't have the quality in them that they used to.  Hasbro's quality in general has declined.  This was demonstrated in the newest My Little Pony Castle as well.This toy has some neat features.  The crank works well and the braiding mechanism is useful.  The Breezie that lives in the flower goes along with the story in the My Little Pony video series.  The colors are vivid and bright.  I would have liked to suggest that the pink stage that the Daffidazey stands on should have had built-in storage to hold the hair accessories.  Some additional clips would also have been a nice addition to this set.  4 clips for a set that is designed to do all your ponies' hair is a bit skimpy.  The braids are nice and tight and even a young child can operate this toy....with a bit of assistance.  (Hint:  Putting suction cups or velcro hook and loop on the bottom makes it even easier for little ones to play with minimal adult assistance)</review_text>
worst product ever.  I really trust crayola, but am having doubts after these new outdoor products.  Theyre just terrible- made shotty- they dont work.. i am very disappointed.this spins so fast that none of the paint comes out- then it just pours out in a big wet mess.just awful</review_text>
We bought this for my daughter for her birthday.  Like the previous reviewer we also didn't realize we needed to dilute the paint first.  Even with the paint diluted properly it doesn't really work as expected.  You have to wait for the paint to drip down to the bottom of the tube and then turn the spinner on.  Even then only a bit of paint comes out and you have to turn it off and wait for more to drip down.  I plan on returning this toy for a refund as well.</review_text>
I bought this product for my children because it looked neat!  What they don't tell you is that the paint must be diluted before you can use it (why not include the pre-diluted paint?  But I digress....).  Even after thinning the paint, the product hardly spins.  If we could get it to work, it seemed like a neat concept.  But it just doesn't work.  I have no idea if it is because it needs very thin paint or the motor is weak or what.  We returned ours for a refund</review_text>
I purchased this item for my 5 year old daughter who loves Barbie.  It is a simple game, but maybe a little too simple.  She got bored with it really fast.  She played it once and never again.  The board was very flimsy and not made well</review_text>
Our boys had a good time with this toy, but after a 5-6 launches it broke! Not just the wings but the plastic body.  I feel like it was a waste of money and over priced</review_text>
I am very disappointed with this product.The volume is not adjustable, and the default sound setting is so loud that it can be heard in another room, even with a door closed.Electronic toy voices are occasionally annoying or difficult to understand, this is the case here. So, needing to have something repeated... loudly... can "get on your nerves".I will be more careful in the future and not assume that all speaking electronic toys come with adjustable volume.Buyers beware!</review_text>
My stepmom bought a set of these for each of my three kids ages 12, 9, and 6. All I have to say is do not buy these!!!! My six year old did great on the first page but as the other reviewer said the film gets all over the markers. we even tried washing them off and it did no good. Also when my 6 year old was coloring he would rest his arm on the bottom of the page and when he would pick it up it would be covered in black. Bottom line about 30 minutes after they got them my kids arms and faces were COVERED in black smudges as were my hands somewhat just from holding their pictures to look at them. MESSY MESSY MESSY.  My 12 year old finally just went and stuck one of the papers under running water and washed off all the black to see the neon underneath and this proved to be the least messy but least rewarding way to do it. Good idea bad execution. My kids who are crazy for any kind of arts and crafts HATED these things. Save your money and buy regular papers and markers and crayons</review_text>
My son loves the Color Wonder line by Crayola, so when I saw that they came out with a new creation called Color Explosion, which is another marker-type of product, I knew I had to try it.  Now, I wish I'd saved my money.First off, you should know this product is not for preschoolers.  Color Explosion is recommended for children 6-years and up.  Now that I've played with it, I concur.  I came upon this product when arrangements were made to watch my 9 and 10-year old nieces for a week.  I thought the Color Explosion would be a hit, and I planned to treat them with this "art" related project throughout the week.  They were excited to try it, and once I settled Monkey Boy, my 5-year old, with a project of his own, we got started.At first glance, it looked to be a winner.  The girls were having fun.  Then, we started another page, and the markers became icky.  Gummy is probably a better description.  The markers were covered with a black film, which caused the images to look splotchy, and streaky.  Crayola suggests you wipe the markers off with a paper towel, so we did.  It kept happening.  For instance, we'd draw a short line, and then we'd have to wipe the film off again.  Then, we tried to wipe off the images with a paper towel.  That didn't help either.Color Explosion is too painstaking for a child's activity.  We began to realize that it wasn't a blast, but a bummer.  Crayola warns against moisture, but even fingerprints will spear the pages, and the film comes off onto your hands, the table, and everything else.  Oh, and if you use the glitter set, it clumps, and mixes with the film, and makes a liquidy black goo that stains fabrics.  The company warns about staining, and suggests washing immediately, but come on.  Did they even test market this product?  What I thought would be an entertaining venture, turned out to be a messy disappointment.</review_text>
I bought this toy along with Mr. Incredible for my son's birthday.  He loves the movie and was very excited to get these toys.  Unfortanitly, they lasted all of five minutes before Syndromes head fell off, and Mr. Incredibles hand broke off.  After that I had to deal with a crying kid.  If you want the toy just to look at, then it is good, but if you buy it for your child,don't expect it to last long</review_text>
To start with, the description of this kit is false. There are NOT 75 pieces... only 11. The detail is VERY, VERY poor... large soft-edged raised blocks with only the vaguest resemblance to the Death Star as seen in the films. You'd honestly be better off starting with a smooth plastic ball & making a Death Star from scratch, rather than buying this kit.</review_text>
As Star Wars kits go, it's better than most. Ertl should have spent more time on the molds and getting the details right.The kit, while having very few parts, is not a novice kit. It has fit issues and badly &#65279;mis-aligned parts. The upper and lower fuselages do not mate well and the solar panels do not align well with the hull. The solar panels tend to cant to the rear, not setting in line with the fuse.It's a case of both of the parts, the solar panels and the fuselage being out of alinement. Much work is needed to get the solar panels to aline with the hull and the mounting pylons.One bright spot is the well defined, engraved panel lines and the small details. The upper hatch and cockpit glass is the clearest of the Star Wars kits I have built.It's better than the X-Wing and other fighters and is as good in the detail department as the AT-AT. Having not built the rare Tie Fighter kit, I cannot say how it rate against it.Once the fit problems are dealt with, and a good paint job is applied, it makes a good display, but it requires some modeling experience to get it to look as it should. The stand is not sturdy enough for the weight of the model. I suggest a clear plastic rod and a wooden base</review_text>
This product is a box o' junk.  My son got this for Christmas this year and it is not even worth whatever the person paid for it.  The hat fell apart within three days (and he hardly played with it - just wore it on his head a few times) - the metal rim around the hat came undone and now there is a sharp metal point sticking out through the cloth on the hat, which is obviously dangerous.  I contacted the company and they have not responded.</review_text>
The Barbie Plug and Play 12 Dancing Princesses thing is a joke.  My daughter only wanted that for Christmas for three months.  After the one on Christmas morning did not function at all, the second one was so terrible that she gave up after two days.  The graphics are straight from 1981 and the "dancing princesses" even make roboty bendy noises as they move.  Very strange and disappointing</review_text>
doesn't do much for the price.  basically your daughter watches the ballet dancers on the tv screen & tries to follow along.  it's not even step by step & frankly it's somewhat difficult to follow.  wish i had spent my $$ on something else.  :</review_text>
I wouldn't even give this toy one star if I wasn't forced to.  Mattel should be ashamed of themselves for putting out a product with 1980's graphics and even worse sound.  It sounds like my husband's 1985 Casio watch.  The only thing they did well with this product is market it.  I gave this to my daughter from Santa and I am still going to return it.</review_text>
I have to agree with the other on here. I got this for my 5yr for christmas and She seemed to enjoy it the first day using it but now It sits in her room plugged into the tv and she hasnt really gotten much use out of it. I was thinking it was going to be more of a mat where you learn to dance from the mat, not oh watch the charaters on the tv and follow thier lead. I tried and didn't think it was all that fun either. I threw the box away and I'm sure I need that to return it. If I could I would get her something else in return that she could use</review_text>
Again, the graphics are horrible, the mat is boring and not colorful. My 3 1/2 yr old had a hard time matching the colors on the tv to the ones on the mat b/c they are so faded. She used it once and it has been sitting in the corner ever since...complete waste of money</review_text>
This was very dissapointing!! my daughter was so excited to get it and could barely use it. the mat is supposed to be color coordinated with the screen however the colors seem to be all the same shade. The mat looks like it comes from the dollar store, or they ran out of color at the factory. My daughter asked her sister why mommy got this ugly one....not like the box or commercial!</review_text>
Santa gave this to our daughter this year.  I am thoroughly disappointed with it.  We put the batteries in and started it up.  After reading the how to part, the graphics are terrible.  I had to prompt her to which flower to step on, not that that was necessary.  The princesses started dancing without stepping on the flower, it just made a funny sound.  The dancers go fast and fuzzy.  You can't tell for sure what the foot work is doing for the ballroom steps.  I even went on the mat and "tried."  My daughter lasted all of about five minutes and was done.  I hope Santa will take this back</review_text>
My daughter just received this as a Christmas gift.  She was so excited.  My husband and mother-in-law went to the tv to install it.  15 minutes later my five year old is in tears.  I wish this had been reviewed before we purchased.  The graphics are terrible.  This will be going back to the store.  Glad I still have the receipt.</review_text>
Like many overhead gym type toys, this one turns out to be for short or legless babies. When my daughter kicks the kickplates, she kicks the toy right away from her (and this is on carpet), and when we brace the toy against something, she kicks herself right out from under the toy. We have found the same to be true for a number of similarly designed toys. Now that we have looked at the box more closely, the baby in the picture has his/her legs bent really hard in order for the baby to fit under the toy. Our daughter is 3 1/2 months old and is already too big for this. On a positive note, this is a very well made toy in all other respects. Looks durable, as are all Chicco toys, and the music and lights are pleasant. Another negative: you apparently have to push the two hanging toys to get them to activate sound and lights, and most babies want to pull them. Might be good for a tummy toy, but we're not waiting for that--we'll try the Chicco 3 in 1 gym instead, as it appears to be a much better bang for the buck and does not have a kick plate</review_text>
Wish I could give this a negative.  When I did finally get a sticker out, it wouldn't stay stuck to anything for more than five minutes.  Ended up sending it back to the wholesaler as unworkable and overpriced</review_text>
I recently purchased this computer for my twin granddaughters who are four.  I have returned them because the screen is too small.  Additionally, I thought it would have a word processor; it does not.  It is game oriented</review_text>
It's Christmas Day, and believe me, the only thing that would get me to sit down at a computer is the level of dissatisfaction I've had with the Thomas battery powered engines.  These trains derail constantly.  I think it is because all four wheels have power, and the front wheels have too much traction, so they are able to climb out of the grooves.  Took me all night to set up a really cool track, and they derail every 40 seconds or so.  Read: 3 year old yelling at train.  Thank goodness I also bought a Brio battery powered engine as well (the Polar Express one).  It works much better.  It has not derailed once all morning.  It also is better in the following ways: 1) It shuts off after 2 minutes so you don't lose battery power, 2) it can go into freewheel mode when you want to use it without power, 3) it goes in reverse, 4) it makes train sounds, 5) the coupling to other cars has a swivel which means it is less likely to derail and more likely to maintain the magnetic connection, 6) it comes with batteries installed.  If "Santa Claus" had not disposed of all the packaging last night, I would return all the battery operated Thomas Trains and go with Brio ones.  Note: there is a good thomas battery powered car which is the jet engine.  This jet engine has the swivel, and seems not to derail, maybe because it pushes the other cars in front of it</review_text>
This kit is very poorly detailed, and matches the filming miniatures only in the sense of the basic overall profile being pretty close.There's a MUCH better model of an X-Wing out there. Do a web search for a company called "Fine Molds"... it's a Japanese company that makes a finely-detailed 1/72 scale X-Wing that is modeled directly from the filming miniatures, including parts to build different ships from the original film's Death Star battle, including standing & seated pilot figures & different droid types.It's a bit more expensive than this kit, but you get what you pay for.</review_text>
We had it for two weeks then it  broke.  The screen flashes on and off for no reason.  Nothing happened to it--it just started doing that.  Very weird.  No online support available from fisher price for this system either.  I bought several games that cannot be played now.  The kids liked it while it lasted though. We also have a Leapster which has lasted us eight months so far.  My boys like it much better too!!  So if you're going to buy a learning system I would recommend the leapster.</review_text>
I bought this for our 3yo son who loves heavy equipment and digging in the dirt. This is a cool toy as far as being a pretty good replica of a real one but it does not work well in dirt or sand. Fine sediment gets caught in tracks and after a short amount of time, the tracks quit turning. Then the handles on the arm do not move the bucket well. My son has since ripped off the tracks and does not do any digging with it but still enjoys pushing it around. Don't buy this if you want your kid to actually dig dirt, it would be good inside toy or outside but away from dirt or sand. But, I think it was intended for playing in these areas, so the rig is not that well designed.</review_text>
I had two problems with this item.  First, the planter is very small (only about 6 inches in length).  Secondly, it never grew!  I bought it for a first grade science experiment, but the class was very disappointed because nothing happened.  This item was not worth the money spent</review_text>
When my grandson first received the game he loved it! Then he and his family had to re-locate which meant taking down the game. When they got to their new home, the game doesn't stay up like it did</review_text>
I picked this item up for my 6 year old nephew who loves science.We put it together one night and I was surprised to find that the base and volcano are incredibly thin plastic that crack under any pressure at all. The plaster/sand mixture was impossible to work with, it just balled up into clumps and there was no real way of spreading it around smoothly. We both ended up with plaster all over us. Once it had dried, he was excited to get to paint it. As soon as he began to paint, parts of the plaster started breaking off in chunks.Hooking the plastic tubing up was not a major problem but I had issues keeping it hooked together. The "pump" system was supposed to send vinegar into a baking soda chamber to push up into the volcano. Instead the "pump" (which was a squeeze bottle) pushed the vinegar weakly upwards and then once it hit the baking soda chamber it clogged up. When it finally made its way out through the volcano after me squeezing the bottle as hard as possible, it barely trickled out. Once it had trickled enough, the rest of the plaster fell off as it got wet. He and his sisters just looked at me and asked "Is that it?" After three tries we trashed the whole thing.Also, the "rock samples" that they give you in the kit are the size of the tip of your fingernail. I'm a geologist and these are not rare, expensive rocks. There was no reason to not include larger samples.He was very disappointed in the whole thing and so was I. I can't believe that the Smithsonian put their name on this product. We'll go back to our plaster volcano with vinegar and baking soda</review_text>
These trains are very neat and my sons loved them when we first got them.  They each have been through two sets with the same result...the water leaks out after you've had them awhile.  They are not worth the money.  I highly recommend investing in another train instead of the aquarium cars.  This was the first time my guys have been disappointed with a Thomas product.</review_text>
As others have stated the DVD mini-games are nearly impossible to play due to wonky controls. I also have no idea what the cards or pieces are for, other then they may come into play if you "win" the main game.They should have just done a choose your own adventure type game.  It would have been less high-tech, but you could at least have a laugh when you choose "set up a perimeter" and the terrorists once again escape.DO NOT BUY</review_text>
Wow, I have never seen anything like this.  It's worse than bad; it is virtually unplayable from a technical perspective.  At the very least, Amazon should refuse to carry it</review_text>
This game was put together with a nice concept, be a CTU agent and help Jack Bauer stop the terrorist attack.  Also, I liked the fact that there is a mole and that someone right next to you could destroy the whole game.  However, the interactive games and such used to get more clues are not made well.  Though you try to do what it tells you to do, it doesn't seem to work.  Since these interactive parts are so simple, yet not made in a way that one can control what is going on, you waste your time trying to do them and you never get to the end.  I had three college students and two adults try it adn no one could seem to get it to work correctly.  So, if some bugs were worked out, this game could be a much bigger success</review_text>
Sure wish my mother-in-law had read these reviews before giving this to me for Christmas.  Tried to play it once with my parents, who are also big 24 fans, a few nights later and were sorely disappointed. This game was obviously just shoved out the door to feed off the popularity of 24 the show and not to garner any popularity in its own right.The mini-games were an exercise in extreme frustration.  The problem is that the DVD is not ideal for those mini-games.  Whenever you try to move there are only two subsequent animations: the successful one and the unsuccessful one, which made it seem like it was just moving at random. Other than that it seemed like the game was going to be pretty linear, the clue cards contained no useful information, and the board completely superfluous, unless apparently you are masochistic enough to get to the bonus level</review_text>
This was a waste of money!!  I bought these for my daughter Sophie, who is 23 months old, as a Valentines Day gift.  The crayons are very small and the holder makes them appear to be bigger.  The crayons all kept falling out of their holders and my daughter didn't enjoy playing with them.  I WAS NOT IMPRESSED and DO NOT RECOMMEND these to anyone.</review_text>
I'm not going to go into my childhood, or how I love the Transformers or any of that stuff, I just wanted to give a quick review.  As always, you get what you pay for.  I bought this today and within five minutes of transforming it one of the joints popped out and I can't for the life of me get it to sit correctly back in the socket.Bottom line is that it is very cool that ten dollars will get you a G1 inspired Astrorain or Starscream, but be aware these feel very flimsy and are definately better utilized sitting on your desk at work in robot mode than being transformed back and forth while you are bored watching TV.Very cool, very flimsy, very inexpensive</review_text>
Santa brought this item.  We opened it several days later and it broke the same day.</review_text>
We purchased all of the figures for my daughter for Christmas.  Within 2 weeks of her receiving this one, the pin fell out of her leg and her leg fell off.  We replaced it with a new one and the pin on the leg of that one fell off within a month.  The head does not stay on invisible violet, Syndrome broke in half, Violet's pin fell out of her arm, and Mr. Incredible lost the pin in his leg.  My daughter does not play rough with her toys.  Just normal play and they fell apart.  Also, Helen is supposed to be Elasta girl.  Why didn't they make her stretch?  Didn't make sense to me</review_text>
This toy was so frustrating, the pieces wouldn't snap together properly and it was messy and my son ended up walking away from it he was so fed up.   This was after a half an hour of me attempting to make the pieces fit together properly.  In the end, it looked like a pile of cloudy lime Jello with plastic bones sticking out of it.  I would not reccomend this toy</review_text>
I don't usually write reviews but had to voice my opinion on this toy.  I agree with the other review that the dolphins do not stay attached to the chariot and this frustrates my 4-year-old daughter!  Also our dolphins fall off and the one that is supposed to flip around gets stuck and does not flip half the time.  All that being said, she loves it</review_text>
OK as far as novelty goes these ducks are SOOOO funny and what a great take on the rubber ducky!!! I bought them for my 1 year old just because I am sooooo tired of the original version of the yellow ducky.Anyone who feels this lil duck TOY is devil worship to has some serious issues, and I would suggest they need to seek some professional help.So for the faint of heart dont buy the duck because I think it has magical powers which will make you giggle in delight.</review_text>
On the shelf or on line, this trucks shovel appears to lock into position above the rig but it doesnt. It took me nearly 10 minutes to remove strapping anchored to this truck within the packaging. My son spent a minute playing with this truck only to move on to his other toys. Yeah, the shovel portion drags on the floor and will NOT lock into position above the rig. This truck can hardly be moved through the carpet much less in sand. I grew up with Tonka trucks and this was obviously designed by some young suit that was babysat by the television and playstation. If your looking for a durable fun truck for your child, move on as this truck wont get the smile your looking for.</review_text>
OK this isnt really a review but more of a reaction to another review, which in my opinion was written by no child.  It's just a doll...get over it. And stop wasting the space where some of us people actually write real reviews. I just had to say something about that. Oh...I did order this doll but I'm still waiting for her to arrive :</review_text>
This item is REALLY small. I didn't read the other reviews and missed the info on the actual size of the item. In hindsight, I wouldn't have order it had I paid more attention. I think the other products from Haba (eggs and teabags) are worth the money for the size.</review_text>
This is VERY small. It's too small for a play kitchen. And you only get one not two like is pictured</review_text>
I received my order today, and discovered (as with all of the Hasa products in my order) that although more than one item is pictured--  only one comes with the order.  The item itself is very small, 2 1/2" X 1".  That, fine, I can accept since the cost was under two dollars and since the item is made of wood, lifesize would make play a work-out for most children. However, shipping only one without a clear statement that each order is for ONE item and does not include all the items in the photograph is false advertising</review_text>
This game is NOT for die hard fans of FRIENDS. The game bored me in 5 minutes. You need to watch like three episodes to get most of the questions correct and a lot of it are common sense. I was not at all challenged and did not enjoy playing this game and want to sell it back after playing it for 30 minutes. Don't buy it</review_text>
The main issue is the controls. We are having a hard time getting this thing to fly well and the idea of pulling down to go down is weird to us pilot types. It tends to just nose dive regardless. We will give it another go at the park tomorrow but so far all it does is crash. That it's still in one piece is amazing</review_text>
They show a pony in the picture. But You won't get it, just be careful when you think you will get the dining set and the pony. If you mistakly bought it . Just keep it. You will only get partial refund which is half the buying price.</review_text>
The horse doesn't stay hooked on to the carriage too well. It always comes apart. It's a pain. It's also tricky to get the horse to stay standing. It's cute to look at, but my daughter lost interest in it quickly</review_text>
Cheaply put together and does not include the things listed on the editorial review.  I am extremely disappointed.  The sides fall out when you close it making the crayons dislodge and roll around.  It is obvious that hinges on the box will wear out quickly.  I just cant believe it is such poor quality coming from Crayola</review_text>
This is junk, cheap plastic, no instructions, arrived with some pieces broken (not in shipping); much better products available for the cost.  From the description, I expected a much better product.  This is not it; a bargain at 1/3 the price, maybe</review_text>
Back in the day (1970's) these were made with a stiff, strong PLASTIC, rigid "insert" w/ the poly-rope outside. This gave the "leash" a realistic, "tight but curved under own weight" appearance, & a believable / realistic "bounce" to the "dog" with the most imperceptible wrist action on the part of the "dog walker". HOWEVER, THIS PIECE OF CRAP has a thick soft wire inside the leash, and this gives the leash a very phony, fake-looking, too-heavy, all bent-up look. PIECE OF JUNK PIECE OF JUNK PIECE OF JUNK !</review_text>
The idea behind this toy was a cute one, but it stops there.  Within five minutes of playing with this toy, it broke.  The dog halter broke off the wire leash and could not be repaired.  The whole thing ended up in the trash on Christmas Day!</review_text>
I love legos, however I too was not real impressed with the 50th Anniversary tub. The Lego.com websites description of the contents: Each bucket includes LEGO System bricks in your favorite LEGO colors, plus a handful of gold-colored bricks! Let's be real, we're talking a child's handful, not adult. My daughter was lucky enough to get 8 gold bricks in her bucket. Another child I know got 4, his brother 5. The duplo set I bought had 6. If you're buying for the gold bricks, it's not worth the money</review_text>
There are many significant shortcomings in this interactive DVD game.  I do not recommend it at all. It is not at all like the real Feud. The most frustrating shortcoming is that you must get the answers in the right order, since it reveals them in order, or you lose.  No steals, no strikes.  Sadly, I can't return it since its a DVD game</review_text>
This game fell apart after we got out of the box.  I didn't even get a chance to play this with my five year old before it fell apart.  Be careful, I wouldn't get this if you have children who are rough on their toys..</review_text>
Long story short.  Bought for daughter for Christmas...it is in the trash...This was THE WORST TOY/DOLL purchase ever</review_text>
This is one of the most beautiful looking barbies we have ever bought. It is also the worst doll to date!The doll NEVER worked from day one. It's tail bent up and it made grinding noises and didn't move or swim - just laid there. All the reviews on this site (which seemed to have disappeared since I notified MGA - the toy maker) were correct - NOT ONE BUYER had a working doll!!! We bought this for my daughter, niece and friend - and NONE of the 3 worked. It's not hard to follow the directions - they are pretty simple - so that is not the problem.Also, the hair falls out and is EVERYWHERE in the bath water (pretty gross), and the bikini top is near impossible to get back on correctly!Overall, the biggest disappointment in a toy so far</review_text>
I was very excited to give this to my 8 year old Pokemon addict. The toy is very cheap - comes in attached plastic and needs to be assembled. When assembled the wing breaks off constantly and the tail doesn't stay together. JUNK!</review_text>
My son received this figure for his birthday - it broke within the first 5 minutes.  The sign on his chest lights up, which is cool - but now he has no legs, so he certainly can't run</review_text>
I bought this game hoping to have another great game for my girlfriend and I (we became bored playing backgammon all the time) and we are disappointed.  This game has nothing to do with any lost cities.... it's just a card game that requires you to stack cards in numeric order to get points...  you group the cards by color (which are supposed to represent cities????) and eventually the game ends after a certain number of cards are played and you tally up a bunch of numbers, divide that by pi, and then take the square root of you birth year and multiply that by five to see if you have either earned points or need to subtract them.  Then you do the math for your partner.We tried to play it a few times and it was just kinda dumb.... (The points arn't that difficult really!), but this game was a waste of time and twenty some odd dollars.   I suggest you take the $20 and buy a bottle of hooch, and have some real fun with your partner... unless you are 8 years old... in which case this game might be fun.Just Terrible</review_text>
This toy seemed like a fun idea, however it is utter chaos.  The toy moves randomly over the page and does not make any sort of comprehensive design.  Actually our table received more ink than the paper and then the kids could not get it to turn off.  I think it may be slightly posessed!</review_text>
I bought this Barbie after seeing two pictures of angel Barbies on the website and reading the Manufacturer's Description. One picture seems to have been deleted now. The Manufacturer's description is of an angel with a dark blue dress and a long gold sash. I trusted that the Manufacturer's description, which matched one of the pictures, was the correct angel. The doll with the light blue dress is not impressive at all. It is very simple with vinyl wings. Be aware of which you are purchasing, the description is deceptive and incorrect</review_text>
My wife and I purchased the VIDEONOW XP Interactive Video System for my son this Christmas however when we did Walmart was out of the headphones.  Well I was on Amazon one day and decided to look here.  I ordered them and was seriously disappointed when they arrived.  My 5 year old son attempted to put them on and all they did was fall to his shoulders.  No matter how we tried that is all they would do.  My 12 year old daughter decided to try them with her mp3 player with the same result!  I am able to wear them however even with my 30 year old head (size 8 1/4) it is still loose.  These are not adjustable which of course makes things all the worse.  I would just go ahead and pick up some other company's aftermarket headphones for your child.  If Tiger reads the reviews of their products at all then they need to ensure that they rethink the engineering of this device</review_text>
My friends and I spend hours selling lemonade using this stand!!</review_text>
I have bought two of these toys for my son, an only child and pretty gentle on toys.  It has been kept in his bedroom away from his playgroup.  He has not even played with it regularly.  Yet BOTH times these toys BROKE WITHIN MONTHS OF PURCHASE!!!Yes, it is fascinating.  And like other reviewers, I've also had some fun with it myself. But I am disgusted that it broke down so easily--twice.  There must be a reason that Amazon doesn't offer new ones for sale; please think hard about buying a new one elsewhere.  Unless you don't mind looking at the $30 you'll pay as a month or two of entertainment, look to other gear toys that don't depend upon this lousy motor.</review_text>
Ummm...I am a HUGE fan of Bratz, but this piece of junk is absolutely terrible. First of all, the eyes are super ugly. I can't believe they would make such an ugly product! The lips are fine. But I could reconsider by making better, cuter eyes! They broke when I had it after five minutes. THEY DO NOT BLINK. THEY TRY TO, BUT DON'T SUCCEED. DO NOT BUY!!Second, the features are horrible. They are made so bad, I tried to make it walk since it couldn't on it's won! It does NOT walk. Note that. Also, it's head does not move. It was broken on mine and it made it fall down and the neck, while trying to move, muffled the song. Also, unless you wanna hear the same 20 second "Bratz Catz" song over and over again, do not buy this product. It will dissapoint your daughter like it did to me. I am the daughter, but am very dissapointed. I have returned mine and did not get a new one, either. I got some Bratz Babyz which were cuter than this junk!I am warning you, this cat is brainwashed and should not be continued. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT UNLESS YOU WANT A CRYING DAUGHTER FOR IT!!!Thank you for your patience and gratuity in reading this grievance.Love,Brownie, baby doll lover. Get babies instead, they're cute!</review_text>
it has know fun.  no education.  and is a wayst of time</review_text>
We looked for a trash truck that our 4 year old boy could play with. On the surface, the Bruder looked the part. Not as cartoon-looking as some, the fact that it looked like a real trash truck but had few obvious breakable parts made it seem like an ideal choice.Actual play testing though shows this product isn't very well-built, at least not enough to withstand normal wear and tear. This truck wasn't subjected to being thrown down the stairs, jumped on, etc. It's been just played with, but it started coming apart quickly.The hinged door in the back of the truck is a poor design. The plastic hinges on the truck are too thin, and break easily. The plastic hinges on the door start to bend after multiple open/closes, and the plastic weakens and breaks off.The hinged front compartment and rear sections are difficult to operate, and stick easily. Items put into the cab (like the essential green army man who drives the truck) easily get caught in here and are very difficult to remove.Worse though is the key point of this toy, the ability to latch the trash can to the lifting/dumping mechanism. This is way to complex for a child, and the intricacy in getting a solid connect is difficult even for an adult.  If it's not hooked up right, the can falls off when you try to lift it; very frustrating.Some little pieces (rear view mirror, etc) broke off easily and early on, but we kind of expected this. The parts were simply too small and fragile to last long. I don't hold this part against the design; part of the attraction was that it looked like a real truck, and I don't think there's an easy way to add small details without some fragility.While this is orignally was one of my sons favorite toys, he can't really play with it the way he'd like to. While he still enjoys driving it around the house, he can't pick up the trash and dump it without an adults help, and that's a shame.For the price, I expected so much more.</review_text>
I bought this as a gift for my 81 year old mother, who is impossible to please.  She needed a new card shuffler, as she wasn't pleased with her plastic, battery operated one.  I must admit, I thoroughly expected to have to return it, since I knew she wouldn't be pleased with it.  As it turns out, I did have to return it, but here's the surprise.  I was very disappointed in its performance too!  We could not get it to shuffle cards, whether they be from a new deck, or an old, worn out, dog eared deck.  Moral of this story -- please don't buy this item, whether you're difficult to please or not</review_text>
My daughter, 6, received this for Christmas. Her 4-year-old brother also  wanted to play with it.The first problem is that there are NO INSTRUCTIONS included for how to put it together. This is a problem when you have two antsy kids eager to play with it. I was struggling with getting the various panels to snap together solidly when, after repeated attempts, I happened to look in the drawer underneath the colored bulbs and crayons, and found -- what do you know! -- screws. Then, after I put on the top, I realized I should have installed the light bulb first (you need a light bulb of 25 watts or less, not included). Then, when I thought I was done, I found I had a piece left over. Arrgh!That extra piece was a clip that is supposed to hold a picture for tracing. Ha! Even after I installed it, there's no tension on the clip and very little chance that it will hold anything.There are two drawers to hold the bulbs and crayons. Good idea. But for some reason the drawers catch and stick. How hard can it be to make drawers that slide easily in and out?</review_text>
This item looks great in theory, but it just isn't worth it. The pegs are made in all different sizes - some fall out, some don't fit in, and some stick out too far, leaving you with a messy look to your lite art. One of the crayons for the neon was broken when received, but it didn't matter, since it just looked like a regular crayon drawing on black paper anyway. If you do buy this item, be sure to purchase that 25w light bulb that isn't even included</review_text>
I am a breast cancer survivor and I find this pink dressed, blond "doll" of  perfection rather insulting to my female self, the perfect perky boobs, the long blond hair, the body that does not exist on a woman after the ravages of chemotheraphy.  I can perfectly understand Mattel wanting to support breast cancer research and donate a portion of proceedes towards funding (and thank you for your generosity), but to do it under the guise of selling a "doll" which does not reflect the community of women who have experienced the challenges of recovery and survivorship...a doll which does not look like a survivor is literally painful and insulting!  Why doesn't this doll have a wig?  Why doesn't she have a breast removed?  Why doesn't she have a bra fitted with a form to mimic the shape of a breast?  What is wrong with reality?  Why can't Mattel acknowledge the true nature of this disease and make a doll which comforts, not insults the sensibility of women who have suffered from this disease.  I will purchase this doll, just because I am horrified by the product itself.  I will disrobe her, and with a saw, cut off her breast so that she will look more like me, a survivor, a woman of pride.  I will dismantle the construct of supposed beauty and make this image more like my own - because I am what is woman, not the facade of a false construction.</review_text>
I purchased this toy based on the excellent reviews it had here at Amazon, it looked also like a fun toy with educational value.  I am very disappointed.  For starters, my son finds it very frustrating that the front pieces for eyes, face & hat can only go on in one order.  He also has trouble pulling the pieces apart once they are together, and he is very dextrous for his age.  Also disappointing is the lack of container to store all the pieces in.  Without this, the blocks are loose in my son's toybox and we can never find all the pieces.  The packaging could easily be redesigned to hold the pieces. All in all, it is not a toy he can sit and play with without assistance, as I had thought it might be.  When he does play with it he enjoys it for about 15 minutes and moves on to something else.  We could have done without this toy under our Christmas tree</review_text>
The kids got it for Christmas, and it looked like fun.  However, the one we got doesn't work at all.  I'm not sure if we just got a bad one or if this problem is common, but I can't even get it to turn on without changing the batteries, and then I can't get it to go into the game mode.  Plus, the rules of the electronic version are different, in that you lose all your points if you keep acting out words.  I prefer the rules of the old version better.  I'm planning to return this and get the old version</review_text>
Falls over constantly. Fustrating for everyone. Only good thing is the sleeping bag that comes with it</review_text>
This is not the usual quality that Playhut stands for.  The tent is held up by one plastic-corded pole that won't keep the tent upright.  My daughter gets trapped in it as it collapses.  The slumber bag is pretty, but the tent/tunnel is useless</review_text>
We were excited for the first bunch of stickers and then my 5 year old wanted to try it himself.  It jammed up and that was the end of it.  There are no instructions on how to fix it so I threw the cartridge away.  Don't waste your money</review_text>
My son and I have had the same experience with this sticker maker.  Great fun for the first 5-10 stickers but then the sticker role jammed and I did not have the opportunity to give the insides a good look before I was desparately trying to remember how it all went back together.  Too bad...he loved it while it lasted</review_text>
This is not a very fun toy.  My [...] got tired of filling the paint chamber because it would empty so quickly.  He also ended up dipping the brush into the paint jars.  He went through both jars of paint in under 10 minutes and was finished with the toy.  There wasn't enough paint to even create a picture.  The Happy Birthday pic on the back of the package must've taken over 20 bottles and a very skilled artist.  I think Crayola should stick to making crayons</review_text>
This paint brush globs out the paint, doesn't spread to make any kind of picture and the brush barely holds any paint. We went through both of the provided things of paint in about five minutes and had no picture to show for it. Not to mention that the bottle is to small for the brush to fit in so when the paint is about half way down you can't get the brush in it to suck the paint up.  I am so disappointed</review_text>
Paint doesnt load or expel easily...waste of money and time...my daughter is happier with a bucket of plain water and a brus</review_text>
I was very excited about this game until it came out of the box.  It looks great for my 3 year-old but as in other reviews the spinner ruins the entire game.  This should have been obvious at design and this game should never have made it to stores with this defect.  It is particularly frustrating because the concept seems so good with a lot of thought put into the educational value.  I think ill will is going to be the result of this penny minding in construction.  Leapfrog could have further enhanced the brand with this product but fumbled</review_text>
To anyone who buys this toy, keep the box and receipt handy.  We may be the odd one out, but we purchased this toy and it didn't work. The legs on Manny are to be pulled back to fire a rubber ball.  This didn't happen.  Rapid pushing and pulling of his legs produces 'rapid fire', and if we were lucky one would shoot out - after great effort. It comes with three foam balls, two of which fit, the third was slightly too big and would jam.  Ours is going back to the store today.</review_text>
Do not like this product at all...the girls on the video are not facing the right way for easy instruction...we have to go the opposite way...very uncool...my daughter started crying, too...i told her it wasn't her fault...you want your child to feel good about themselves and all it does is make them feel like they aren't good enough...do not waste your money</review_text>
We purchased this for our daughter after she loved the original ballet version so much. I expected the same quality of the original product and was very disappointed. The mat is very cheap and flimsy and my daughter broke the headset trying to get it on her head</review_text>
This toy, like several other Mattel toys I've purchased in the past 5 years are difficult to put together, troublesome to play with, and not durable. I wish Mattel would think more about the kids playing with their toys and less about the stockbrokers. Toys can be easy to assemble. Intuitive to play with and rugged as a tank. It just depends on priorities of the toy design/builder</review_text>
My son received this for Christmas 2005 and played with it every day. The conveyor belt is noisy when running and the sponges that whirl around at the end of the car wash were constantly falling off and getting lost. After a month of being played with on a daily basis the conveyor belt stopped working - it still made plenty of noise but didn't move anymore! When I called Mattel they couldn't offer me replacement parts as the toy was discontinued in 2001! Although they gave me a voucher to buy a replacement toy, it wasn't for as much as I paid for the toy.</review_text>
These figures look pretty decent at first glance but when you take them out of the box you see how bad they really are. My superman broke in half (at the waist) when I took him out of the box! Add that to the fact that there are only an average of six points of articulation on each (only three on Wonder Woman!) and you see that these aren't very high quality figures. Amazo is transparent, which makes no sense whatsoever. He isn't an invisible character. I also don't like that, while superman's S and belt stick out from his uniform, Bizarro's are merely painted on. Only buy this item if you love doomsday and its on sale. It's not worth its list price by a long shot</review_text>
This one is rather small and doesn't really look or feel like the rest.  Not as durable feeling as the others</review_text>
My daughter who is about to turn 4 loves this game.  She wants to play it constantly.  So it's good for their entertainment value but bad for yours. The dresses are hard to get on the dolls and they rip and tear very easily.  It takes as long to set the game up as it does to take it.  There are also some sketchy directions such as rolling the dice but not having to go as far as the die say but you can't go over that numbers i.e. you roll a 4 but you only want to go 3 spaces then that's allowed.  That's confusing when you're trying to teach your kids their numbers and how many spaces to go but otherwise you'd be rolling the dice forever trying to get to the one spot you're trying to reach</review_text>
We bought this game yesterday for our daughter.  The dolls are very difficult for her to dress.  We have to do it for her.  Also, two of the dresses have torn already after playing the game only about 4 times.  She loves the game and the princesses, and it does teach memory, but it could be made much better.</review_text>
Twice I gave this board game as a gift this holiday season, and my own 5-year-old daughter received it as a gift. While the idea of the game seems good, there seems to be some misleading print on the box. It indicates that the prinesses will be getting ready to meet Prince Charming at the ball, but there is no Prince Charming included in the game pieces--much to the dismay of my daughter! My biggest complaint about this game, however, is with the gowns and accessories the princesses wear as they move about the board. The straps of the dresses are very thin, and my daughter has broken three of the four gowns. She has also broken two crowns and the strap on one purse. My daughter plays with the rubber Polly Pocket things as well, and she has not torn/ripped any of those items, which makes me think the Crowns and Gowns items aren't made as strongly</review_text>
What a co-incidence, my first 3D puzzle too.Average difficulty for the average user. Would not recommend it for the beginner.The panels are not hard to put together, but it is fiddly putting all the panels together. Once done, the model is quite magnifique. And got me started on 3D puzzles. Hasbro/Wrebbit should give everyone 1 free 3D puzzle, then everyone would get hooked on it.None of the 3D puzzles can stand a lot of handling, however this Eiffel Tower actually survived a show and tell. Sadly it now rests in 3 pieces and I'm too lazy to put it back together again. Highly recommended</review_text>
BOUGHT THIS IN CLEARANCE AT TOYS R US, IT SOUNDS LIKE JUNK AND POORLY MADE. I PLAN TO RETURN THE 2 BOUGHT FOR MY TWINS. I WAS FORCED TO PUT ONE STAR BUT WOULD HAVE ALSO LEFT ZERO IF I COULD. SPEND A LITTLE MORE, YOU GET WHAT YOU PAY FOR. THIS WOULD BE BEST LEFT AT THE CURB, THAN TAKING UP ROOM IN MY GIRLS BEDROOMS....SAD, SAD, SAD... I HATE RETRUNING THINGS, IT IS A WASTE OF MY TIME</review_text>
I popped in the batteries and was unable to get any sound whatsoever.  I even put in a different set up batteries; still, no dice.  This is the worst excuse for a keyboard ever.  I am sorry that I will be pitching this in the trash and it will take up space in a landfill.  After the reading the other reviews, perhaps I am fortunate that this clunker never even made a sound.  I gather that I'm not missing much.</review_text>
I bought this for my son's birthday last night since he is interested in music.  As I was wrapping it, I noticed half of the keys were stuck in the up position.  I took it out and managed to bang the keys back into place, wondering how many times I was going to have to do this.  I decided to test it once I fixed it because the toy just looked horribly cheap with very thin plastic keys (you can even see through them).  The dollar store has better toys than this.  The sound is horrible and uncontrollable.  The controls are worthless.  I'm returning it today, and good riddance</review_text>
Purchased this for a 3 1/2 year old boy.  Was hesitant about buying any large, plastic truck, but we did not see any alternatives at the time we purchased this.  We should have stuck with our instinct.  When it arrived, we were immediately struck by the fact that the plastic seemed flimsy, and that many small plastic pieces that are attached to the grader appeared and felt so cheap and flimsy that we doubted they would survive 5 minutes of play, in our humble opinion.  We were not going to wait to find out, and we decided to send this back.  You can get a STEEL Tonka 18" grader off of ebay for less than what Amazon is asking for this plastic thing.  That's exactly what we did.  Good luck</review_text>
This playhut was very frustrating for our children. My children enjoyed it when it was left in the slumber position. Our trouble began when we turned it into a tent. The sleeping bag is one side of the tent. It's heavy so it sags leaving little room for children to play. After about ten minutes, the playhut was turned over and on the ground. We returned it..</review_text>
This toy is not what I had expected. It isn't very durable at all and it's HARD to put together! I don't highly recommend it</review_text>
I bought this toy for my three-yr-old. She was excited, but then one of the dolls fell apart, its pelvis broke and the legs fell out. Super glue might fix it, but I'm not sure.I'd recommend it for an older child who wouldn't play with it so roughly. But for the price, I wanted it to last more than three days</review_text>
My daughter is almost 6 and we got her this for Christmas.  The commercials made it look really cool and easy for kids, no more scissors!  Well we opened it today and it's too hard for her to hold the button down for any amount of time and to move it around slowly enough to actually cut anything.  I'm having to do it all for her and my hand gets tired too!  They should have made it that the "pen" cuts when just being pushed on the paper or something.  I have a 9 year old also that was trying to use it and it wasn't all that easy for him either.  Seems more like something teens or adults that scrapbook would use</review_text>
I've owned this toy for a few weeks and have given up on it.  At first this toy was a little fun and I was optimistic about getting it to handle correctly.  I'd adjust the top screw to trim it from spinning clockwise or counter clockwise and everything.  This gets old after doing it every time after a charge. Next, using the forward and backward control doesn't work that well. Also, it will drop out of the sky or do something weird every now and then.  All in all I wouldn't buy it again, especially at the higher price it is currently going for.  Try the smaller havoc, it seems to handle a little better (Youtube has a few movies of it flying).  [...]</review_text>
I got this toy for my one of my triplet sons for his 5th birthday, and I am appalled that I paid $50 for such a poorly made product.  They say it "transforms" into the batmobile - that is a joke!  You have to take most of it apart to get it to fold back up, so why bother with that "feature" in the first place?  The whole thing is made terribly.  It barely stands upright, and the little plastic chains that suspend the one set of platforms keep coming off the little plastic hooks.  None of my boys play with it, and now I am stuck with it because I don't have the box anymore to return it.  Bottom line:  this was a complete waste of money</review_text>
I have to agree with everyone before me.  Flimsy, hard to put together, doesn't stay together, impossible to close.  My four old, who is obsessed with batman, lost interest after 5 minutes and I really can't blame him.  Spend your $50 on something else!!! Not a good purchase!!!!!</review_text>
I purchased this toy for our friends son and I cannot tell you the disappointed look on his face when we all realized what a piece of trash this toy is!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!DO NOT BUY IT!!!   We are returning it ASAP!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!It's cheap, it's not sturdy and it does NOT close back up again!4 adults couldn't get it back together!  Never mind a kid!It is a total ripoff...This is the first time I have ever written a review on a toy, thats how horrible it is</review_text>
This pack is really Bad! I LOVE attacktix, but this pack is terible! The only good figues are Luke Skywalker, and Megatron. Darth Vader's arm broke, Super Optimus Prime's blast shoots before you press the button, and the battle masters are Pathetic. The Battle Master's point value is 70 each, but they are very easy to kill, and their blasts are very bad.Do yourself a faver, skip this and buy the Star Wars attacktix series 4 starter set</review_text>
this thing only lasted 3 days!i mean really.i charged it up and it worked fine.but it only lasted about 5 minutes then i had to charge it again.when i looked under it i noticed that stiafom was breaking off!on the 3rd day i charged it up and it never worked again!!!!!!so i went back to toysrus and renturnd the piece of crud.do never buy this toy!!!!!!!</review_text>
My 7 year old son got it for Christmas. He was really excited. It is definitely a neat toy. The whole family was into it. However, it only lasted one day. It would no longer charge and I am just going to take it back because I am in no position waste $20.00 just for one day</review_text>
What a disappointment! The music quality is very poor--most of the "intruments" sound just like every other cheap kids electronic toy.  The piano is probably the worst; the animal voices all sound the same. I thought I'd get better quality at the price, plus, the left speaker doesn't work.  My kids had a toy casio keyboard that cost $12.00 and was the size of an egg-carton, and its sound was vastly superior. I will likely have to go through the hassle of returning this.</review_text>
This bowl is extremely cute but it does not suction to the high chair.  I can get it to suction to the counter and my glass table but not on my baby's highchair, so it really doesn't serve the purpose it is suppose to</review_text>
Concept was good, but fails because its not constructed well.  After 2 months the toy's electronics went out</review_text>
I got this to for my daughter for her birthday. I opened it and put the bubble solution and batteries into it and it worked fine. Later that night the bubble blower wasn't blowing anymore. So the next morning I changed out the batteries and still it wasn't working. I returned it the next day. It was really cute and I wanted it to work but it just wouldn't start and it also kept leaking. Every where I put it the sticky soap mess was there after I picked it up. THIS WAS NOT A GOOD TOY</review_text>
Put simply, this toy doesn't work. Or I should say perhaps it would work with really good bubble solution but it does not work with the bubble solution that comes with it. It sort of sputtered some bubble solution out the top but we never got even one full bubble much less the stream of bubbles we were hoping for. Luckily my little son never saw the toy and therefore didn't mind when we took it back</review_text>
I got this as a gift for my 18 month old son. It only produces one lousy bubble with each pull of the handle, very sad. My son got very frustrated and so did I. I would not recommend this product.</review_text>
I just bought this game and tried for 3 hours to make it work on 3 different t.v. sets - NO LUCK.  I can't even give it 1 star because I don't know how fun it is (or might be).  I tried every "input" available on every t.v., I tried changing the batteries, I tried hooking it directly to the t.v. as well as thru the VCR and DVD player - nothing worked.  I guess I know why it only cost $5.99.</review_text>
I purchased this car for my 2 year old son for Christmas.  Shame on me for not taking it out of the box and testing it out prior to Christmas morning.  The car lights up and makes sounds (very annoying) but didn't move an inch.  I replaced all batteries - still no movement.  The manufacturer was of no help.  Thank god someone else also got him the Chicco remote control car - because it works!Steer clear of this stinker</review_text>
We received this as a gift and didn't like it at all.  My two year old used it for about a day. But it doesn't go very far with the remote (you can't just have it move across the floor) and it's VERY noisy! If it is walked away from you can hear it in the other room still making an annoying noise. I'd go with something else if you're looking for a first remote control ca</review_text>
I consider myself to be a fairly intelligent individual, and growing up in a family where a Saturday was spent working on the classic car in the garage, or watching football on Sunday, as a female, I know a lot of male stuff.  Even I couldn't answer hardly ANY of the "male" questions, since in this game, men answer questions about womanly stuff, and women answer questions about manly stuff.  We have played it twice now, and even though the men's team has always had 1 male more in touch with his female side than most, the women have always gotten our butts kicked.  It is so one sided it's not even funny.  Even the men were saying, it's not even fun since the game lasts basically 10 minutes.  One of the men said he even had to think twice about some of the "male" questions.  If I were anyone looking to get a good party game, I certainly wouldn't put my money out to get this again.</review_text>
Don't buy this unless you plan on attaching the remote to your forehead with duct-tape; if you lose the remote you cannot operate the moon. The moon also has an automatic time that it comes on; it's supposed to be when it gets dark, but it comes on way too early to be any good, because nobody is in their room that early, and it only stays on for 30 minutes. When it comes on by itself, (because its too early) you can barely notice it is on.</review_text>
My brother, the uncle of my two sons, purchased this item for Christams.  In the excitement of testing this item out they realized the battery backing was not able to be opened.  The screw casing was stripped!  No big deal, I thought, I would just call the company.  They are not willing to replace the prodect unless I pay for shipping.  They recomeded that I take it to a local store to replace knowing that it was purchased over 1000 miles away and not at a chain store!  Passing the buck.  I then asked to speak to a super visor and she repeated the same mantra, "sorry company policey."  I never go to the lengths that I am now, but I am tired of companies not performing the basic duties of customer satisfaction.  They want me to go to the post office and mail it to them at which time they will determine whose fault it is and then mail me a new one.  When I asked if there was any way around said policy the manager told me I could write a letter.  So here it is</review_text>
Gave this heli to my 30 year old son on his birthday. It was supposed to be easy to fly. It rolled over and crashed inches off the ground on its maiden flight, spewing propeller parts everywhere. With all retailers out of replacement parts it may never fly. If you buy this heli, don't buy it through the mail or online but from a local dealer with parts and expertise to help you get it back together</review_text>
The tail rotor fell off right out of the box on the first throttle up. The landing gear fall off if you do not glue them yourself. Not only is it poorly made for the money but it is an extreemly touchy machine. Main rotor to tail mixing have to be perfect. Final thought.... After several hours of hard work adjusting the tail to main rotor mix I managed to get it to stay in the air for a few seconds.   If you want an R/C helicopter try the Japanese made Hirobo XRB SR.</review_text>
Even though I purchased this watch for my grandson for Christmas from another store, it was not worth the money. It does nothing and my grandson abandoned it soon after opening it.  I picked up few pieces from under the sofa last night.   I did see on one toy store's website that there is a deluxe model that is probably better. I wish I had known that before I spend $10 on this piece of junk.</review_text>
Actually, we love the game very much but are very disappointed with Pressman Toys.  Here's the scoop:  our game came with only 20 pegs of each color -- the box clearly shows at least 40 of each color.  We've called the company 1800 800-0298 x 186 several times but they refuse to send us additional pegs.  Just bad business practice in my opinion.  As the saying goes, when you love something you tell a few people, when you're not happy you tell everyone.  I'll be sure to check that I'm not buying items from Pressman Toys next time.  So instead of returning the game and paying for shipping we'll just have to win in fewer steps.  SIGH!</review_text>
This was a gift for my 2 year old last christmas.  The screws they provide to put the wheels on are no good. As soon as your child starts "walk" his new dog, the wheels completely unscrew, which can be a terrible choking hazzard.  We have tried everything to keep them on.  Plus the leash tore off from around poor spot's neck, and no type of glue seems to keep it on. I'm afraid this cute little toy is going into the trash. It was good idea and a cute toy, but not worth the money. You're better off buying a plastic, already put together one.</review_text>
After returning three defective Tonka Hands On Power Shovels, (aka crane,) we decided to try a different piece of machinery and brought home the dump truck.  So far the dump truck is doing fine.  It is not as exciting as the crane or digger, but it does work and seems to be holding up.  My son loves to turn it on &amp; have it &quot;follow&quot; him around the room.  However the motor strains, and the truck moves very slowly, so I'm concerned that the load is too much for the motor.  He likes the loading action of the front end shovel into the dump bed, and the dumping bed.  He was disappointed that it doesn't steer like the crane did, but only goes either forward or reverse.  But a working toy is better than an non-working toy, and I'm hopeful this one will be a keeper</review_text>
For the most part this is a good toy.  It was actually one of the easier items I took out of a box this week :)My daughter (4) loves it and as long as you can tolerate the "Mommy/Daddy the wing fell off can you put it back on?" every 5-10 minutes then it really is good.  I guess if your child is old enough and has the dexterity to put the wings back on by herself this toy would be GREAT</review_text>
Very fun I love it is like a dream in a book the wings do fall of but not often. what I say is YES get it</review_text>
I bought this toy for my 4 year old grandaugher.  Since Barbie rides this horse of course a little girl will want her doll to ride the horse.  The wings fall off.  We must put the wings back on at least a dozen time a day</review_text>
I purchased this item for my son's birthday.  Not well built as it needed lots of tape to keep it together and readjustments after each attempt to fly it.  Also appears to need the wind just right and thrown a certain way in order for it to fly.  After a couple of  days we were able to accomplish only one 2 min. successful flight.    On the second day, after 15 mins of recharging the battery, the battery case and wires melted.  Have contacted company for a refund.</review_text>
I think this doll is incredibly fun and beautiful, but somehow the tail broke off the very first day my 4 year old daughter played with it.  She loves it anyway, she insists.  She just screamed with pleasure after seeing the hair turn purple and the tattoos appear after about 3 minutes in the freezer.I don't know how it got broken, or how rough my daughter might have been, but it seems strange that it would break so quickly.  Disappointing</review_text>
i can't wait until i get the movie barbie fairytopia mermaida when it comes out its going to be a great movie for kids and even for the whole family i don't know if i will get the dolls i think the movie will be funer to watch than just play with the doll</review_text>
Besides being unstable, this truck is extremely frustrating!  My son is constantly trying to put items in the truck that are too big, and then if he does manage to get a "load" in, he can't get it back out again!!  He has cried in frustration and thrown the toy across the room.  I will be buying him a Fisher Price one for his birthday that actually dumps</review_text>
My son LOVES cars and trucks so this looked like it would be a big hit, but like the other reviewers, we have had to put this toy away because of all the injuries.  He used the handle to push it, but the toy is unbalanced, so any pressure on the back causes it to flip up and hit him in the face.  He's had several big bruises and one cut lip.Since posting this, I've spoken to a rep for Little Tykes. She said they would look into this toy a bit more and sent a replacement toy for my son to play with until he is able (if ever) to use the dump truck again. If you've had a problem with this truck, please call them so that they can get it on record</review_text>
we got this for our son for Easter, and he was playing with donnie the dumptruck, and the handle part was opened, so it was the flat blue portion of the truck, well he some how slipped, and ended up cutting his forehead b/c the blue portion does have somewhat of a sharp part. Luckily enough it wasn't where he needed stitches, but still...so I called Little Tikes, and they said they wanted me to mail it back and they let me choose another toy-so there Customer Service at Little Tikes is Definitly a +! Just watch out because I think the ages on this toy should be a little older. Semper F</review_text>
I think this product needs a LOT of hands-on supervision.  My son slipped off and knocked the wind out himself TWICE on the 2nd day of trying this.  After a couple of weeks, he finally regained his confidence to try it when a friend was over -- and his 6 y.o. friend slipped and knocked the wind out of herself (almost had to call the paramedics).  Knowing what I know now... I would NOT buy this product for kids under 8 (follow the age recommendations!!!!!).  I would like to take a pair of wire cutters and cut it down....</review_text>
I was excited about this pool because it seemed really easy to store when not in use. However, the new type of valve does not hold in the air. It says to push it all the way in but the valve on the one I bought would not stay in and when I tried to close the valve the presure from the air inside pushed open the valve and it deflated. It would have been perfect had the valve worked properly.</review_text>
We loved this pool for three weeks, which is as long as we had it.  This morning, I went out to remove a small amount of rain water from the cover to find that the cover with roughly 1/4" of rain had collapsed the top tier and that we had grass growing up through the bottom of the pool, through plastic.  I could see both happening had the pool sat in one place for a long period of time but this was after less than 24 hours.  A total waste of money</review_text>
This is a great idea for a great marketing group . . . little kids who want to listen to music "just like the big kids." The FP3 has a few issues of it own, but the speakers were disappointing. The sound quality is not good. Even with the volume turned up it is difficult to hear. Another huge down fall is that a power cord is not available . . . so you can end up going through batteries pretty fast. To top it all off, my son has difficulty getting the FP3 correctly mounted into the speaker unit on his own. Overall we were very disappointed with this accessory</review_text>
Far to difficult to pop, product didn't match picture.  But the company was very friendly and co-operative in the return process.  Would do business with this company again, but would buy one item as a test before buying in bulk.  Or I would just call the company</review_text>
It looks fun in the picture, but there is a major design flaw with this toy - the wheels stick out so far that when the rider tries to go they end up slamming their ankle into the tire.  Within 2 minutes of using this toy my son ripped open his ankle.  This toy should be recalled.  Do not buy it. I would send mine back, but we had already thrown out the packaging</review_text>
I bought this for my daughters 6th birthday. The lips on the doll didn't work and there really isn't much to do with it. She was bored almost immediately. I was hoping for much more out of this toy. In my opinion you shouldn't waste your money</review_text>
The retro-slinky dog, however cute, just doesn't work.  We have tried it on the hardwood floor, the carpet, the title.  We have tried tying a string arounds it's neck, adding a string to it's short stubby string, using the short stubby string to pull it but nothing works.  Our kids 2 & 6 just drag it around laying on it's side--it's just not fun--the head is too heavy and it doesn't move well at all.  I would not buy it.  the Fisher Price doggy we got is very cute and it stays upright, it walks with you and the pull-string is a good length--plus it's cute too!!</review_text>
This game is ok, entertains my children for a little while.  I thought everything was ok, but then, after only a couple of months, the cartridges started to malfunction!  We have two leap pads and some games work in one, but not the other (and visa versa!)  For the price, I don't want the toy to not work 1/2 the time after only a few uses.  The books seem to hold up pretty good, but the cartridges don't.  And, at a price of around $12 each, I was very dissapointed.  If the cartridges worked all the time, I would probably give this toy 4 stars, as it is fun (when it works) and portable.  One last comment for improvement, would be to have the volume be on the outside, not in the book, as the regular volume is a bit too loud and I have to ask my little one to turn it down each time she switches books/cartridges</review_text>
If I would have been able to try this out before buying it I would have never bought it. The surface is way to hard for a baby to be laying on it. The it is not too sensitive to movement so when baby kicks or moves it doesnt always turn itself on. I would have much rather bought a playmat instead.</review_text>
My daughter got this came for Christmas and it is still fun to play, but the new graphics are very confusing and hard to follow.  They want a little overboard in their updating of this one.  New colors would have been fine, but all the curves, zig-zags, etc, make this version a poor substitute for the older versions.  I'm going to ebay!</review_text>
You can get the old vintage aggravation games on Ebay for 10 or less and theres also some hand-made wooden boards as well. These new versions dont hold a candle to the old ones, Just as old tvs seem better than some of the new ones</review_text>
Hard to follow instructions, I ended up throwing it in a drawer after trying to get the hang of it after 5 minutes. If you want to buy one, I will GIVE you mine :)TOTAL waste of money.</review_text>
The toy is a good idea, but it needs to be more user friendly, instructions are hard to follow, even for adults,maybe not quite so much activities at one time, could simplify some for younger players</review_text>
This school bus was smaller than I expected, about 4 inches long. I bought it for my 3 year old son who loves school buses. He broke it in the first 5 minutes of opening the package. It's a pull-back and go car. And he pulled it back too far on the first try and it snapped the wheels. They were wobbly from then on. This toy is not for kids and it's not really for playing with from what I can tell. Very dissappointed</review_text>
Bought this and several other Minimates for by son's birthday.  As we are huge Lego fans, I thought this would be a great compliment.  The "lego-like" bricks are ill fitted, either constantly coming undone or never being able to fit together at all.  This caused great frustration and unhappiness.  We finally had to hide the entire lot from my son too keep him from breaking down everytime he or another family member tried to put the Batcave or any of the vehicles together.  Do not buy.  I would like a full refund and an apology from Amazon for carrying such an afwul quaility toy, and from the creator of the Minimates. Ugh</review_text>
3 Stars overall ONLY b/c we LOVE c3! Read on...The batcave C3 set has some rather intense structural integrity problems that cause it to be next to impossible to put together without a supplemental "fix-it" set that was distributed by the mfg. after many SEASONED ADULTS protested their frustrations with its construction. Since the company has now withdrawn all c3 items from its website, it is not known whether the "fix-it" package is still available (it included thicker, stronger support pieces for the first floor, and additional pieces for a stairway support column). Without these, the set tends to implode well before you ever get the 2nd level completed, let alone the 3rd!After all the problems started surfacing, the company also increased the "recommended age range" to 7+ from the previous 4+. If you purchase a box that states 7+ as the age range, it SHOULD include the "fix" parts (no guarantee, we're only assuming), but even with the "fix" pieces, it is still a major headache to put together, and your true calling is an architect if you manage to get it safely together on the first try. It takes most adults several tries over several days (due to frustration stress level) to get this piece fully assembled.There is a step-by-step construction guide showing the problems (with "crash" pictures) in set construction, Amazon rules say I can't post the link here, but it shouldn't be too hard to find if you enter c3 batcave in a search engine, the full write-up is in a c3 forum.I know many people may still purchase--it is after all, Batman, but I would at least try to see if you can acquire the replacement parts before ordering, as you will have much greater chance for success. OR wait until you get the package, if it says 7+ on the box, you just may be in luck. In the alternative, maybe you could use super-glue to the existing inadequate structural supports?OR, raid your kid's Lego stash and use thicker, more stable blocks than the ones supplied with this set</review_text>
This toy is great fun but it isn't very durable. Ours broke after about an hour. There was a loud pop and then it stopped erupting. I guess the plastic bladder must have given out. The kids were terribly disappointed</review_text>
After waiting 3-4 weeks, it finally arrived! To my grandchildrens dismay. It did not perform as advertised.There wasn't any volcano erupting, all it did was sprinkle a small amount from the side. Yes we did have good water pressure, and it was put together correctly!I just want my money and shipping charges back!Thank you for your expediency on this return</review_text>
Despite reading bad reviews, I took a chance and purchased this item.  I got the first one, hooked it up and it quit working within two hours.  Ordered a second, it quits working within the hour.  I should have known better as others have posted the same experience.  Great concept, maybe they will get the actual product correct in the next year.  Please don't waste your time on this one now....</review_text>
I bought this doll for my daughter for christmas and she was so excited, however in the last three days I have found that this doll was not worth the price.  The paint on the lips has already worn off, the eye lashes are falling out and it is difficult to keep the face clean, no matter how many times a day we wash it.  It has also stopped drinking when the bottle is placed into it's mouth.  I know of several other girls that are friends of my daughter who are having the same diffculties as we are.  If my daughter didn't love this doll some much I would return it for something worth it.  I guess if you are just intrested in making your child happy this is a good product however for the money I would suggest something else.</review_text>
If it were up to my children, they would rate this stuff 5+ stars.  They love it and they are totally entertained with it.  It is one of the only times they play quietly without fighting.  Mom, on the other hand, hates it and you know it is bad when a toy gives mom some free time of peace and quiet and she wants no part of it!!!This stuff sticks to everything and anything-including your children.  You can't believe the mess it makes.  Imagine billions of tiny little balls stuck to everything in your house.  I confine it to their playroom, but it follows them everywhere they go.  You will find it all over your house and in everything-you can't escape it.As for the product itself, it definitely doesn't dry out, but it also doesn't hold together as well as described making it quite difficult to make the objects it claims you can make on the package.  Once you put colors together it is impossible to separate them out as they are tiny millimeter balls.  Playdooh may dry out if left out, but it doesn't make anywhere near the mess this stuff does and it also molds much better than playfoam!My advice is to stick with your playdooh</review_text>
My 21 month old toddler loved the star crayon, and so did I initially.  However, during its first use the red crayon fell out of the plastic holder.  The problem is the shape of the crayon is like a round piece of candy.  My son picked it up and was about to put it in his mouth when I saw what had happened.  Personally, I would not use the product given the choking hazard that it presented.  Otherwise, I would use it with care and watch your child carefully as they play with the product.</review_text>
The Webkinz Yorkie Puppy I received is total different from what shown on the picture. Evne though it is still a dog it is not the one displaied on the picture which my kid really like. it is a total waste</review_text>
When this toy is turned on it seriously sounds like an air-raid siren is going off.  I can't use my usual trick of putting tape over the speaker because you need to be able to hear the instructions to play the games.Also, the counting/shape game is confusing.  There is a row of shapes with numbers on them, and the game asks the child to, for example, find 3 rectangles.  It's trying to get the child to press the rectangle shape three times, but the rectangle shape is marked with the number 8.  There's a circle marked with the number 3.The only reason I'm not giving this one star is because my son enjoys playing the "repeat the tone" and "count the villians" games.  I'm not sure how much longer the adults in the house can handle the siren noise, though, I may try to hide this and get him a leapfrog toy instead</review_text>
This is a preety good game but after a while, it is very boring. i enjoyed it for about 2 months but now i am not intrested in it</review_text>
Perhaps a age group should be posted as with most toy sellers.  I bought it for my 4 year old nephew and it's worthless to anyone other than I guess stores who like to stick star war stickers on the retail counters.  It is deceiving and the retailer is arrogant and would not even consider a return since it was opened to see what it was.  Avoid this retailer and it's products</review_text>
This was a total change from the boardgame. It is a lot of fun, however I have changed the winning amount, otherwise someone can win the whole game with just one hand</review_text>
I am disappointed because this is a really flimsy toy. The launch button doesn't push most of the time (so Superman doesn't launch) and the foam Superman tears easily.</review_text>
Pro: easy to visualize the numbers on the screen.Cons:The biggest negaTIVE draw back is that the keys are not very sensitive. You have to push very hard and often multiple times to get a response. This is very frustrating- the help keys does not help at all. Do not buy it ,IT IS A WASTING MONEY</review_text>
My 3 year old daughter and I have no problem making good size bubbles with this wand.  The design is nice, it snap back easily for storage and the color is nice.  However, after using it twice, the plastic hoop at the snapping piece and the stick is twisted.  This makes the hoop to be wailing back and forth even though it was snap in place.  It makes the wand impossible to make bubble by waving.  My daughter was frustrated.  I eventually went with some cheap plactic wands that do not have the fancy mechanism and they are extremely durable with many abusive use from a little child.  I don't recommend this wand</review_text>
The dress featured on this particular set shows a girl in a FLOWING blue and pink gown... you get the blue and pink gown, but it's not what's pictured on the box.  It sort of looks like it, but it is a flimsier, straight version of the one pictured.  Also, my daughter just turned 4.  She's on the petite side, and is around 32 lbs.  This dress JUST fits her.  Hope this info helps</review_text>
The canopy bar broke only two days after Christmas.Now I have a sharp end on the bed frame.  Not goodfor little fingers.  For the price, I thought it wouldhave been a lot more sturdy</review_text>
Bought this product for my two sons ages 4 and 6.  Within the first week one of the sticks was broken.  Called the company and they sent out another one, but before it could arrive the other stick broke.  They aren't made strong enough to use.  They plastic simply cracks and totally falls apart.  We ended up throwing it out</review_text>
This is a very cheaply made product that does not stand up to any child play.  My sons got this recently and within 24 hours one of the sticks had broken.  The company was nice enough to send a new one out but now (only a few weeks later) the plastic on the goal is shattered.  The goal also does not stay together very well and comes apart with each goal scored.  Overall, I would highly discourage you from wasting quite a bit of money for plastic that will not hold up to child play!!</review_text>
I bought this carry case for my son's L-Max.  It works well for carrying the unit and all the games he has for it.  I wouldn't advise dropping it on a hard surface of any sort.  It is not nearly padded enough to be carrying a hand held gaming unit of any sort.  My son likes to take his L-Max to school with him for mornings before school begins.  I place it in the carrying case and then place the carrying case inside of his backpack to give it some extra cushioning.If I had known how little padding there was in this particular carrying case I probably wouldn't have bought it.  There is a carrying case out for the Nintendo Wii that is similar in style but much more padded.  I almost purchased it but then thought that I should get something designed for the Leapster L-Max.  If I had it to do over I would have purchased the case for the Wii.  It might have been a little big but the extra padding would have made up for it.Overall, it is not a bad purchase but for the money you should get something a little more protective.  After all, the Leapster starts at $69.99 and the price goes up accordingly for the L-Max</review_text>
I bought this table set for my son because it was inexpensive and I did not want to spend a lot of money for something that was sure to get paint and glue all over it.  From day one it was a big dissapointment. The chairs are very easily tipped over, he can not even sit on the chair if I am not holding it or the chair would fall over.  The tabe is not made well as it is easy for things to slide off the surface.  It seems to be slightly raised in the middle.  I am now online shopping for a new one.  So instead of paying 100 dollars the first time around, I am now spending the 30 dollars already spend and an additional 100 for the new tabl</review_text>
Out of the box we noticed the table top was warped. When you push on one side of it the other pops up.  Definately not suitable for crafts or play.  Returned it that night</review_text>
It can be almost impossible to turn at times.  Instead of moving one to the right, you have to go three to the left, or fiddle with it so it lines up properly.  You can still solve the cube but it gets annoying when it doesn't move the way you want it to.I was hoping it'd be better cause it's really cool that it fits in your pocket.  It's just too hard to turn.  I ended up breaking the thing trying to get it to turn one way.  And I cant put it back together cause one of the pieces is missing.  I really like this product (I'm buying another one), I just wish it wasn't so stiff.Maybe they made it stiff so it wouldn't turn in your pocket but if you know how to do it, you can finish a rubik's cube in 5 minutes, max, so I don't see the need to prevent it from turning.  Apparently they thought people would solve like half of it and finish it latter</review_text>
This is the 3rd and by far the most disappointing of all.  The sound doesn't work. Yes, I put the batteries in correctly and yes I turned it on. The van/car kept getting stuck.  My son was very disappointed and can only play pretend with it. I didn't pay all that money for an interactive toy and it doesn't work. Very disappointed in all these sets and will not buy another</review_text>
Ancient Sanctuary throws lots of unique cards at us.  First, Fairy decks start to rise from the junk pile in the corner of your room.  Zombies finally have an 1800 attacker.  Machines have a mean burn monster.  The rares are something else.  Soul Resurrection is a Call of the Haunted except the monster goes into defence mode.  And it's only a rare! There is also Blowback Dragon, who like his brother, Barrel Dragon, has the same effect.  Instead of destroying monsters only, Blowback destroys ANY card on the field.  Zaborg the Thunder Monarch is also a plus to this set, destroying any monster on the field when summoned.  I got this 5 set and got Gear Golem, the Moving Fortress, Enemy Controller, Draining Shield, Zaborg the Thunder Monarch and Avatar of the Pot.  In other words, buy it.  This is worth the money</review_text>
I was disappointed with the quality of this item.  Little tike is a name I have learned to trust and this was a bummer.  The front broke because of it's poor design and flimsy plastic parts. So now it is just a broken dump truck. Also you have to push the button for the sounds to work. It is not motion sensitive.</review_text>
I picked this up on clearance, but I still think I spent too much.  The older versions were made of much sturdier material; the cards the questions are printed on are very flimsy compared to the original game.  The questions are okay, but many are very obscure.  Trivial Pursuit is a great game and it's one of my favorites, but this version is a dud.  Save your money if you have the older version; it's still a lot more fun to play</review_text>
The stars may be really nice, but the package I received looked already open. The 3 sheets with stickers appeared as if someone soaked them in water and the package was missing the putty to stick up the bigger plastic stars.</review_text>
This item came in the mail and my 4 year old son and I were very excited.  I guess we should have read the description more carefully because I wasn't expecting so many tiny little pieces.  We used ticky tack and began the tedious process of sticking the different sized stars and such all over his room.  We waited that night to see the glowing celestial extravaganza.  We kept the light on for some time to 'charge' the glow in the dark element then turned off the light.  What we found was nothing close to amazing.  The glow was fairly dim and only lasted for a very short period of time.  We even turned a blacklight on them and all that did was make them glow a little brighter but, again, the glow only lasted about 10 -15 minutes.  I ended up going back online and buying glow in the dark paint and a star shaped sponge.  We dabbed stars all over his ceiling.  These glowing stars last most of the night and our friends and family think his room is really cool</review_text>
This was given to my 2 year old as a present.  It is really cute and he loved it but it is constantly falling apart.  The roof and doors keep coming off every time it is played with.  The concept is good, all the animals and farmer are built very well, but it's frustrating to me and my son that it won't stay together.</review_text>
Our son received this toy for his first birthday.  It has a lot of good features--teaches colors, numbers, farm animals and their sounds, several songs.  But the music is AWFUL--the singer is off-key on every single song (either that, or they did a bad job of matching up the music to his voice).  As someone who appreciates music, I cannot tolerate listening to this, especially since there are far better toys out there.  Since our son already has 2 LeapFrog toys which teach the same concepts as this toy (the Learning Table, which has much better quality music, and the Fridge Farm), we will be exchanging the Vtech Discovery Nursery Farm for a different toy</review_text>
The beads and charms are nice enough, but for the price you get very little with this kit -- only about 50 tiny glass beads and 50 spacers, plus the charms. There's nothing here special enough to justify spending the money -- there are plenty of nicer jewelry kits out there that are more generous with the supplies</review_text>
It's a very cute lamp, but it's VERY NOISY!  I had read the reviews and other people had said it's noisy but I didn't think it would sound like something ready for liftoff!!</review_text>
As you can see by other posts - we were all duped by a misleading advertisement.  It still shows "realistic tail movement" in the listing.  HELLO!!!  WHAT TAIL?!?!?!?!?  They have since changed the picture to the doll we all received.  The original picture showed the swimming one (tail attached).  My daughter was absolutely heartbroken when she opened this and realized this doll has no tail, nor does she swim.  I fully expect to be allowed to return this thing (opened) at no cost to myself.</review_text>
I only ordered this because my child was begging for the swimming mermaid. I compared Amazon's listing with the manufacture listing and ordered. We did not get what we ordered... we got a barbie dressed in a mermaid costume, NOT the swimming one! This was from Santa and, I'm sorry, but seeing that type of disappointment in a six year old's eyes just breaks your heart. Of course, it was after the packaging was torn apart to get her out and into eager hands. For the first time in my years of shopping, I feel robbed</review_text>
I did not purchase this doll from amazon, though my daughter received it as a gift--the REAL swimming mermaid.  DO NOT BUY THIS DOLL!!!  She took a bath last night with it and it did not swim!  It did not even move a bit--except for sinking to the bottom of the tub.  My daughter was ultimately disappointed and now we are going to try to take it back and get the Disney Swimming mermaid doll.  BUYER BEWARE--THIS DOLL IS NOT WHAT YOU THINK</review_text>
I ordered this doll for my 3 year old grandaughter who wanted nothing else for Christmas and even though the stores were sold out, she was sure that Santa could get it for her. When my daughter called to make SURE that I had it actually in hand - I said SURE - I ordered it from Amazon!  After all, the description said that was the SWIMMING Mermaid...that it would swim as soon as you put it in the water.  IT IS NOT!!!!  Like the other lady said - it is Just another Barbie doll in a green dress.  Now I will have to pay a premium to get it from Ebay (where I could have gotten it for less a week ago) and also have to pay express shipping and hope it gets here before Christmas. I will have pay 6 times what I paid for this deception and hope that Santa can get it here in time so that my grandaughter is not disappointed.  Beware of this seller!  I see that he has now removed the word swimming from the description.  Believe me - it was there before</review_text>
I ordered the doll because it said it will swim when put in water.  When I recieved the doll it was just a barbie.  It is not the swimming mermaid.</review_text>
I had water rockets like this when I was a kid in the early 1970s.  The rockets were no different from the ones that come in this package.  They shoot high and straight and are loads of fun.My only gripe is with the pump.When I was a kid, the pump was heavy plastic and metal.  The pump on these new rockets is cheap plastic.  The knob on the end broke off the first or second day.  My son and I are still able to shoot the rockets, but we have to carefully stick the knob back on each time we want to pump up a rocket.</review_text>
This was big on my 8 year-old son's Christmas list, mainly because of the Ben 10 game. He even wanted it more than any other game system. Although I wasn't about to pay full price for it, we got it at about 60% off for the main console. So we got it, paid for an extra controller, the Ben 10 Game CD, and a couple of Ben 10 Booster Packs.The unwrapping was a hit, and the excitement of the first play-through went over great with my son. But I noticed right away that it was not going to last. The game itself contains graphics from about 10 years ago. The game play is difficult, and both my son and I would find it easy to die, thus restarting the game for both of us. You can only play with the characters that happens to have come in your game or booster packs, and that's not many. (Want more? Fork out more $$$ for more booster packs.) And finally, it takes so long to load from the CD (and it has to load EVERY level) that it must be a 1x drive. Seriously slow.Although my son still loves the IDEA of it and has not admitted he's disappointed, he does comment on how slow it is, and how he wishes he had other kids to trade the cards with so he could get more. Apparently we were the only suckers to buy it around here. It hasn't been played but maybe 4 times in the one month since Christmas.If you notice it to be on a HUGE discount, it may be worth it. But remember, you have to pay extra for more cards. Personally, I wish we'd bought a used GameCube with a few cartridges. That has way more staying power than the HyperScan will</review_text>
Its disgusting that any company would make this figure into a toy. Complete with knives? geez give the kid a manuel next time</review_text>
We've had the same set with Christmas colors for three years.  After the first year, the "whistle" unit (housed in the tender) no longer worked.  And about 10 minutes into running the second year, the engine stopped.  Found that the engine was wired so that the power wire was rubbing a drive wheel.The engine is built with an underpowered motor, such that a fairly high power setting is required to get it moving and then it runs fast; there is only a tiny operating range before it will fly off on a curve.  The engine is very top heavy and the curves have a tight radius to them.  Finally, when taking the entire engine apart this year found the plastic gears flimsy, badly supported and worn even with recommended oiling.I still have some of my fathers Lionel trains and these can still be counted on to run today; the new stuff being sold is meant to be in the trash quickly.</review_text>
CHRISTMAS DAY THE TRAIN TRANSFORMER DID NOT GIVE POWER TO THE TRAIN SET.  ALL CONNECTIONS WERE VERIFIED AS WAS THE INSTRUCTION BOOKLET TO VERIFY PROPER CONNECTIONS. IT STILL DID NOT WORK.  THE ONLINE MERCHANT GAVE ONY 14 DAYS FROM DATE IT WAS SHIPPED TO RETURN FOR DEFECT, AND LIONAL WAS CLOSED FOR THE HOLIDAY UNTIL DEC 28TH.  WHEN LIONEL WAS FINALLY REACHED, THE TECH DEPARTMENT ESPECIALLY MR DEDEPPO  WERE COMPLETELY UNWILLING TO LISTEN TO THE TRAIN PROBLEMS AND ACTED COMPLETELY UNPROFESSIONAL YELLING AND SPEAKING IN A MOST AGITATED AMD UNHELPFUL MANOR.ADDITIONAL PHONE CALLS WERE PLACED TO LIONEL AND NO PERSON WAS ABLE TO GIVE THE REQUIRED INFORMATION TO ENSURE THE PRODUCT WAS DEFECTIVE AND THEREFORE REFUNDABLE ACCORDING TO THE RETURN POLICY OF THE AMAZON.COM RETAILER.BUYER BEWARE THE GOOD NAME OF LIONEL SEEMS TO BE A MEMORY, IN THIS INSTANCE, THE CURRENT MANUFACTURER ALLOW THEIR EMPLOYESS TO HARRASS AND THREATEN CUSTOMERS WHO SPENT A LARGE AMOUNT OF MONEY ON THEIR PRODUCT WITHOUT ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR THEIR DEFECT.I WOULD ONLY BUY A LIONAL TRAIN THAT IS EITHER VINTAGE OR MADE BY LIONEL PRIOR TO THE CURRENT OWNERSHIP</review_text>
I bought these from a local dollar store. I thought, "Wow, all these for one dollar?" Big mistake. I LOVE painting and am good at it, but this set ruins every paper, canvas, painting at ALL. The Brush hairs fall out and get mixed with the paint. DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT</review_text>
I just recently purchased the Red Variant of this figure and was excited and pleased to have both a nice looking action figure as well as the piece of Apocalypse.  But as I was setting him up, trying to move his leg it just snapped off at the hip joint. Hence the 2 star durability rating. I have never had this problem with the Legends line before, and was very disappointed, especially since it was the variant figure. Some superglue fixed the problem, but at the cost of some articulation. He is on my shelf now and looks great, but if you're giving the toy to younger children, be cautious. Like I said I have never had any problems like this with a Marvel Legends Figure before, so hopefully it was just a fluke.The figure is still well worth getting, and in fact I am going to pick up the Green version sometime in the near future</review_text>
While the kids love it, it's a headache for parents. It takes forever to inflate, even with an air compressor, thanks to many individual air chambers. As other reviewers noted, it's best not to leave it outside (the manufacturer recommends against it due to potential sun damage), but it's far too big to leave up inside the house. Not worth the time involved to set it up and take it down. I gave ours away</review_text>
our daughter has had this product for quite some time and sad to say she hasnt touched it much at all. this product does get alot of attention but it is more so with reassembly. it does not swing, it does not stay together. i am constantly putting the legs back on and setting it back up and placing it with my daughters lil corner of little mommy playthings. of all the items collected, this one seems to be the one with the most problems. we do have a variety of brands varying in price from cheaper to more expensive. this one is by far the worst product we have yet purchased for her collection. we have very few dolls that actually fit in the swing and the ones that do, are too small for it. it is also the smallest item my daughter has for her dolls that range in size. we will not purchase another of these as well as recommend others to not purchase one. if the price is too good to be true, then you will only get what you paid for</review_text>
This thing is a waste of time effort and money.  It falls apart the minute the child tries to swing the baby, not to mention it is too small for a two tear old to play with</review_text>
Dissapointed with this product! Our daughter can not even play with it without it falling apart! Small pieces that disconnect from swing not a good idea for childrens toys</review_text>
Swing comes out of base every time you try to put the baby doll in it and I bought the exact baby for it. The educational value of 3 stars is for me, you get what you pay for most of the time</review_text>
First, the Volvo wagon is supposed to be scaled for the Midge series of Barbie dolls, slightly smaller than regular Barbie.Another annoyance, it comes with a little pink roll-on suitcase full of microscopic Fisher-Price replica toys that have nothing to do with the Volvo.  I put all the tiny pieces together in the suitcase for my granddaughter and the suitcase wouldn't close. I looked on the box illustrations, and sure enough, they show a suitcase NOT CLOSED.  How could they design such a silly bunch of add-ons?  I just got rid of all that teeny-tiny stuff that doesn't relate to the inherent play value of the car.  Any kid would prefer to put her/his own stuff into a little suitcase than this mishmash of silly product promo from Fisher-Price.  Would have been nice to have a choice of colors, even approximately the REAL colors that the Volvo wagon comes in.  I just wanted my granddaughter to  be able to play-like with Grandma's white Volvo wagon.  How hard should that be?  Overall, I'm disappointed with this toy. For 28$, shipping included, I expected a better toy.  Not worth the money</review_text>
When I bought this toy, I thought it was SOOOO COOL. But it really doesn't do ANYTHING it's supposed to do! It just makes annoying crying and whining noises that DO NOT sound real. Even if I tickle its tummy it just whines and cries. DO NOT, I repeat, DO NOT buy this toy!!!!</review_text>
The idea behind this toy is great & ours has lived up to its durability claim.  My husband did not complain about adding songs to it, so it could not have been too bad.  Batteries:  this eats through them like crazy - and we used Duracell.  Volume:  the idea of volume control is good, but the highest volume is way too low.  I can't even hear anything until I get it to the mid-setting.  My 5 yr old son takes his to wrestling matches to listen while he waits his turn, but the background noise of the gym drowns out the sound in his headphones.  We probably should not have bought this until next year, maybe Fisher Price will have improved it by then</review_text>
First of all I think the concept is great however the safety bobber doesn't open and after about a dozen casts the reel fell apart. If you're looking for something that shoots, buy a rocket rocket not this rocket fishing rod and save some money. Shame on you Roland Martin for sponsoring such a piece of garbage. Don't expect to catch fish with this it is simply a novelty item</review_text>
My son was so excited for this toy.  It was all he asked for on his 8th birthday. We went out to the lake this week and then began our frustration.  First there is no way to launch this 30 feet unless the wind gusts and the moon and planets are alligned. Then the "safety" bobber is so safe it doesn't even open when it hits the water, but does cause such a large ripple in the lake that all fish are gone for hours.My son set it down after a hour of frustration and had me trek to the car to grab is old trusty fishing rod, that is not as colorful and plastic but does actually cast and catch fish. Don't get me wrong, I think the rod is a gret idea but the people who designed it did a very slipshoddy job, and I would warn anyone about spending money on it.</review_text>
Like many my age, I grew up with Legos.  My wife bought this kit for me for Christmas.  I was excited.  After a couple of days of work, my excitement had turned to frustration and finally to anger.  This kit is poorly designed, and the instructions are not well thought out.  First, the "Death Star" is built on a base that you construct of Legos.  This base is not very sturdy.  The instructions said to put a bunch of parts just on one side.  Left alone, the structure would tip over because of the imbalance.  Much of the structure had such flimsy connections that the slightest thing would break connections.  I don't mean the quality of the Legos; those things are impossible to break.  I mean the way in which various bars, hinges, etc were put together.In the end my wife and I probably spent 40 hours building something that would not hold together. I love Legos but this kit gets nothing but ill will for me.  For lack of a better phrase, this kit sucks</review_text>
DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY ON THIS TOY, THE BATTERY IS NOT AVAILABLE FOR THIS TOY. LEARN FROM MY MISTAKE. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY!!!!!!!!!! no where in the product discription does it tell you that the 9.6 volt battery is NOT INCLUDED, all it says, is that you will have to purchase a 9 volt battery for the remote. Don't look for the Tyco 9.6 volt battery in a store or on line, because it will be "out of stock". I have been trying to purchase one for  4 months</review_text>
Bad enough that the toy is a scam that requires extra  parts.  But the surprise here is the complicity of Amazon in this misleading packaging.  This is probably why the product is unavailable suddenly and the battery charger nowhere to be found.  They know they made a mistake. If only they  would contact us each now for a full refund.I wish a rep from Amazon could have spent the holiday week with my family as we searched from store to store for that charger.  I wish he could have spent an afternoon of watching my child stare at the toy he waited for. ..his "big" gift</review_text>
Luckily I had one of the 9.6 volt batteries around and saved myself 20 dollars, after placing the battery in which is no easy task, he has to walk behind it to get it to go, the range is terrible, why is there no antenna on the vehicle also? Too bad I threw the box away Xmas morning, now I'm out 49.99. Live and lear</review_text>
My son received this car for Christmas and I was appalled. Amazon only says that it requires a 9 volt battery, which was no problem getting. But as for the 9 V Turbo battery and charger, good luck finding that. I bought it when it was on sale for $19.99 and the original price said it was $59.99, so I thought that I was getting a deal. HUGE MISTAKE! I didn't know that I would have to purchase an additional $20 battery. NO WONDER WHY IT WAS ONLY $19.99! ITs a piece of junk. I also got the batboat, but I'm afraid to see what that might need. My advice, DONT GET IT</review_text>
i got this toy with my own money and i think i wasted it bigtime! i play with the products more than the store.i think it should have been bigger and come with more stuff i nd not have had all that crap painted on the card borad backs to the shelves and i think it should had come with plastic strong backs instead of card borad stuff. i uassly take out the  card borad backs and make the store be a grocery store i would NOT buy this toy i would by the nursery playset instead.im 11 yrs ol</review_text>
Don't buy this price increased version.  I doesn't work any better than the $19.95 model.  Plus it uses twice the amount of batteries.  The concept is great, the graphics are great and that's the end of it.  This just like the first plug and play Ms Pacman (which I also bought) and has a joy stick issue.  If the manufacturer would take off the games that need the twisting action of the joy stick maybe this would actually be fun to play instead of frustrating.  While playing Ms Pacman which is the ONLY reason I bought these plug and plays Ms Pacman has a mind of her own, turns corners on her own and runs into the ghosts on her own.  It's impossible to use the joy stick without twisting it during play and then you're out of control.  It's extremely frustrating.  For as popular as Pacman and Ms Pacman were in their day and still are these plug and plays would sell on that merit alone so take off the games needing the turning action of the joystick</review_text>
this toy is a ripoff for 1/2 yr. olds and you'll get annoyed couase the games are SOOOOOOOOOOO hard even for me a 12 year old and in stead you should try out this game its an internet game its better than fat Tamagotchi and if you drop the tmagotchi in water it dies 4evr 4evr and evr FOREVER DO YOU HEAR ME!!!!!go to [...]you wont regret it!!or you can laugh at me i dont car</review_text>
I nearly bought this until I read that it involves cardboard and stickers.  That's shameful.Search Amazon's partners and other major booksellers for the "Nostalgia" edition of Stratego.  It runs $4 or $5 more.  It has plastic pieces with metallic paint.This game is a blast; you and your kids are going to play it a lot</review_text>
I bought this for my 6 year old after Christmas as her cousin received one and loved it.  I ran all over town trying to find the PVD's (which are hard to find a good selection of).  I ended up purchasing some online.  By the time the PVD's arrived, the player was no longer working.  We have replaced the batteries several times.  On a rare occasion, it will turn on, but that is very rare.  We are very disappointed with this unit.  I should have listened to my husband and bought the DVD player!</review_text>
My 4 year old really wanted this for Christmas, after looking at similar products, we chose this one.  Should have spent the money on the one w/the DVD.  Tutu is WAY TOO SMALL - fits her 18" doll.  Mat is a little too sensitive, she tries to put her feet in the position and kicks off the music pads.  Only 2 instructions - feet up, feet down. On the other arms up, arms down.  Bar isn't very stable.  Company should save the money they spent putting in the tutu and slippers and create a more helpful mat.  My daughter will press the music button on the mat and then dance off it.</review_text>
I bought two Bionicles for my son's stocking at Christmas.  He is 5 so I had to help him put them together.  It took forever to construct this sad little robot and within minutes of playing with it, it began to fall apart.  The instructions are not clear and the overall durability just stinks.  If your child just wants to construct them and display them, then this is great.  If your child wants to play with them, forget it.  Go buy a preassembled action figure and move on with your life</review_text>
The pictures get jammed in the camera and are very hard to remove.  One picture got stuck in there and so this toy was broken after about 2 days of play</review_text>
I bought this sippy cup seeing how informative the review was.. and I was happy when i saw it and my baby liked it..But whn i went to wash it, i cleaned the valve, by removin a obvious piece that had to be removed to clean... and it never was able to attach corrctly it will fall in her drink and completely get my babys face all wet so after ONE use i had to discard it... maybe it was defected but i was not satisfied with it</review_text>
I ordered the Smack and Yack:Disney Cars Sally, Lightning and Ramone for Christmas.  The only one of them that worked consistently after a few minutes was Ramone.  Sally and Lightning only worked sporadically after a few minutes and then after about an hour,  they wouldn't work at all.  I ended up having to order the same ones again because my daughter was so upset that they stopped working on Christmas.  I hope the new ones work for a longer time than the orginal purchases</review_text>
PROS: Very cool toy/model for a 12+ with extra time on their hands.CONS: Too many microscopic pieces to count.Very little room for open play.Requires extreme caution playing with it because the propeller and other pieces fall apart at the slightest breath.Not appropriate for under 7, at least.First just let me say that my son loves the Lego Duplo blocks and spends hours creating all kinds of different designs with them. He has been begging for the "big boy" Legos, and I have been turning him down, pointing out the recommended ages on the box, (knowing that I would be picking up infinite numbers of tiny pieces throughout the house for the next 18+ years). The ages they put on the box seem to be purely arbitrary, based on this particular toy. A well-meaning relative decided to bless him with this present on his 5th birthday. (I will be seeking revenge as soon as they have children.) I spent the next several hours constructing this nightmare, which in and of itself defeats the purpose of a building toy, in my opinion. I have no idea where they have the idea that this is appropriate for a 5-year-old, given that it was a challenge for me to put this together. Given the amount of microscopic pieces in this toy, one has to wonder who designs these things and if they have children of their own. So much of it seems purely sadistic.When the helicopter was finally assembled (and I warned him that that was the one and only time I was putting it together), my son spent some time playing with it, only to be constantly frustrated by the fact that pieces were constantly popping off, particularly the propeller, and this was with very gentle play.Bottom line, if you have a child under 10, they would probably have many more hours of play if you just bought a lot of inexpensively priced Lego blocks (of various types) that they could make into all kinds of different designs. These expensively priced City lines and the like are really neat once built, but then it's just like a very fragile model. Once you've spent the time constructing it, you really don't want to take it apart, so I'm not really sure why you would buy this over a traditional model. I guess I miss the point.</review_text>
I helped my five-year old assemble this, and, like most LEGO directions, it went together well...unfortunately, it doesn't stay together...when he tries to play with it, the tail section falls off or it breaks in the middle...not as easy to put back together once it's come apart...it's proven a real disappointment..</review_text>
I just saw this today in 2 stores (both priced at 19.99), and both stores had a lot of these games, also ebay  has a ton of these going for less than $20!  This price is absolutely ridiculous!!!</review_text>
People this is a brand new game out for the v-smile system.  Walmart has tuns of them in the store for 19.99!  Don't waste your money!  This store is lying!!!!</review_text>
What on earth are you thinking? Nobody is going to pay that much for this game unless it has a portal to the deminsion of Toyland.</review_text>
Unfortunatley, I am not very techno savvy. I purchased this thinking we could use it on the original hyperscan unit...wronge. My boys told me otherwise, when they opened up the unit and hooked it up, this, being Ben 10, and the original unit being X Men, did nothing. I felt so bad for my son, he loves Ben 10 and could not even use these cards</review_text>
This marble maze looks so fun and cute. However, it's actually useless and incredibly frustrating. The pieces don't fit together well and tend to fall over when you look at them--much less when you try to roll a marble through them. Also, the configurations pictured on the box don't work at all. Either our giraffe is missing a critical piece, or the wood planks are supposed to magically levitate. Ugh, I'm returning this immediately</review_text>
I was dissapointed in the quality of this microphone. The sound effects are very loud and "crumbly" and the microphone itself is a bit cheap.  The microphone does not amplify the voice very loud either.  Cute to look at though</review_text>
I'm here to find replacement parts for this toy.  My daughter was working really hard to try to make something work on this, and right when she got it together, one of the wires attached to the light broke off, when she tried to put it into the coil to make the connection.We can't solder it back in, there are no replacement parts and my daughter is crying at the kitchen table and we don't want to order another one, just to make her happy.Seriously, this toy is a piece of crap.I gave the toy high marks for educational value, because it teaches kids an important lesson.  Once corporations have your money, they don't care about whether or not you actually were able to use it, or have fun, or will need replacement parts, they only want to get MORE money off you, somehow.Also, buyer beware is an important lesson.</review_text>
This was a real let down for my daughter.  She loves horses and has several Breyer horses.  When we saw this paddock she was so excited about it.  We decided to get it for her for Christmas.  It is very flimsy, does not stay together and breaks easily.  She spent more time trying to fix it than actually playing with it.  After a couple of weeks it was just completely not worth the effort and we put it up but later threw it away, only the doll and horses were salvagable</review_text>
this was purchased for my 2 yr old son who loved to draw and scribble.  He was so excited to see thomas riding the track - well it worked the day we opened it and never again!  I would recommend not spending the money on this one and get the regular aquadoodle for 1/2 the price!  You are not able to wash the mat so if you get anything on it (eg. crayon or dirt) you can't get it out.</review_text>
I consider myself a very tolerable and patient parent when it come to toys with noise, however; this phone is way too LOUD for baby/toddler.  It actually startles my 15 month old and makes him cry because it is so loud. Plus, it is powered by the wonderful button batteries that don't last. This was given as a gift, glad I didn't spend my money on it. Be aware that this phone is annoying, really serves no purpose and is too loud for babies ears</review_text>
OF ALL OF THE EXPENSIVE GIFTS I PURCHASED FOR CHRISTMAS, THIS WAS THE ONE THING MY DAUGHTER PLAYED WITH CONSISTENTLY.  THE PRICE IS RIGHT AND NOW THEY HAVE FREE SHIPPING.  THE ONE BAD THING IS THAT THE CARDS ARE FLIMSY AND WE WORE THEM OUT!</review_text>
When I received the punching nun and removed her from the package, her halibut fell off, the glue holding her black cape on didn't hold either.I wouldn't buy another product through this company if this is the type of merchandise they are shipping.Save your money and go to your local mall novelty store and pick one up.</review_text>
